Louisiana, session 2026, SB520.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart A-4 of Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:189.1 through 189.32 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
SUBPART A-4 LOUISIANA JUMP START MODERNIZATION ACT
§189.1. Legislative findings; purpose
A. Legislative Findings.
The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:
(1) Career and technical education is foundational to Louisiana's
workforce development, economic competitiveness, and educational goals, and
a coherent, high-quality career and technical education system is essential to
Page 1 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
connecting Louisiana students to priority careers and to meeting regional and
statewide employer demand.
(2) Louisiana's long-term economic competitiveness depends on a system
that is responsive to labor market demand, supported by cross-agency
coordination, and grounded in transparent outcome data.
(3) Louisiana's students, families, and employers are best served by a
Jump Start program grounded in strong governance accountability, rigorous
program quality standards, public data reporting, and durable industry
alignment mechanisms, and this Act establishes the statutory framework
necessary to ensure the program delivers lasting, measurable value across
administrations and budget cycles.
B. Statement of Purpose.
The purposes of this Subpart are to accomplish all of the following:
(1) To establish a coherent, high-quality K–12 career and technical

education pathway system organized around a clearly defined framework.
(2) To strengthen the governance, quality, and accountability of the
Jump Start program by creating an independent Louisiana Career and
Technical Education Oversight Council with defined composition, authority,
and funding; establishing mandatory cross-agency coordination among the
Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, and
the Board of Regents; ensuring that approved pathways lead to viable, high-
wage, high-demand occupations; and mandating transparent public data
reporting.
(3) To ensure that every Louisiana student has access to - and can
complete - rigorous career and technical education by establishing
differentiated provisions, guaranteeing postsecondary articulation credit
opportunities for Career Diploma completers, and providing that no student's
geographic location shall determine the quality or availability of career and
technical education pathways available to that student.
C. Program Designation; Short Title.
Page 2 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(1) The career and technical education program established by this

Subpart shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program."
(2) This Subpart may be cited as the "Louisiana Jump Start
Modernization Act."
(3) Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to alter the program
designation established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, or to limit the
authority of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education (BESE)
to develop program materials, adopt administrative rules, and communicate
with the public regarding this Subpart using the program name established
herein. Any rules, bulletins, or guidance documents adopted by the State Board
pursuant to this Subpart shall reference the program by its statutory
designation.
§189.2. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following terms shall have the following
meanings.
(1) "Career and technical education" or "CTE" This term shall be
interpreted consistent with, and shall not be construed more narrowly than, the
definition established in the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education
Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 2302(5).
(2) "Career diploma" A secondary school diploma issued by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to a student who has
successfully completed all requirements of an approved Louisiana Jump Start
career pathway under this Subpart. A Career Diploma shall be recognized by
all Louisiana public postsecondary education institutions as equivalent to a
regular standard diploma pursuant to §189.5 of this Subpart.
(3) "Career coach" or "qualified career coach" A person who is not a
licensed school counselor but who is authorized by a public school governing
authority to provide individualized student career planning and advising
services consistent with R.S. 17:2926 and the requirements of this Subpart, and
Page 3 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
who meets the qualifications established by the Louisiana Department of
Education pursuant to §183.8© of this Subpart. Nothing in this definition shall
be construed to authorize a career coach to perform duties reserved by law to
a licensed school counselor, except as specifically provided by this Subpart.
(4) "CTE concentrator" A secondary student who has completed at least
two credits in a single approved career and technical education pathway under
this Subpart. For purposes of federal reporting under the Carl D. Perkins
Career and Technical Education Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et
seq., this definition shall be interpreted to align with the federal CTE
concentrator definition in a manner that preserves Louisiana's compliance with
all applicable Perkins V reporting requirements.
(5) "CTE completer" A secondary student who has satisfied all
requirements of an approved career and technical education pathway under
this Subpart, including the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence established
in §183.10©, and who has earned at least one industry-based credential as
required for Career Diploma completion. The term includes both students who
earn a Career Diploma and students who complete all pathway requirements
but do not elect to receive a Career Diploma.
(6) "Career major program" A structured sequence of academic core
and career and technical education courses constituting the curriculum of an
authorized K–12 CTE pathway through which a student satisfies the
requirements for a Louisiana Career Diploma.
(7) "Enhanced wage record" or "EWR" A quarterly wage record
submitted by an employer to the Louisiana Workforce Commission that
includes, in addition to the elements required for standard unemployment
insurance wage reporting under Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes, the
following job-level data elements for each employee during the reporting
period: (a) occupation code consistent with the Standard Occupational
Classification (SOC) system; (b) total hours worked; © primary work location;
Page 4 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) hourly wage equivalent; and (e) job start and end dates. Enhanced wage
record data shall serve as the primary wage and employment outcome tracking
mechanism for career and technical education pathway completers under
§183.20 of this Subpart.
(8) "Individual Career and Academic Plan" or "ICAP" Longitudinal
career development and academic planning document required for each student
under §183.7 of this Subpart that identifies the student's career interests,
academic strengths, and preliminary career pathway goals. An ICAP shall be
initiated no later than the beginning of grade seven, reviewed and updated
annually through grade twelve, and aligned with the student's Individual
Graduation Plan developed and maintained pursuant to R.S. 17:2925. The
ICAP shall serve as the primary planning instrument connecting the K–12
career awareness and exploration framework to approved Jump Start pathway
selection and enrollment, as established in §183.7 of this Subpart.
(9) "Individual Graduation Plan" or "IGP" The individualized plan
required for each student pursuant to R.S. 17:2925 that sets forth the student's
selected course of study, chosen diploma pathway, and postsecondary goals. The
IGP shall be aligned with the student's Individual Career and Academic Plan
as provided in §183.7 of this Subpart, shall be developed, reviewed annually,
and revised with the assistance of a school counselor or career coach as
provided in R.S. 17:2925, and shall, for a student pursuing a Career Diploma
under this Subpart, identify the approved Jump Start pathway selected by the
student.
(10) "Individualized Education Program" or "IEP" Written educational
plan required for each eligible student with a disability under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., and as the term
applies to students with exceptionalities as defined in R.S. 17:1942. For purposes
of this Subpart, an IEP shall be coordinated with the student's Individual
Career and Academic Plan and Individual Graduation Plan to ensure
Page 5 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
meaningful access to appropriate career and technical education pathways
consistent with the student's educational goals and all applicable requirements
under IDEA, the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g,
and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
(11) "Industry-based credential" or "IBC" An independent, third-party
credential that: (a) reflects a specific set of competencies related to a particular
industry sector or occupation; (b) is recognized and accepted by employers in
the relevant labor market as evidence of workplace readiness; © is portable
across employers and geographic areas; (d) provides a valid and reliable
measure of an individual's technical knowledge and skills; and (e) takes the
form of a certification, certificate, or occupational license. For purposes of this
Subpart, an industry-based credential must be: (I) approved by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065; or (ii) otherwise
designated by the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council
established in §183.3, consistent with the credential tier classification
framework established in §183.12 of this Subpart.
(12) "K–12 CTE pathway" or "pathway" An approved, structured
sequence of courses, work-based learning experiences, and industry-based
credentials organized around a defined career field within a recognized career
cluster and authorized by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education following a recommendation by the Louisiana Career and Technical
Education Oversight Council. The term includes both statewide pathways and
regional pathways as defined in this Section, and shall not be construed to
include any sequence of courses that does not satisfy the minimum standards
established in §183.10.
(13) "Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council" or
"Council" An independent statutory body separate and distinct from the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and from the Louisiana
Department of Education, with authority to provide independent oversight of
Page 6 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Louisiana's career and technical education system, to establish and maintain a
shared performance framework binding on the Louisiana Department of
Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, the Board of Regents, and
the Louisiana Community and Technical College System and to ensure
alignment between authorized pathways and regional and statewide workforce
demands.
(14) "Louisiana Workforce Commission" or "LWC" State agency
established pursuant to R.S. 23:2061 et seq. that administers Louisiana's
workforce development programs, unemployment insurance system, and labor
market information services. The LWC shall serve as a data and coordination
partner for career and technical education outcome tracking and industry
alignment review under §183.20 and §183.21 of this Subpart.
(15) "Local education agency" or "LEA" A public board of education
or other public authority legally constituted within Louisiana for the
administrative control and direction of, or to perform a service function for,
public elementary or secondary schools in a city, parish, or other local public
school district, consistent with the definition established in R.S. 17:1942. The
term includes each city, parish, and other local public school board responsible
for implementing a career and technical education program under this Subpart,
and each local school system participating in a regional team pursuant to
§183.9.
(16) "Priority occupation" An occupation that meets the minimum
statutory wage threshold and projected growth rate standard established in
§183.4 of this Subpart, is rated four or five stars in the Louisiana Workforce
Commission's official statewide occupational forecast (or its equivalent
successor) pursuant to R.S. 23:76, and that has been formally designated by the
Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council, based on current
and projected regional or statewide labor market demand data from the
Louisiana Workforce Commission, the Bureau of Labor Statistics, as a priority
Page 7 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
occupation for career and technical education pathway development and public
investment. A priority occupation designation is distinct from the viable
occupation standard in Subsection (U) of this Section in that it reflects an
affirmative policy designation for pathway development, not the minimum
threshold for pathway authorization. The Council may apply more rigorous
wage threshold and growth rate standards for priority occupation designation
that exceed the minimums required for viable occupation status under
§183.4(D)(5) of this Subpart.
(17) "Regional pathway" A K–12 CTE pathway developed by a regional
team and approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
for delivery within a defined geographic region of the state, which may be
tailored to address regionally specific labor market demands, local industry
partner capacity, and regional workforce priorities within that region. A
regional pathway shall satisfy all minimum pathway authorization
requirements established in §183.13 of this Subpart and shall adhere to the
same academic requirements as statewide pathways to enable students to
continue postsecondary education following high school graduation.
(18) "Regional team" A multi-agency, multi-sector body consisting of
local education agencies, one or more public postsecondary education
institutions with priority consideration given to technical and community
colleges, and business, industry, and workforce development representatives
that is responsible for jointly developing, proposing, and overseeing career and
technical education pathway delivery within a defined geographic region of the
state, as further described in §183.9(F) of this Subpart. A regional team shall
include representatives sufficient to ensure that proposed pathways reflect
documented regional labor market demand.
(19 "Rural local education agency" or "rural LEA" A local education
agency that meets the population density, school enrollment, and geographic
criteria established in §183.14 of this Subpart and that is therefore eligible for:
Page 8 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) differentiated pathway authorization thresholds that account for limited
local industry partner pools and small student enrollment sizes; (b) inter-
district consortium pathway authorization allowing multiple rural LEAs to
jointly develop and deliver a single pathway; and © rural-specific program
delivery provisions established in §183.14.
(20) "Statewide pathway" A K–12 CTE pathway approved by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for delivery statewide, anchored
to one or more industry-based credentials approved by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065, and meeting all
pathway authorization requirements established in §183.13 of this Subpart. A
statewide pathway shall be subject to the biennial industry priority review
conducted by the Council pursuant to §183.4.
(21) "Viable occupation" An occupation that meets the minimum
statutory wage threshold and minimum projected growth rate standard. The
viable occupation standard constitutes the minimum authorization floor for
pathway approval and is distinct from a priority occupation designation under
Subsection (P) of this Section.
(22) "Work-based learning" means a structured, supervised learning
activity that integrates classroom instruction with employer-directed workplace
experience through progressively intensive levels of engagement, organized as
a tiered quality continuum as established in §183.11 of this Subpart. The term
includes both school-supervised and employer-supervised placements as
categorized in §183.11.
§189.3 Career and technical education oversight council; establishment;
governance; authority
A. Council Established; Name; Status
(1) There is hereby created a body politic and corporate, constituting a
public corporation and instrumentality of the state within the executive branch
of state government, to be known as the "Louisiana Career and Technical
Page 9 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Education Oversight Council," hereinafter referred to as 'the Council.' The
Council shall be an independent statutory body, separate and distinct from the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and from the Louisiana
Department of Education, with authority limited to the powers expressly
granted by this Subpart.
(2) The Council is not an agency of, component of, or advisory body to
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education. The Council shall not
be subject to the direction, supervision, or control of the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education in the performance of its statutory duties
under this Subpart except as expressly provided herein.
(3) The Council shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law, R.S. 42:11
et seq., the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq., and the Code of
Governmental Ethics, R.S. 42:1101 et seq., as applicable to its operations.
B. Membership Composition; Minimum Requirements

(1) The Council shall consist of fifteen members as follows:
(a) Seven voting members representing industry sectors designated as
priority industries pursuant to §183.4 of this Subpart, appointed by the
governor. No more than two of the seven industry members shall represent the
same priority industry sector. Each such member shall be a current owner,
officer, or senior employee of a Louisiana-domiciled business.
(b) Three voting members representing presidents or senior staff of
statewide business or industry associations headquartered in Louisiana,
appointed by the governor.
© One voting member with demonstrated expertise in labor market data
analysis, workforce economics, and/or career and technical education policy
research, who is not currently employed by any Louisiana state agency,
appointed by the governor.
(d) The state Superintendent of Education, who shall serve as a
nonvoting member.
Page 10 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(e) The secretary of the Louisiana Workforce Commission ("Louisiana
Works"), who shall serve as a nonvoting member.
(f) The commissioner of Higher Education, who shall serve as a
nonvoting member.
(g) The president of the Louisiana Community and Technical College
System, who shall serve as a nonvoting member.
(2) The nonvoting members described in Subparagraphs (B)(1)(d),
(B)(1)(e), and (B)(1)(f) of this Section shall not be counted in determining
whether a quorum exists. Nonvoting members may participate fully in Council
deliberations and shall have access to all Council records and documents.
(3) No voting member of the Council shall simultaneously hold an elected
or appointed state government position or serve as a current employee of the
Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, the
Board of Regents, or the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
during the member's term on the Council.
C. Appointment Process; Appointing Authorities
(1) All voting members of the Council described in Subparagraphs
(B)(1)(a) through (B)(1)© of this Section shall be appointed by the governor.
(2) The governor shall make initial appointments to all voting member

positions not later than ninety days after the effective date of this Subpart.
(3) If the governor fails to make an initial appointment within the period

specified in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the chair of the House Committee
on Education and the chair of the Senate Committee on Education shall jointly
request that the governor make the appointment within thirty additional days.
D. Terms of Office; Staggered Terms
(1) Voting members of the Council shall serve terms of four years each,

except as provided for initial staggered terms under Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection.
(2) To establish staggered terms, of the ten voting members initially

Page 11 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
appointed to the Council:
(a) Five members, as designated by the governor at the time of
appointment, shall serve initial terms of two years; and
(b) Five members, as designated by the governor at the time of
appointment, shall serve initial terms of four years.
(3) Upon expiration of the initial terms established under Paragraph

(2)(a) of this Subsection, all subsequent terms shall be four years.
(4) No voting member shall serve more than two consecutive full terms
on the Council. A partial term served to fill a vacancy as provided in §183.3(E)
shall not be counted as a full term for purposes of this Paragraph. A member
who has served two consecutive full terms may be reappointed after an interval
of one full term.
(5) A voting member whose term has expired shall continue to serve in

a holdover capacity until a successor is duly appointed, not to exceed one
hundred eighty days.
E. Removal Provisions; Vacancies
(1) A voting member of the Council may be removed by the original

appointing authority for cause, including but not limited to malfeasance in
office, neglect of duty, incompetence, conviction of a felony, or conduct
unbecoming the office. Before removal, the appointing authority shall provide
the member with written notice stating the specific grounds for removal and
afford the member an opportunity to respond in writing within fifteen calendar
days.
(2) A vacancy on the Council shall occur upon the death, resignation,

removal for cause, or loss of eligibility of a voting member. A member shall lose
eligibility if the member no longer satisfies the qualification requirements
applicable to the member's category of appointment under Subsection B of this
Section.
Page 12 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(3) A vacancy shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the

remainder of the unexpired term. The appointing authority shall make a
vacancy appointment within sixty days of the date the vacancy occurs.
(4) A vacancy shall not impair the authority of the remaining members

to exercise the powers of the Council, provided a quorum as defined in
Subsection F of this Section is maintained.
F. Quorum Requirements
(1) A majority of the voting members currently serving on the Council,

excluding vacant positions, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(2) If quorum is not obtained, the Council may not take formal action or

vote.
G. Officers; Chair; Vice-Chair; Terms; Duties
(1) The voting members of the Council shall annually elect from among

themselves a chair and a vice-chair at the first meeting of each calendar year.
An officer may not serve more than two consecutive annual terms in the same
office on the Council.
(2) The chair shall preside at all meetings of the Council, execute official

correspondence and documents on behalf of the Council as authorized by the
Council, serve as the primary spokesperson for the Council in official
communications, and perform all other duties assigned to the chair by the
Council.
(3) In the absence or incapacity of the chair, the vice-chair shall perform

all duties of the chair.
(4) The Council may, by majority vote, elect such additional officers

from among its voting members as it deems necessary for the efficient conduct
of its business. The Council may not create an officer position that exercises
independent authority not expressly granted by this Subpart.
Page 13 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
H. Meeting Requirements; Frequency; Public Access; Record-Keeping
(1) The Council shall meet not fewer than four times per calendar year.

Additional meetings may be convened by the chair upon the chair's own
initiative or upon receipt of a written request signed by not fewer than six
voting members of the Council.
(2) All meetings of the Council shall be open to the public and conducted

in compliance with R.S. 42:11 et seq. (Open Meetings Law). Written notice of
each regular meeting shall be provided not fewer than five business days in
advance through the publicly accessible website maintained pursuant to
Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. Emergency meetings shall be convened only
in compliance with R.S. 42:19.
(3) The Council shall maintain comprehensive written minutes of each

meeting. Minutes shall record all items on the agenda, all votes taken, the name
and position of each member voting for and against any motion, each member's
abstention if applicable, and any member's timely submitted written dissent.
Minutes shall be posted on a publicly accessible website maintained by the
Louisiana Department of Education pursuant to Subsection M of this Section
not later than fifteen business days after the meeting to which they relate.
Minutes shall be subject to approval by the Council at the subsequent meeting.
(4) All records of the Council, including meeting minutes, official

correspondence, written recommendations to the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, and agency responses, shall constitute public records
subject to R.S. 44:1 et seq.
I. Council Duties and Responsibilities
The Council shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) To review each of the following categories of proposed decisions and
to issue written recommendations to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education thereon, prior to and as a condition of Board action, in the
manner and within the timeframes established in Subsection K of this Section:
Page 14 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) Authorization of any new statewide or regional Jump Start career
and technical education pathway pursuant to §183.9 of this Subpart.
(b) Significant modification of any currently authorized statewide or
regional pathway, defined as any change to the required industry-based
credential or credential tier, the required CTE course sequence, or the work-
based learning tier requirement.
© Sunset, discontinuation, or deauthorization of any currently
authorized statewide or regional pathway pursuant to §183.13 of this Subpart.
(d) Reclassification of any industry-based credential from one tier to
another under the approved credential tier list established pursuant to §183.12
of this Subpart, including elevation to a higher tier, demotion to a lower tier, or
removal from the approved list.
(e) Adoption or significant revision of the statewide standards applicable
to all Jump Start pathway authorization proposals under §183.9 of this Subpart.
(2) To establish and maintain, in consultation with the Louisiana
Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, the Board of
Regents, and the Louisiana Community and Technical College System a shared
performance framework for the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma
Program. The shared performance framework shall be binding on each named
agency for purposes of annual reporting to the Council, shall be reviewed and
updated by the Council not less than every two years, and shall include at
minimum:
(a) Student CTE pathway completion rates, disaggregated by race,
income, disability status, and geographic region.
(b) Industry-based credential attainment rates, disaggregated by
credential tier established under §183.12 of this Subpart.
© Post-graduation employment rates and median wages for Career
Diploma holders, measured at one year and three years after graduation using
enhanced wage record data as defined in §183.2 of this Subpart.
Page 15 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) Postsecondary continuation rates for Career Diploma holders at
Louisiana public postsecondary institutions.
(e) Advanced work-based learning participation rates, defined as Level
3 or above under §183.11 of this Subpart.
(f) Pathway-level return on investment metrics consistent with Act 187
of the 2021 Regular Session (R.S. 17:3138.13) and as further established in
§183.20 of this Subpart.
(3) To implement and maintain the shared performance framework
established pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection in a manner that is
consistent and coordinated with any existing or future legislation addressing K-12
or workforce education data collection, performance metrics, accountability
reporting, or data transparency, including but not limited to Act 187 of the 2021
Regular Session (R.S. 17:3138.13) and any successor or other legislation. In
conducting each biennial review and update of the shared performance
framework required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the Council shall
assess the framework's consistency with any such legislation enacted or amended
since the prior review and shall revise the framework as necessary to avoid
duplication, ensure compatibility, and leverage data resources and reporting
obligations established by such legislation.
(4) To review and issue written recommendations to the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education on the designation, reclassification,
elevation, demotion, or removal of credentials from the approved industry-
based credential tier list pursuant to §183.12 of this Subpart.
(5) To coordinate with the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council
pursuant to R.S. 23:2065 regarding alignment of priority industries and
industry-based credential approvals, and to report to the legislature annually
on the status of that coordination.
(6) To prepare and publish an annual joint performance report on Jump
Start program outcomes, prepared in coordination with the Louisiana
Page 16 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, and the Board
of Regents, submitted to the legislature and posted publicly not later than
December 1 of each year. The annual joint report shall present data measured
under the shared performance framework established pursuant to Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection.
(7) To adopt bylaws, internal operating procedures, and conflict-of-
interest policies governing the Council's operations, consistent with this Subpart
and applicable law. The Council shall review and reaffirm or revise its bylaws
not less than every four years.
(8) To prepare and transmit a self-evaluation report to the legislature in

advance of each sunset review conducted pursuant to Subsection N of this
Section, as specified in that Subsection.
J. Council Authority; Scope and Limits
(1) The authority of the Council is limited to the powers expressly

granted by this Subpart. No provision of this Subpart shall be construed to
expand the Council's authority beyond those expressly granted powers, nor
shall this Subpart be construed to limit the rulemaking authority of the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education under R.S. 17:7, except as
expressly provided in Subsection K of this Section.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subpart, the Council

shall not:
(a) Promulgate rules within the meaning of the Administrative
Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.
(b) Make final decisions on pathway authorization, reauthorization,
modification, or deauthorization, which authority is reserved to the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education subject to the recommendation
requirements of Subsection K of this Section.
© Direct, supervise, or control the day-to-day administrative operations
of the Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce
Page 17 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Commission, the Board of Regents, or the Louisiana Community and Technical
College System.
(d) Compel the reallocation of budgeted funds or personnel within any
agency. The Council's authority over the shared performance framework is
limited to setting metrics, requiring reporting, and making recommendations.
(3) Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to alter the authority of

the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education under R.S. 17:7,
including its authority to promulgate bulletins and administrative rules
governing K-12 education, except to the extent that Subsection K of this Section
imposes a procedural prerequisite of receiving a Council recommendation
before the Board acts on the enumerated decision categories.
(4) The Council's written recommendations issued pursuant to

Subsection K of this Section are advisory in legal character; they create a
procedural prerequisite to BESE action on specified decisions and impose
transparency obligations when BESE departs from such recommendations, but
they do not in themselves constitute final agency action and shall not be subject
to judicial review as final orders.
K. BESE-Council Jurisdictional Boundary; Decision-Making Hierarchy
(1) Council Recommendation Required Before BESE Acts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subpart or of R.S. 17:7, the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall not take formal action on
any of the following categories of decisions without first receiving a written
recommendation from the Council pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection:
(a) Authorization of any new statewide or regional Jump Start career
and technical education pathway pursuant to §183.9 of this Subpart.
(b) Significant modification of any currently authorized statewide or
regional pathway, defined for purposes of this Subsection as any change to one
or more of the following elements of an authorized pathway: (I) the required
Page 18 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
industry-based credential or credential tier; (ii) the required CTE course
sequence; or (iii) the work-based learning tier requirement.
© Sunset, discontinuation, or deauthorization of any currently
authorized statewide or regional pathway pursuant to §183.13 of this Subpart.
(d) Reclassification of any industry-based credential from one tier to
another under the approved credential tier list established pursuant to §183.12
of this Subpart, including elevation to a higher tier, demotion to a lower tier, or
removal from the approved list.
(e) Adoption or significant revision of the statewide standards applicable
to all Jump Start pathway authorization proposals under §183.9 of this Subpart.
(2) Recommendation Process and Timeline. When the State Board of

Elementary and Secondary Education proposes to take action on a decision
enumerated in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the following process shall
govern:
(a) The Louisiana Department of Education shall transmit to the
Council, not fewer than sixty calendar days before the Board's scheduled action
date, a written notice of the proposed decision, a complete description of the
proposed action, and all supporting documentation material to the decision.
(b) The Council shall issue its written recommendation not fewer than
thirty calendar days before the Board's scheduled action date. The written
recommendation shall include:
(I) The Council's specific recommendation, stated as a recommendation
to approve, approve with conditions, deny, or defer the proposed action.
(ii) The Council's written findings supporting the recommendation.
(iii) The vote count, including the number voting in favor, against, and
abstaining.
(iv) Any dissenting views submitted by individual voting members.
© If the Council fails to issue a written recommendation within the time
period specified in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, the State Board of
Page 19 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Elementary and Secondary Education may proceed with the proposed action
without a Council recommendation. The Board's action record shall document
that the Council did not issue a timely recommendation and shall state the date
the documentation package was transmitted to the Council under
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(3) BESE Override of Council Recommendation; Written Findings
Requirement. If the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education takes
action contrary to a written recommendation issued by the Council pursuant to
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the following requirements shall apply:
(a) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt,
at the same meeting at which the Board takes the action that departs from the
Council's recommendation, written findings of the Board stating specifically.
(I) The Council's recommendation and the basis stated in the Council's
written findings.
(ii) The Board's reasons for departing from the Council's
recommendation.
(iii) The specific factual and policy basis for the Board's action.
(b) If the Council's recommendation that is being overridden was
unanimous meaning every voting member who cast a vote on the
recommendation voted in the same direction, with no opposing votes cast, the
Board's written findings required under Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph
shall include a specific explanation of why each finding or rationale stated by
the Council was rejected or determined to be outweighed by other
considerations.
© The written findings required by this Paragraph shall be:
(I) Filed with the clerk of the House of Representatives and the secretary
of the Senate not later than five business days after adoption.
(ii) Transmitted to the chair of the House Committee on Education and
the chair of the Senate Committee on Education not later than five business
Page 20 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
days after adoption.
(iii) Posted on the publicly accessible website of the Louisiana
Department of Education not later than ten business days after adoption.
(4) Scope of this Subsection. Nothing in this Subsection shall be
construed to require the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
to follow a Council recommendation or to limit the Board's final rulemaking
authority under R.S. 17:7. The Council recommendation process required by
this Subsection is a procedural prerequisite to final Board action on the
enumerated decision categories, not a limitation on the Board's substantive
authority. Compliance with this Subsection does not itself constitute compliance
with any other requirement of law applicable to the Board's rulemaking or
decision-making processes.
L. Louisiana Workforce Investment Council; WIOA Non-Duplication;
Formal Coordination Protocol
(1) The Council established under this Section shall be a body separate

and distinct from the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council established
pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3111 and R.S. 23:2042 et seq. The Council is not a
component, subcommittee, advisory body, or subsidiary entity of the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to
nest the Council within, or to subordinate the Council to, the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council, and nothing in this Subpart shall be construed
to alter the authority of the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council under 29
U.S.C. § 3111 or R.S. 23:2042 et seq.
(2) The respective authorities of the Council and the Louisiana

Workforce Investment Council are declared to be non-overlapping as follows:
(a) The Council shall exercise authority exclusively within the domain of
K-12 career and technical education pathway recommendations, the shared
CTE performance framework, industry-based credential tier recommendations,
and such other matters as are expressly assigned to the Council under this
Page 21 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subpart. The Council shall have no authority over WIOA-funded programs,
adult workforce development programs, or any matter within the exclusive
statutory mandate of the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council under 29
U.S.C. § 3111 or R.S. 23:2042 et seq.
(b) The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council shall retain all
authority assigned to it under 29 U.S.C. § 3111 and R.S. 23:2042 et seq.,
including authority over the state's WIOA formula funding, the state workforce
development system, adult education and employment services, and all cross-
agency coordination functions required under federal WIOA law. The
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council shall have no authority to direct,
review, approve, or disapprove recommendations made by the Council
pursuant to this Subpart.
© In any instance where a question arises as to whether a particular
function falls within the domain of the Council or the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council, the question shall be resolved in favor of the body to which
the function is more specifically assigned by statute. If the assignment is
genuinely ambiguous, the matter shall be referred jointly to the House
Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the House
and Senate committees with jurisdiction over workforce development for
legislative resolution.
(3) Formal Coordination Protocol. Notwithstanding Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the Council and the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council shall
engage in formal annual coordination on workforce alignment matters as
follows:
(a) The chair of the Council and the chair of the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council shall meet not fewer than once per year to exchange
information on labor market data, projected workforce demand in priority
industries, and any proposed changes to Jump Start priority industries or
WIOA priority sectors that may affect alignment between the two bodies.
Page 22 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(b) The Council shall transmit to the Louisiana Workforce Investment
Council, not later than sixty calendar days after each annual coordination
meeting, a written summary of Council pathway recommendations and
credential tier recommendations that affect occupations or industry sectors
within the workforce development mandate of the WIOA Board.
© The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council may transmit to the
Council, at any time, written comments on proposed Council recommendations
that relate to occupations or industry sectors within the Board's WIOA
mandate. The Council shall consider such comments in its deliberations but
shall not be required to defer to or adopt them.
(d) Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to require the Council
or the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council to defer to the other body's
decisions, or to grant either body veto authority over the other body's official
actions.
(4) Liaison Coordination. The secretary of the Louisiana Workforce

Commission, who serves as a nonvoting member of the Council under
Subparagraph (B)(1)(e) of this Section, shall serve as the primary coordination
liaison between the Council and the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council
and shall report to the Council not less than annually on WIOA-related
workforce development priorities and data relevant to pathway alignment.
(5) WIOA Performance Accountability Firewall. The shared

performance framework established under Paragraph (I)(2) of this Section
governs exclusively the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program and K-
12 career and technical education programs within the Council's statutory
mandate. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to alter, supersede, or
conflict with the performance accountability system applicable to WIOA-
funded programs administered by the Louisiana Workforce Commission under
29 U.S.C. § 3141 and 20 C.F.R. Part 677.
M. Funding Authorization; Administrative Support
Page 23 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(1) There are hereby authorized to be appropriated from the state

general fund such sums as may be necessary for the Council to carry out its
duties and responsibilities under this Subpart. The Council's funding
authorization shall be a continuing authorization subject to annual legislative
appropriation.
(2) Voting members of the Council shall serve without compensation.
Each voting member shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary and
reasonable travel expenses and per diem incurred in the performance of official
Council duties, at the rates established by law for state officials and employees.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall provide administrative
and staff support to the Council, including staff resources necessary for
maintaining minutes and records, coordinating meeting logistics, operating the
publicly accessible website on which Council documents are posted pursuant to
Subsection H of this Section, and preparing reports as required under this
Subpart. The obligation of the Louisiana Department of Education to provide
administrative support shall not be construed to create any supervisory or
directive authority of the Department over the Council's deliberations, official
positions, or recommendations.
(4) The Council may accept and expend grants, gifts, and other funds
from non-state sources to support its operations, subject to applicable state law
governing receipt of gifts and donations by state entities and the conflict-of-
interest provisions of the Code of Governmental Ethics, R.S. 42:1101 et seq. No
funds from any entity subject to the Council's review or recommendations may
be accepted by the Council.
N. Sunset Review Cycle; Periodic Reauthorization of the Council
(1) The Council shall be subject to legislative sunset review not later than
six years after the effective date of this Subpart and every six years thereafter.
Review shall be conducted in accordance with applicable legislative procedures
for review of executive branch entities.
Page 24 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(2) Not later than one year before the expiration of each six-year review

period, the Council shall prepare and transmit to the House Committee on
Education and the Senate Committee on Education a comprehensive self-
evaluation report addressing:
(a) A complete account of the Council's compliance with all duties and
responsibilities assigned under this Subpart, including a record of all meetings
held, quorum status, and attendance by voting members.
(b) A full accounting of all pathway authorization, reauthorization,
modification, and sunset recommendations made by the Council during the
review period, including the outcome of each recommendation and, for each
recommendation overridden by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education, the Board's written findings and the Council's assessment of
subsequent outcomes.
© An assessment of the effectiveness of the BESE-Council
recommendation process established under Subsection K of this Section;
(d) An assessment of the effectiveness of the non-duplication and
coordination protocol with the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council
established under Subsection L of this Section;
(e) The Council's assessment of the shared performance framework
established under Paragraph (I)(2) of this Section, including agency compliance
with reporting obligations and the adequacy of performance metrics; and
(f) Any recommendations for statutory amendments to update the
Council's composition, authority, operational procedures, or relationship to
other state entities.
(3) Continuation of the Council beyond each six-year review period shall

require affirmative legislative reauthorization. Expiration of the Council's
reauthorization, whether through inaction or legislative action, shall not affect
the validity of any pathway authorization, reauthorization, or credential tier
designation that became final before the effective date of the Council's
Page 25 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
expiration. Upon expiration, the shared performance framework obligations
established under Paragraph (I)(2) of this Section shall transfer to the Louisiana
Department of Education until the legislature provides alternative governance.
§189.4. Industry sector prioritization; priority occupation determination
A. Statewide Priority Industry List; Establishment and Maintenance;
Priority Industry Alignment Process
(1) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council
("the Council"), established pursuant to §183.3 of this Subpart, shall establish,
maintain, and update a Statewide Priority Industry List ("the Priority List")
identifying the industry sectors in Louisiana designated as priority industries
for purposes of K–12 career and technical education pathway development
under this Subpart, industry-based credential tier classification pursuant to
§183.12, and Council composition pursuant to §183.3(B)(1)(a).
(2) The comprehensive process established by this Section for
designating, reviewing, and updating the Priority List and Regional Priority
Industry Lists including the data-driven determination process of Subsection
B, the wage threshold standard of Subsection C, the wage growth rate standard
of Subsection D, the biennial review of Subsection E, and the regional list
process of Subsection F—is hereby formalized as the "Priority Industry
Alignment Process." The Priority Industry Alignment Process shall constitute
the authoritative mechanism through which the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program maintains alignment with regional and statewide workforce
demand.
(3) The initial Priority List shall be established by the Council not later
than one hundred eighty (180) calendar days after the effective date of this
Subpart, following the data-driven process specified in Subsection B of this
Section, and shall be published on the publicly accessible website maintained
pursuant to §183.3(H)(3) of this Subpart.
(4) The Priority List shall include all industry sectors meeting each of the
Page 26 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
following criteria:
(a) The industry sector contains one or more occupations rated four or
five stars in the Louisiana Workforce Commission's ("Louisiana Works") most
current official statewide occupational forecast, as approved by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council and its Occupational Forecasting Conference
("OFC") (or its equivalent successor) pursuant to R.S. 23:76.
(b) The industry sector contains one or more occupations qualifying as
a priority occupation as defined in §183.2(P) of this Subpart.
© The industry sector contains one or more occupations meeting the
viable occupation wage threshold and minimum wage growth rate standards
established in Subsections C and D of this Section.
(5) No K–12 career and technical education pathway shall be authorized
under this Subpart unless the pathway is aligned to an occupation within an
industry sector included on the Priority List or, for regional pathways, the
applicable Regional Priority Industry List established under Subsection F of
this Section. Inclusion of an industry sector on the Priority List shall not
constitute pathway authorization; all pathways must separately satisfy the
requirements of §183.9 of this Subpart.
(6) The Priority List shall be organized by industry sector, with each

listed sector accompanied by: (a) the occupations within the sector qualifying
as priority occupations under §183.2(P); (b) the most recent OFC star rating for
each qualifying occupation; © the entry-level wage data for each qualifying
occupation and its relationship to the wage threshold standard under
Subsection C; and (d) the projected wage growth rate for each qualifying
occupation and its relationship to the wage growth rate standard under
Subsection D. The Council shall update this reference information as part of
each Biennial Priority Review conducted under Subsection E of this Section.
B. Data-Driven Determination Process; Required Data Sources
(1) All Council determinations under this Section—including designation
Page 27 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
of priority industries, setting and updating of wage standards, and conduct of
Biennial Priority Reviews under Subsection E—shall be based on documented
analysis of current, publicly available labor market and wage data from the
sources specified in this Subsection.
(2) The following are required primary data sources for all Priority List
determinations and viable occupation assessments under this Section:
(a) The most current official statewide and regional occupational
employment and wage forecasts published by the Louisiana Workforce
Commission pursuant to R.S. 23:76, and approved by the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council through its Occupational Forecasting Conference, including
all demand forecasts, wage data, and occupational star ratings (or its equivalent
successor) produced by that process.
(b) The official list of industry-based credentials approved by the

Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065, and the
occupational classifications and Standard Occupational Classification (SOC)
codes to which each approved credential is linked.
© Louisiana Workforce Commission occupational employment statistics

and wage data disaggregated by industry sector, occupational group, and
workforce development region.
(d) Louisiana Workforce Commission enhanced wage record data as

defined in §183.2(G) of this Subpart, to the extent available from prior Career
Diploma cohorts, which shall serve as outcome-based validation data for
occupations within which Career Diploma graduates have achieved
employment.
(3) The following are required supplementary data sources, to be used
when primary sources are unavailable, have not yet been updated, or require
supplementation for regional determinations:
(a) United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Occupational Employment
and Wage Statistics (OEWS) program data for Louisiana, where state-level data
Page 28 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
is unavailable or not yet updated for the relevant occupation or industry sector.
(b) United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Employment Projections
program national or regional data, for occupational wage growth rate
validation where Louisiana-specific projections have not yet been issued under
R.S. 23:76;
© Regional labor market data published by the Louisiana Workforce
Commission for each workforce development region of the state, including data
maintained by or in coordination with local workforce development boards
operating pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3122 and R.S. 23:2061 et seq., which shall be
the primary supplementary source for Regional Priority Industry List
determinations under Subsection F.
(d) Documented employer demand data submitted by industry partners
and regional teams pursuant to §183.9 of this Subpart, which may supplement
but shall not substitute for quantitative labor market data from the sources
listed in Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection.
(4) In making Priority List determinations, the Council shall coordinate
with the Louisiana Workforce Commission and the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council in the manner prescribed by §183.3(I)(5) and §183.3(L) of
this Subpart to obtain the most current data available. The Council shall not be
required to await publication of a full Occupational Forecasting Conference
cycle before taking action under this Section, provided the Council documents
the data sources and their effective dates in the written records required under
Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(5) The Council shall maintain a written record of all data sources, data
vintages, and analytical methodologies applied in each Priority List
determination, Biennial Priority Review, and wage standard revision. Such
records shall constitute public records subject to R.S. 44:1 et seq. and shall be
available on the publicly accessible website maintained pursuant to §183.3(H)(3)
of this Subpart.
Page 29 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
C. Wage Threshold Standard for Viable Occupation; Statutory
Minimum
(1) For purposes of this Subpart, the minimum statutory wage threshold
for a viable occupation, as that term is defined in §183.2(U) of this Subpart,
shall be an annualized entry-level wage equivalent to not less than one hundred
percent (100%) of the most recently published statewide median annual wage
for all occupations in Louisiana, as calculated from the official occupational
wage data most recently published by the Louisiana Workforce Commission
pursuant to R.S. 23:76.
(2) For purposes of applying the wage threshold standard under
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the Council shall determine the annualized
entry-level wage of an occupation by reference to the entry wage level for that
occupation as reported in the Louisiana Workforce Commission's official
occupational wage data published pursuant to R.S. 23:76. Where the Louisiana
Workforce Commission's published data does not include a separately reported
entry wage for an occupation, the Council shall use the tenth (10th) percentile
wage for that occupation as reported in the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics Occupational Employment and Wage Statistics program for Louisiana
as the entry-level wage proxy, subject to update at the next OFC publication
cycle.
(3) Upon request by the Council, the Louisiana Workforce Commission
shall provide the Council, not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the
request, the most current statewide median annual wage figure for all
occupations in Louisiana as calculated from the official occupational wage data
most recently published pursuant to R.S. 23:76. The Council shall use the figure
provided by the Louisiana Workforce Commission as the authoritative basis for
all viable occupation wage threshold determinations.
(4) The Council may, by a vote of not fewer than seven of the ten voting
members then serving on the Council, establish a wage threshold standard for
Page 30 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
a specific industry sector that is higher than the statewide minimum established
in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, where the Council finds by documented
analysis that occupations within that sector consistently command entry wages
significantly above the statewide median and that a sector-specific floor above
the minimum is necessary to ensure that pathways within that sector lead to
high-wage outcomes consistent with the standards applied by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065. Any sector-specific
standard established pursuant to this Paragraph shall be documented in writing
and posted publicly pursuant to Subsection B(5) of this Section.
(5) The wage threshold standard under this Subsection is an independent
statutory floor, separate from and not satisfied by, the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council's industry-based credential approval standards under R.S.
23:2065. Both the IBC approval standard under R.S. 23:2065 and the viable
occupation wage threshold must be independently satisfied before a pathway
may be authorized under §183.9.
(6) The Council shall review the wage threshold standard as part of each
Biennial Priority Review conducted pursuant to Subsection E of this Section,
applying the most current statewide median annual wage data published by the
Louisiana Workforce Commission. The Council shall not lower the wage
threshold standard below the statewide median annual wage for all occupations
as determined under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection without prior legislative
authorization.
D. Minimum Wage Growth Rate Standard
(1) For purposes of this Subpart, the minimum projected wage growth
rate standard for a viable occupation, as that term is defined in §183.2(U) of this
Subpart, shall require a projected annual wage growth rate of not less than two
percent (2%) per year over the five-year period immediately following the date
of the Council's occupational assessment. This projected rate shall be derived
from:
Page 31 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) The most current official occupational wage forecast published by the
Louisiana Workforce Commission under R.S. 23:76, where such forecast
includes a five-year projected wage trajectory for the relevant occupation.
(b) Where a Louisiana-specific five-year wage growth projection for the
occupation is not available from the source specified in Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Employment
Projections program national or regional data for the relevant Standard
Occupational Classification (SOC) code, which the Council may use as a
substitute pending the next Occupational Forecasting Conference publication
cycle.
(2) The minimum wage growth rate standard established in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection shall be applied independently of, and shall not be offset
by, an occupation's projected employment growth rate, projected number of job
openings, or composite demand rating under the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council's Occupational Forecasting Conference star rating system.
(3) Where the Council determines that an occupation's wage growth

projection satisfies the standard in Paragraph (1) on the basis of substitute data
under Subparagraph (1)(b) of this Subsection, the Council shall document that
determination in accordance with Subsection B(5) of this Section and shall
review and revalidate the determination at the next available Occupational
Forecasting Conference publication cycle.
(4) The Council shall review and, if necessary, update the minimum wage
growth rate standard as part of each Biennial Priority Review conducted
pursuant to Subsection E of this Section, taking into account updated
projections from the Louisiana Workforce Commission and material changes
in the economic outlook for Louisiana's labor market. Any revision to the wage
growth rate standard shall require a vote of not fewer than seven of the ten
voting members then serving on the Council and shall be documented in
Council minutes and in the Priority Review Report required under Subsection
Page 32 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
E(4) of this Section.
(5) The wage growth rate standard and wage threshold standard under
Subsection C are the minimum standards an occupation must meet to qualify
as a viable occupation under §183.2(U) and as the basis of an authorized
pathway under §183.9. These standards do not limit the Council's authority to
establish more rigorous standards for the designation of a priority occupation
under §183.2(P) of this Subpart.
E. Biennial Industry-Level Priority Review; Distinct from Five-Year
Pathway Cycle
(1) The Council shall conduct a comprehensive review of the Statewide
Priority Industry List established under Subsection A of this Section ("Biennial
Priority Review") not less frequently than once every two years. The first
Biennial Priority Review shall be completed not later than twenty-four (24)
months after the initial Priority List is established pursuant to Subsection A(3)
of this Section. Subsequent Biennial Priority Reviews shall be completed not
later than twenty-four (24) months after the completion of the preceding review.
(2) The Biennial Priority Review is a distinct and independent process
from the five-year pathway reauthorization cycle established in §183.13 of this
Subpart. Neither process satisfies nor substitutes for the other.
(3) Each Biennial Priority Review shall include all of the following:
(a) A reassessment of all industry sectors currently on the Priority List
using updated data from the sources specified in Subsection B of this Section,
to confirm that each listed sector continues to satisfy the criteria established in
Subsection A(4).
(b) An assessment of whether any industry sectors not currently on the
Priority List have come to satisfy the criteria in Subsection A(4) based on
updated data.
© A review of whether the wage threshold standard established in
Subsection C should be revised in light of the most current statewide median
Page 33 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
annual wage data published by the Louisiana Workforce Commission, with
documentation of the current data figure applied.
(d) A review of whether the minimum wage growth rate standard

established in Subsection D should be revised in light of updated occupational
wage growth projections from the Louisiana Workforce Commission or the
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(e) An assessment of the coordination outcomes under §183.3(L) of this
Subpart during the preceding two-year period, including a review of any
changes made by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council to its
occupational star ratings or approved industry-based credential list since the
preceding Biennial Priority Review that may affect Priority List composition.
(f) A review of Regional Priority Industry Lists submitted or updated
under Subsection F of this Section during the preceding two-year period, to
confirm consistency with the Statewide Priority Industry List and the standards
of this Section.
(4) Following each Biennial Priority Review, the Council shall:
(a) Issue a written Priority Review Report summarizing all findings, data
sources, and determinations made under Paragraph (3) of this Subsection,
including any additions to, removals from, or modifications of the Priority List
and any revisions to the wage threshold or growth rate standards.
(b) Post the Priority Review Report on the publicly accessible website
maintained pursuant to §183.3(H)(3) of this Subpart, not later than thirty (30)
calendar days following the Council meeting at which the review was completed.
© Notify in writing the Louisiana Department of Education, the
Louisiana Workforce Commission, each local education agency, and each
regional team of any additions to, removals from, or modifications to the
Priority List, including the effective date of such changes and the data basis for
each change.
(d) Transmit the Priority Review Report to the chair of the House
Page 34 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Committee on Education and the chair of the Senate Committee on Education,
consistent with the Council's annual reporting obligations under §183.3(I)(6) of
this Subpart.
(5) Where the Council's Biennial Priority Review results in the removal
of an industry sector from the Priority List, career and technical education
pathways aligned to occupations within that sector that were authorized before
the removal shall not be automatically deauthorized. Such pathways shall
remain authorized until their next scheduled reauthorization review under
§183.13 of this Subpart, at which time the Council shall evaluate whether
reauthorization is appropriate given the sector's removal from the Priority List.
The Council shall notify affected LEAs and regional teams of the sector's
removal from the Priority List, and the anticipated implications for pathway
reauthorization, promptly following the Biennial Priority Review.
(6) The Biennial Priority Review shall be conducted in coordination with
the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to the formal
coordination protocol established in §183.3(L)(3) of this Subpart. Not fewer
than thirty (30) calendar days before finalizing the Priority Review Report, the
Council shall transmit a draft of the report to the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council and shall consider any timely written comments received
from the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council before issuing the final
report. Nothing herein requires the Council to adopt such comments or delay
finalization beyond the schedule required by this Subsection.
F. Regional Priority Industry Lists
(1) In addition to the Statewide Priority Industry List established under
Subsection A of this Section, each regional team established pursuant to §183.9
of this Subpart shall develop, and the Council shall review and approve, a
Regional Priority Industry List ("Regional List") identifying the priority
industry sectors of the workforce development region served by that regional
team. Regional Lists shall reflect the specific labor market conditions of the
Page 35 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
relevant workforce development region as defined by the Louisiana Workforce
Commission in coordination with local workforce development boards pursuant
to R.S. 23:2061 et seq. and 29 U.S.C. § 3122.
(2) Each Regional List shall be consistent with the Statewide Priority
Industry List and shall comply with all of the following:
(a) Each Regional List shall include all industry sectors on the Statewide
Priority Industry List that have a documented employment base within the
relevant workforce development region, as evidenced by Louisiana Workforce
Commission regional labor market data.
(b) A Regional List may include additional industry sectors not on the
Statewide Priority Industry List if those sectors satisfy all of the following:
(I) The sector contains one or more occupations rated four or five stars
in the Louisiana Workforce Commission's official regional occupational
forecast for the relevant workforce development region, as published pursuant
to R.S. 23:76.
(ii) The sector independently satisfies the viable occupation wage
threshold standard of Subsection C and the minimum wage growth rate
standard of Subsection D, assessed on the basis of regional wage data published
by the Louisiana Workforce Commission for the relevant workforce
development region.
(iii) The regional team submits to the Council documented evidence of
current employer demand within the region for at least one occupation within
that sector, including written statements of support from no fewer than two
employers with operations in the workforce development region.
© The basis for each inclusion on the Regional List, including the data
source and data vintage, shall be documented by the regional team and
submitted to the Council as part of the Regional List proposal required under
Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
(3) Regional Lists shall be developed and approved through the following
Page 36 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
process:
(a) Each regional team shall develop a proposed Regional List in
consultation with the local workforce development board or boards operating
within the relevant workforce development region pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3122,
drawing on the regional labor market data specified in Subsection B(3)© of this
Section. The regional team shall document its consultation with local workforce
development boards in the submission required under Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph.
(b) The regional team shall submit its proposed Regional List to the
Council, accompanied by: (I) all supporting regional labor market data; (ii)
documentation of local workforce development board consultation; and (iii)
where sectors not on the Statewide Priority Industry List are proposed for
regional inclusion, the employer demand documentation required under
Subparagraph (2)(b)(iii) of this Subsection.
© The Council shall review the proposed Regional List applying the
criteria of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and shall approve, approve with
modifications, or return the proposed list to the regional team with written
findings within sixty (60) calendar days of receipt. A Regional List approved
under this Subparagraph shall take effect upon Council approval and shall be
published on the publicly accessible website maintained pursuant to
§183.3(H)(3) of this Subpart.
(4) Regional Lists shall be updated by the regional team within six (6)
months following the Council's completion of each Biennial Priority Review
under Subsection E of this Section. A regional team may propose an interim
update to its Regional List at any time, prior to the conclusion of a Biennial
Priority Review cycle, if documented changes in regional labor market
conditions published by the Louisiana Workforce Commission or reported by
local workforce development boards warrant a revision. Interim updates shall
be submitted to and approved by the Council following the process in
Page 37 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
(5) No regional pathway shall be authorized under this Subpart for an
occupation within an industry sector that is not included on the applicable
Regional Priority Industry List for the workforce development region in which
the pathway would be delivered. Alignment with a Regional List is a necessary
but not sufficient condition for regional pathway authorization; all regional
pathways must separately satisfy the full requirements of §183.9 of this
Subpart.
(6) The Council shall maintain on its publicly accessible website a
current, consolidated reference document presenting the Statewide Priority
Industry List and each approved Regional Priority Industry List in a format
accessible to the public, updated within thirty (30) calendar days of any
modification to either list. The reference document shall also identify, for each
industry sector on each list, the applicable wage data, OFC star rating, and the
date of the most recent Council determination regarding that sector.
§189.5. Louisiana career diploma; equal status
A. Career Diploma.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program a credential to be known as the "Louisiana Career Diploma,"
which shall be issued by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education to any student who successfully completes all requirements of an
approved Louisiana Jump Start career and technical education pathway under
this Subpart, as defined in §183.2(L) of this Subpart.
(2) All provisions of this Subpart shall be administered to support and
accurately measure Career Diploma attainment.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish and maintain, in administrative rules adopted consistent with R.S.
17:7, all requirements for the award of the Louisiana Career Diploma,
consistent with the standards established in this Subpart.
B. Equal Status with Standard Diploma.
Page 38 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(1) A Louisiana Career Diploma issued pursuant to this Subpart shall
be equal in status to a standard diploma for all purposes under Louisiana law.
No state law, rule, policy, or administrative instrument shall treat a Career
Diploma as lesser standing than a standard diploma.
(2) For purposes of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, "all purposes
under Louisiana law" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Employment by state agencies, state departments, political
subdivisions, and other state entities that require a high school diploma or
equivalent as a minimum qualification.
(b) Eligibility for admission to Louisiana public postsecondary
education institutions under the circumstances provided in Subsection C of this
Section.
© Eligibility for state financial aid programs that require a high school
diploma as a qualifying criterion.
(3) BESE shall designate the Career Diploma in a manner that conveys
a full and equal diploma.
C. Postsecondary Non-Restriction.
(1) A Career Diploma issued to a student pursuant to this Subpart shall
not limit a graduate's right to pursue postsecondary education for which the
graduate is otherwise eligible.
(2) All Louisiana public postsecondary institutions shall recognize the
Louisiana Career Diploma as equivalent to a standard diploma.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require any
postsecondary institution to admit a graduate who does not otherwise meet the
institution's published admissions standards.
(4) The Board of Regents shall, not later than one year after the effective
date of this Subpart and annually thereafter, certify to the legislature and to the
Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council established
pursuant to §183.3 that no Louisiana public postsecondary institution under its
Page 39 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
jurisdiction has adopted or maintained a policy inconsistent with Paragraph (2)
of this Subsection. Upon identifying a noncompliant institution, the Board of
Regents shall specify in its certification the institution, the nature of the
noncompliance, and the corrective action taken or planned.
§189.6. K-12 pathway architecture; four-stage developmental framework
A. Four-Stage Framework Established in Statute.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program a four-stage developmental framework for K–12 career and
technical education, to be known as the "Louisiana K–12 CTE Pathway
Framework," which shall constitute the organizing structure for all career
awareness, exploration, concentration, and completion activities within the
Jump Start program. The four stages of the framework are designated as Stage
I (Career Awareness, Grades K–6), Stage II (Career Exploration, Grades 7–8),
Stage III (Career Concentration, Grades 9–10), and Stage IV (Career
Completion, Grades 11–12), as further described in Subsections B through E of
this Section.
(2) The purpose of the four-stage framework is to ensure that student
participation in the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program is the result
of a longitudinal, developmentally appropriate progression beginning in
elementary school. The Louisiana Department of Education shall incorporate
the four-stage framework into all administrative rules, bulletins, and program
guidance governing the Jump Start program.
(3) The four-stage framework established by this Section is a state-
designed structural architecture for the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma
Program. In developing and implementing all stage-level activities and
requirements under this Section, the Louisiana Department of Education shall
ensure that activities and requirements at each stage are designed to support
Louisiana's compliance with all applicable reporting and performance
obligations under the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of
Page 40 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq.
(4) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council
established pursuant to §183.3 of this Subpart shall, in conducting the shared
performance framework review required under §183.3(I)(2), include in its
assessment the extent to which each stage of the framework is being
implemented consistently by local education agencies across the state, and shall
include findings on stage-level implementation in the annual joint performance
report required under §183.3(I)(6).
B. Stage I — Career Awareness (Grades K–6).
(1) Stage I of the four-stage framework shall encompass grades
kindergarten through six and shall be designed to build foundational career
awareness in students through age-appropriate, structured activities that
introduce students to the concept of careers, connect academic learning to
workplace applications, and provide exposure to the range of career clusters
and industry sectors reflected in the Statewide Priority Industry List established
pursuant to §183.4 of this Subpart.
(2) Stage I activities shall be incorporated into the instructional program
for all students in grades kindergarten through six in public schools statewide.
Each local education agency shall ensure that Stage I activities are provided to
all students at each applicable grade level during each school year.
(3) Stage I activities may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Career awareness lessons integrated into core academic subjects.
(b) Guest presentations or virtual career exploration experiences
featuring individuals working in priority industry sectors.
© School-wide career fairs, career field days, or similar structured
career activities.
(d) Age-appropriate exposure to the relationship between educational
choices and career pathways.
(e) Introduction to career interest and aptitude inventory tools adapted
Page 41 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
for elementary grade levels.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop and make
available to each local education agency a Stage I activity resource guide
identifying age-appropriate activities for each grade level, identifying which
activities align with the priority industry sectors designated pursuant to §183.4
of this Subpart, and providing guidance to classroom teachers on integrating
Stage I activities into the core curriculum. The Department shall update the
Stage I activity resource guide not less than every three years.
C. Stage II — Career Exploration (Grades 7–8).
(1) Stage II of the four-stage framework shall encompass grades seven
and eight and shall be designed to deepen student career exploration through
structured activities that connect student career interests to specific career
clusters, identified pathways, and associated educational options. Stage II shall
provide each student with the foundational experience and information
necessary to make an informed pathway selection decision and to develop an
Individual Career and Academic Plan consistent with §183.7 of this Subpart.
(2) Stage II activities shall be incorporated into the instructional and
advisory program for all students in grades seven and eight in public schools
statewide. Each local education agency shall ensure that Stage II activities are
provided to all students at each applicable grade level during each school year.
(3) Stage II shall include, at minimum, all of the following:
(a) Formal career interest and aptitude assessment activities conducted
with each student not later than the end of grade seven and reviewed with each
student not later than the end of grade eight.
(b) Information provided to each student and the student's parent or
legal guardian regarding available Jump Start career and technical education
pathways and the corresponding occupational outcomes, industry-based
credentials, and postsecondary opportunities associated with each pathway.
© Initiation of each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan
Page 42 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
consistent with the requirements of §183.7(A) of this Subpart.
(d) At least one direct career exploration activity per school year in each
of grades seven and eight that provides students with first-hand exposure to
occupations within one or more priority industry sectors, which may include job
shadowing, employer site visits, career mentoring sessions, or equivalent
structured activities.
(4) Stage II activities shall be provided with the involvement of a school
counselor or career coach as provided in §183.8 of this Subpart and shall be
coordinated with the development of each student's Individual Career and
Academic Plan under §183.7 and the student's Individual Graduation Plan
under R.S. 17:2925.
D. Stage III — Career Concentration (Grades 9–10).
(1) Stage III of the four-stage framework shall encompass grades nine
and ten and shall be designed to transition students from career exploration to
focussed career concentration by supporting each student in selecting and
enrolling in an approved Jump Start career and technical education pathway
and beginning the required course sequence for a Career Diploma.
(2) During Stage III, each student who has elected to pursue a Career
Diploma shall:
(a) Select an approved Jump Start career and technical education
pathway that aligns with the student's Individual Career and Academic Plan
developed pursuant to §183.7 of this Subpart.
(b) Enroll in and begin the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
required for Career Diploma completion, as established in §183.10 of this
Subpart.
© With the assistance of a school counselor or career coach, finalize the
student's Individual Graduation Plan under R.S. 17:2925 designating the Jump
Start pathway as the student's chosen program of study.
(d) Participate in at least one work-based learning activity at Level 2 or
Page 43 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
above under the tiered work-based learning quality continuum established in
§183.11 of this Subpart.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the ability of a student who has
not selected a Jump Start pathway in grades nine and ten to elect a Jump Start
pathway in grade eleven or twelve, consistent with the student's ability to
complete all pathway requirements before graduation, subject to local
education agency scheduling and the pathway change procedures established
in §183.7(G) of this Subpart.
E. Stage IV — Career Completion (Grades 11–12).
(1) Stage IV of the four-stage framework shall encompass grades eleven
and twelve and shall be designed to support each Jump Start pathway student
in completing the full requirements for a Career Diploma, including the nine-
credit Jump Start course sequence, the required work-based learning activities,
and the attainment of the required industry-based credential.
(2) During Stage IV, each student pursuing a Career Diploma shall:
(a) Complete the remaining credits of the nine-credit Jump Start course
sequence required for Career Diploma completion under §183.10 of this
Subpart.
(b) Achieve the required work-based learning level under §183.11 of this
Subpart for the student's designated pathway.
© Prepare for and attempt to attain the industry-based credential
required for the student's approved pathway as established pursuant to §183.12
of this Subpart.
(d) Satisfy all remaining academic requirements for graduation as
identified in the student's Individual Graduation Plan under R.S. 17:2925.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education, in coordination with the
Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council, shall develop
and maintain standard Stage IV support resources for local education agencies
to deploy during grades eleven and twelve, including career and credential
Page 44 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
preparation resources, direct employer engagement opportunities, and
postsecondary transition planning activities consistent with the articulation
agreements required by §183.15 of this Subpart.
§189.7. Individual career and academic plans; graduation plans
A. ICAP Requirement; Grade 7 Initiation.
(1) Each student enrolled in a Louisiana public school shall have an
Individual Career and Academic Plan, as defined in §183.2(H) of this Subpart,
initiated not later than the beginning of grade seven. The Individual Career and
Academic Plan shall serve as the primary longitudinal career planning
instrument connecting a student's career exploration activities under Stage II
of the four-stage framework established in §183.6 of this Subpart to the
student's selection of an approved Jump Start career and technical education
pathway.
(2) The Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be initiated with the
active involvement of the student, the student's parent or legal guardian, and
a school counselor or career coach as provided in §183.8 of this Subpart and
consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
(3) Each local education agency shall ensure that a current, accurate
Individual Career and Academic Plan exists for each enrolled student in grades
seven through twelve. A local education agency's failure to maintain Individual
Career and Academic Plans for enrolled students shall be documented in the
annual counselling activity report required under §183.8(F) of this Subpart and
shall be considered by the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council and the Louisiana Department of Education in evaluating the LEA's
compliance with pathway authorization conditions under §183.8(H) of this
Subpart.
B. Annual Review and Update.
(1) Each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be
reviewed and updated annually throughout grades seven through twelve. The
Page 45 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
annual review shall occur in connection with the scheduling of courses for the
following academic year and shall be completed not later than sixty calendar
days before the end of the applicable academic year.
(2) The annual review shall be conducted with the involvement of the
student, the student's parent or legal guardian, and a school counselor or career
coach as provided in Subsection D of this Section. The school counselor or
career coach shall ensure that each annual review addresses all of the following:
(a) Whether the student's identified career interests and pathway goals
remain current or require updating.
(b) Whether the student's course selections for the upcoming academic
year are aligned with the student's pathway goals and graduation requirements.
© Whether the student's ICAP needs to be revised to reflect changes in
the student's academic record, career interests, or available pathways.
(3) The school counselor or career coach shall document each annual
review, the date on which the review occurred, and the date on which the
student's parent or legal guardian was notified of the review, consistent with the
documentation requirements of Subsection D of this Section and the reporting
requirements of §183.8(F).
C. Connection to Approved CTE Pathways.
(1) Each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall identify,
beginning not later than the end of grade eight, one or more approved Jump
Start career and technical education pathways that align with the student's
stated career interests and aptitude assessment results. The identification of
pathways in the ICAP shall not constitute enrollment in a pathway or a binding
commitment to a specific pathway, but shall serve as the basis for pathway
selection and Individual Graduation Plan development under Subsection F of
this Section.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Education shall provide to each local
education agency a current list of approved Jump Start career and technical
Page 46 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
education pathways, including the required course sequence, industry-based
credentials, and occupational outcomes for each pathway, in a format suitable
for use during ICAP development and review activities with students and their
families.
(3) In all ICAP development and review activities, school counselor and
career coaches shall present students with labor market information relevant
to the student's identified career interests, including information regarding the
priority occupations and wage outcomes associated with each pathway being
considered, consistent with the Louisiana Workforce Commission occupational
forecasting data referenced in §183.2(P) and §183.4 of this Subpart.
D. Counselor Involvement; Documentation Requirement.
(1) Each Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be developed,
annually reviewed, and revised with the active involvement of a school
counselor licensed pursuant to Louisiana law or a career coach who meets the
qualification standards established by the Louisiana Department of Education
pursuant to §183.8© of this Subpart.
(2) A school counselor or qualified career coach shall meet individually
with each student in connection with ICAP initiation and each required annual
review. Such individual meetings shall occur in person or virtually and shall
include discussion of the student's career interests, academic progress, pathway
options, and any planned revisions to the ICAP.
(3) A school counselor or qualified career coach shall not delegate the
individual student meeting required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection to
an uncredentialed paraprofessional or to an automated system. Career coaches
who do not hold a school counselor license shall perform only those ICAP-
related functions expressly authorized by this Subpart and by the qualification
standards established under §183.8©.
(4) The school counselor or career coach responsible for each ICAP
development or review meeting shall document: (a) the date of the meeting; (b)
Page 47 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
the school counselor's or career coach's name and credential; © the student
served; (d) the content of the review; and (e) any revisions made to the ICAP.
Such documentation shall be maintained as part of each student's educational
record consistent with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act
(FERPA), 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
E. Parent or Legal Guardian Notification and Approval.
(1) A student's parent or legal guardian shall be notified of and provided
an opportunity to participate in the initiation of the student's Individual Career
and Academic Plan and in each required annual review throughout grades
seven through twelve.
(2) Prior to revising a student's Individual Career and Academic Plan
in a manner that changes the student's identified pathway or postsecondary
goals, the school counselor or career coach shall communicate with the student's
parent or legal guardian, either in person or virtually, to explain the proposed
revisions and any potential impact on the student's graduation requirements
and postsecondary education goals. Any revision that changes the student's
identified pathway or postsecondary goals shall be approved in writing by the
student's parent or legal guardian.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require parental
approval for an annual review that makes no substantive change to the
student's identified pathway or postsecondary goals, provided the parent or
legal guardian received notice of the review and an opportunity to participate.
(4) Each local education agency shall establish a written procedure for
parental notification and approval under this Subsection and shall ensure that
the procedure is communicated to parents and legal guardians of all students
in grades seven through twelve at the beginning of each school year.
F. Coordination with Individual Graduation Plans; R.S. 17:2925.
(1) Each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be aligned
with the student's Individual Graduation Plan required pursuant to R.S.
Page 48 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
17:2925. For a student pursuing a Career Diploma under this Subpart, the
student's Individual Graduation Plan shall identify the approved Jump Start
career and technical education pathway selected by the student, consistent with
§183.2(I) of this Subpart.
(2) The school counselor or career coach responsible for a student's
Individual Graduation Plan development and review under R.S. 17:2925 shall
also be responsible for ensuring that the student's Individual Career and
Academic Plan and Individual Graduation Plan are aligned and mutually
consistent. Any update to a student's Individual Graduation Plan that affects
the student's pathway selection or postsecondary goals shall also be reflected in
a corresponding update to the student's Individual Career and Academic Plan,
subject to the parental approval requirements of Subsection E of this Section.
(3) The Individual Graduation Plan required under R.S. 17:2925 shall
be signed by the student, the student's parent or legal guardian, and the school
counselor or career coach, following each annual review. The school counselor
or career coach involved in a student's ICAP and IGP process shall follow the
procedures established in Subsection G of this Section and in R.S. 17:2925
concurrently when a student changes program of study.
(4) In the event of any conflict between the requirements of this Section
and the requirements of R.S. 17:2925, the requirements of this Section shall
govern with respect to students enrolled in or pursuing an approved Jump Start
career and technical education pathway. Nothing in this Paragraph shall be
construed to limit the obligations of local education agencies and school
counselor under R.S. 17:2925 with respect to students not pursuing a Jump
Start pathway.
G. Student Change of Program of Study; Flexibility; Parent Approval.
(1) A student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be flexible
enough to permit the student to change the student's identified pathway or
career goal during grades seven through twelve, consistent with Subsection E
Page 49 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
of this Section, and any such change shall be reflected in the student's
Individual Graduation Plan under R.S. 17:2925 within sixty calendar days of
the ICAP revision.
(2) A school counselor or career coach shall not deny a student the
opportunity to change a pathway designation in the student's ICAP solely on the
basis that the student has already enrolled in or begun a course sequence
associated with a different pathway, but shall advise the student and the
student's parent or legal guardian of the credit implications and graduation
requirement implications of the proposed change before approving the revision.
(3) A student who changes a pathway designation after beginning the
nine-credit Jump Start course sequence shall not be penalized in the student's
Individual Graduation Plan or ICAP for credits already earned in the prior
pathway, except as necessary to ensure that the student meets the graduation
requirements for the newly selected pathway or program of study.
(4) The local education agency shall maintain a record of each student
pathway change, including: (a) the date of the change; (b) the prior and new
pathway designations; © documentation of parental approval; and (d) the name
of the school counselor or career coach who processed the change. Such records
shall be maintained as part of the student's educational record consistent with
FERPA, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
§189.8. Career counseling and career coaching standards
A. Minimum Counselor-to-Student Ratio; CTE Advising.
(1) Each local education agency shall ensure that school counselor and
career coaches providing career and technical education advising under this
Subpart maintain an advising caseload that allows them to fulfill the Individual
Career and Academic Plan requirements of §183.7 of this Subpart for every
enrolled student in grades seven through twelve.
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall, not
later than one year after the effective date of this Subpart, adopt administrative
Page 50 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
rules establishing:
(a) A maximum caseload ratio for school counselor and career coaches
providing career and technical education advising to students in grades seven
through twelve for purposes of ICAP development and review under §183.7.
(b) A method by which combined caseloads of school counselor and
career coaches at a school may be aggregated to determine compliance with the
maximum ratio.
© A reporting requirement by which each local education agency
annually certifies to the Louisiana Department of Education the school
counselor and career coach staffing levels at each school and whether the
advising caseload ratio for each school complies with the maximum ratio
established under this Subsection.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require any local
education agency to employ a school counselor if the LEA meets the advising
requirements of this Subpart through qualified career coaches consistent with
Subsection C of this Section, provided that career coaches do not perform duties
reserved by law to a licensed school counselor.
B. CTE-Specific Counselor Training Requirements.
(1) Each school counselor assigned career and technical education
advising responsibilities, including ICAP development and review under §183.7
of this Subpart, shall complete CTE-specific training as described in this
Subsection within eighteen months of the effective date of this Subpart, or
within eighteen months of initial assignment to CTE advising responsibilities,
whichever is later.
(2) CTE-specific counselor training shall include, at minimum, all of the
following:
(a) An overview of the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program,
including the four-stage developmental framework established in §183.6, the
pathway authorization and approval process under §183.9 and §183.13, the
Page 51 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
tiered industry-based credential system under §183.12, and the work-based
learning quality standards under §183.11.
(b) Applied training in labor market data interpretation, including how
to use Louisiana Workforce Commission occupational forecasting data and the
priority occupation framework established in §183.4, to support student
pathway selection decision-making.
© Applied training in Individual Career and Academic Plan
development, review, and documentation under §183.7 of this Subpart,
including training on the coordination of ICAPs with Individual Graduation
Plans under R.S. 17:2925.
(d) Training on the postsecondary articulation agreements established
pursuant to §183.15 of this Subpart and on how to communicate postsecondary
credit transfer opportunities to students and families.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop and make
available to all local education agencies and school counselor a training
curriculum meeting the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. The
training curriculum shall be:
(a) Developed in coordination with the Louisiana School Counselor
Association and with postsecondary institutions and workforce development
agencies as appropriate.
(b) Offered at no cost to school counselor employed by local education
agencies.
© Available in online, hybrid, and in-person formats to accommodate
the professional development needs of school counselor across the state.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall annually report to the
Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council on the number
of school counselor who have completed the training required by this
Subsection, disaggregated by local education agency. The Oversight Council
shall include an assessment of counselor training compliance in the annual joint
Page 52 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
performance report required under §183.3(I)(6) of this Subpart.
C. Career Coach Authorization; Use as Alternative or Supplement to
School Counselor.
(1) Each public school governing authority may provide for the
individualized student career planning and advising services required by this
Subpart through the use of school counselor, career coaches, or a combination
of school counselor and career coaches, subject to the limitations and
requirements of this Section.
(2) A career coach authorized pursuant to this Subsection may perform
the following functions under this Subpart:
(a) Develop, review, and revise Individual Career and Academic Plans
with students and their parents or legal guardians pursuant to §183.7 of this
Subpart.
(b) Assist in the development and review of Individual Graduation Plans
under R.S. 17:2925, in coordination with a licensed school counselor to the
extent required by that statute.
© Provide career exploration, career awareness, and pathway advising
services to students in grades seven through twelve.
(d) Participate in the Stage II and Stage III activities established in
§183.6© and §183.6(D) of this Subpart.
(3) A career coach shall not:
(a) Perform any duty that is by law reserved exclusively to a licensed
school counselor, except as expressly authorized by this Subpart.
(b) Provide mental health counselling, crisis counselling, or any other
clinical counselling service.
© Satisfy any statutory or administrative requirement that specifically
mandates a licensed school counselor, without explicit authorization by this
Subpart or other applicable law for a career coach to satisfy that requirement.
(4) To be authorized as a career coach under this Subpart, a person shall
Page 53 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
meet the qualification standards established by the Louisiana Department of
Education pursuant to Paragraph (5) of this Subsection. A public school
governing authority shall not authorize any person as a career coach for
purposes of this Subpart unless the person has been determined to meet the
qualification standards established under Paragraph (5) of this Subsection or
has been contracted from a vendor on the Approved Career Coaching Vendor
List maintained pursuant to Subsection D of this Section.
(5) The Louisiana Department of Education shall establish and maintain
qualification standards for career coaches authorized under this Subpart. Such
standards shall require, at minimum, that a career coach demonstrate:
(a) Knowledge of Louisiana's Jump Start career and technical education
pathway system, including the pathway authorization process, the four-stage
framework established in §183.6, the tiered industry-based credential system
under §183.12, and the labor market data systems used for pathway
development under §183.4.
(b) Experience in career advising, workforce development, human
resources, or a directly related professional field.
© Completion of the career-coach-specific training developed by the
Louisiana Department of Education pursuant to this Subsection before the
career coach begins providing career advising services under this Subpart.
(d) Such other qualifications as the Department determines are
necessary to ensure that career coaches can provide high-quality, accurate
career and pathway advising to students and their families.
(6) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a local
education agency from employing or contracting with career coaches in
addition to meeting all school counselor staffing and caseload requirements, or
to create a right in any individual to be authorized or employed as a career
coach.
D. State Department of Education; Approved Career Coaching Vendor
Page 54 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
List.
(1) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish and maintain
on its publicly accessible website a list of approved career coaching vendors
from which public school governing authorities may select career coaches for
purposes of this Subpart. The list shall be designated as the "Approved Career
Coaching Vendor List."
(2) To be placed on the Approved Career Coaching Vendor List, a
vendor shall demonstrate to the Louisiana Department of Education that:
(a) The vendor's career coaches meet the qualification standards
established pursuant to Subsection C(5) of this Section.
(b) The vendor has in place a documented quality assurance process for
supervising career coaches and ensuring consistent, accurate delivery of career
advising services.
© The vendor agrees to comply with all applicable state and federal
privacy laws governing student educational records, including FERPA, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g, and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
(d) The vendor agrees to provide documentation of each career coach's
credentials to the contracting local education agency upon request.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall review the Approved
Career Coaching Vendor List at least annually and shall remove any vendor
that no longer satisfies the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection or
that has demonstrated a pattern of noncompliance with the quality or legal
standards required under this Subpart.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish the initial
Approved Career Coaching Vendor List required by this Subsection not later
than January 1, 2027.
(5) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to limit a public school
governing authority's use of school counselor or its ability to directly employ
career coaches who meet the qualification standards established under
Page 55 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subsection C(5) of this Section without use of a contracted vendor.
E. Regional Consortia for Career Coach Contracting.
(1) Two or more public school governing authorities may form a
regional consortium for the purpose of jointly contracting with career coaches
or career coaching vendors, sharing career coach personnel, or coordinating the
delivery of career coaching services across multiple local education agency
jurisdictions. A regional consortium formed pursuant to this Subsection may
operate through an intergovernmental agreement consistent with R.S. 33:1324
or such other legal mechanism as applicable law permits.
(2) A regional consortium formed pursuant to this Subsection shall
ensure that each participating local education agency satisfies the ICAP
development and review requirements of §183.7 of this Subpart for all enrolled
students in grades seven through twelve within that LEA's schools,
notwithstanding the consortium structure.
(3) A regional consortium formed pursuant to this Subsection may take
advantage of group purchasing, regional contracting, and other economies of
scale to reduce the cost of career coaching services for participating local
education agencies, consistent with applicable state procurement law.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop and make
available to local education agencies model intergovernmental agreement
language for regional consortia formed under this Subsection, not later than one
year after the effective date of this Subpart.
F. Reporting Requirements; Counselling Activity Documentation.
(1) Each local education agency shall submit to the Louisiana
Department of Education an annual counselling activity report documenting the
following information for the prior academic year:
(a) The number of school counselor and career coaches employed or
contracted by the LEA who provided career and technical education advising
services under this Subpart, disaggregated by school.
Page 56 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(b) The number of students in grades seven through twelve who received
an ICAP initiation, review, or update meeting with a school counselor or career
coach, disaggregated by school and grade level.
© Whether the advising caseload ratio at each school within the LEA
complied with the maximum ratio established by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education under Subsection A(2) of this Section during the prior
academic year.
(d) The number of school counselor employed by the LEA who
completed the CTE-specific training required under Subsection B of this
Section, disaggregated by school.
(e) Any schools within the LEA at which the ICAP maintenance
obligation of §183.7(A)(3) was not fully met, including the number of students
without a current ICAP at each such school and the LEA's remediation plan.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish on its publicly
accessible website, not later than December 1 of each year, a summary of the
annual counselling activity reports submitted by all local education agencies
under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection for the prior academic year. The
summary shall be disaggregated by local education agency and shall identify
any LEA that the Department determines to be materially out of compliance
with the ICAP or counselling requirements of this Subpart.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall also annually publish
on its website a list of public school governing authorities that did not spend
more than ninety-five percent of the career development fund dollars
appropriated for the previous state fiscal year, to support public transparency
in the deployment of career development resources at the local level.
G. Pupil Progression Plan; Career Coaching Description.
(1) Each public school governing authority shall include in its pupil
progression plan, developed pursuant to R.S. 17:24.4, a description of the
governing authority's plan to provide career coaching and career advising
Page 57 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
services to each student in grades seven through twelve, consistent with the
requirements of this Subpart and §183.7 of this Subpart.
(2) The career coaching description required under Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection shall address, at minimum:
(a) The roles and qualifications of school counselor and career coaches
who will provide ICAP development and review services to enrolled students.
(b) The schedule and process for annual ICAP reviews consistent with
the requirements of §183.7(B) of this Subpart.
© Whether the governing authority intends to use a career coaching
vendor from the Approved Career Coaching Vendor List maintained under
Subsection D of this Section, and if so, the name of the vendor.
(d) Whether the governing authority participates in a regional
consortium under Subsection E of this Section.
(e) The governing authority's plan for achieving and maintaining
compliance with the caseload ratio requirements of Subsection A of this Section.
(3) The career coaching description required by this Section shall be
updated annually as part of the pupil progression plan review process and shall
be made publicly available on the governing authority's website.
H. Condition of Pathway Authorization.
(1) Compliance with the career counselling and career coaching
standards established by this Section, and with the Individual Career and
Academic Plan requirements of §183.7 of this Subpart, is hereby declared a
condition of pathway authorization for each local education agency that
operates or participates in an approved Jump Start career and technical
education pathway under this Subpart.
(2) In evaluating any application for pathway authorization or
reauthorization pursuant to §183.13 of this Subpart, the Louisiana Career and
Technical Education Oversight Council shall consider whether the applying
local education agency has demonstrated, through the most recent annual
Page 58 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
counselling activity report required under Subsection F of this Section, that the
LEA is maintaining the ICAP and counselling standards required by this
Section and §183.7 of this Subpart.
(3) If the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council
finds that a local education agency operating an authorized pathway is
materially and persistently out of compliance with the requirements of this
Section or §183.7, the Council shall include that finding in its written
recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
regarding the next pathway authorization, modification, or reauthorization
decision for that LEA, and shall recommend conditions, corrective action
requirements, or other measures as appropriate.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the automatic
revocation or suspension of a pathway authorization based solely on a finding
of counselling or coaching noncompliance. The appropriate remedial response
shall be determined by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
on the basis of the Council's written recommendation and findings, taking into
account the nature, severity, and duration of the noncompliance and the
potential impact on enrolled students.
§189.9. Career and technical education pathway structure; designation;
regional teams
A. Pathway framework established.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program "Louisiana K–12 CTE Pathway Authorization Framework,"
through which career and technical education pathways shall be proposed,
designated, reviewed, and reauthorized for delivery in Louisiana public schools.
All K–12 CTE pathways Career Diploma completion shall operate within the
Framework.
(2) All K–12 CTE pathways authorized under this Subpart shall be
designated as either statewide pathways or regional pathways, as defined in
Page 59 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
§183.2(T) and §183.2(Q) of this Subpart, and shall satisfy the minimum
pathway components established in Subsection E of this Section and the
authorization criteria established in §183.13 of this Subpart.
(3) No local education agency shall offer or deliver a career and
technical education pathway as a Jump Start pathway for purposes of Career
Diploma completion unless that pathway has been authorized by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education following the process
established in §183.13 of this Subpart and upon a written recommendation by
the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council.
(4) The Louisiana K–12 CTE Pathway Authorization Framework shall
be administered by the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council, in coordination with the Louisiana Department of Education and the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, consistent with the
jurisdictional boundaries established in §183.3(K) of this Subpart.
B. Statewide Pathways; Requirements.
(1) A statewide pathway, as defined in §183.2(T) of this Subpart,
shall be available for delivery by any local education agency in Louisiana that
satisfies the conditions of pathway authorization established in §183.13© of this
Subpart for that pathway.
(2) To be eligible for designation as a statewide pathway, a proposed
pathway shall:
(a) Be aligned to one or more occupations within an industry sector
included on the Statewide Priority Industry List established pursuant to
§183.4(A) of this Subpart.
(b) Be anchored to one or more industry-based credentials approved
by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065
or designated by the Council pursuant to §183.12 of this Subpart.
© Include a structured nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
meeting the requirements of §183.10© of this Subpart.
Page 60 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) Incorporate a work-based learning component meeting the
minimum tier and quality standards established in §183.11(B) of this
Subpart.(e) Demonstrate alignment with documented statewide employer
demand for the occupations served by the pathway, using the data sources
specified in §183.4(B) of this Subpart.
(f) Satisfy all required pathway components established in
Subsection E of this Section.
(3) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council shall maintain and publish, on the publicly accessible website
maintained pursuant to §183.3(H)(3) of this Subpart, a current list of all
authorized statewide pathways, including the industry sector, required
credentials, and occupational outcomes associated with each pathway,
updated within thirty calendar days of any authorization, modification, or
deauthorization.
C. Regional pathways; requirements.
(1) A regional pathway, as defined in §183.2(Q) of this Subpart, shall
be developed by a regional team as described in Subsection F of this Section
and shall be available for delivery only within the workforce development
region or regions for which the pathway has been authorized by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(2) To be eligible for designation as a regional pathway, a proposed
pathway shall:
(a) Be aligned to one or more occupations within an industry sector
included on the applicable Regional Priority Industry List established
pursuant to §183.4(F) of this Subpart.
(b) Be anchored to one or more industry-based credentials approved
by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065
or designated by the Council pursuant to §183.12 of this Subpart.
© Include a structured nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
Page 61 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
meeting the requirements of §183.10© of this Subpart.
(d) Incorporate a work-based learning component meeting the
minimum tier and quality standards established in §183.11(B) of this
Subpart.
(e) Demonstrate alignment with documented regional employer
demand for the occupations served by the pathway, as evidenced by: (I) data
from the Louisiana Workforce Commission's regional occupational
employment and wage forecasts published pursuant to R.S. 23:76; and (ii)
written statements of support from not fewer than two employers with
operations within the applicable workforce development region.
(f) Satisfy all required pathway components established in
Subsection E of this Section
(3) A regional pathway shall adhere to the same academic credit
requirements as statewide pathways, consistent with §183.10(B) of this
Subpart and the postsecondary non-restriction provisions of §183.5© of this
Subpart.
(4) The Council shall not authorize a regional pathway for an
occupation within an industry sector that is not included on the applicable
Regional Priority Industry List for the workforce development region in
which the pathway would be delivered, consistent with §183.4(F)(5) of this
Subpart.
D. Pathway tiers; designation criteria.
(1) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council shall establish and maintain a tiered designation system for
authorized pathways, assigning each pathway to one of three tiers based on
industry alignment, credential value, and postsecondary and workforce
outcomes.
(2) The pathway tier designations shall be as follows:
(a) Tier 1 pathways (Provisional Designation) pathways aligned to
Page 62 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
viable occupations, as defined in §183.2(U) of this Subpart, that satisfy the
minimum authorization requirements of §183.13(B) of this Subpart. A local
education agency or regional team seeking reauthorization of a pathway
that remains at Tier 1 designation shall include in its reauthorization
proposal under §183.13 of this Subpart a written Tier 2 Advancement Plan
specifying:
(I) The credential tier upgrade, employer partnership development,
or other pathway enhancements required to achieve Tier 2 designation.
(ii) Measurable interim milestones for those enhancements.
(iii) A target date for achieving Tier 2 designation not later than the
midpoint of the next five-year authorization cycle. The Council shall assess
the adequacy of any Tier 2 Advancement Plan in its written reauthorization
recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(b) Tier 2 pathways are pathways aligned to priority occupations, as
defined in §183.2(P) of this Subpart, that:
(I) Are anchored to one or more Tier 2 industry-based credentials as
established in §183.12(B) of this Subpart.
(ii) Include a documented postsecondary articulation agreement
meeting the requirements of §183.15 of this Subpart.
© Tier 3 pathways are pathways that, in addition to meeting all
requirements for Tier 2 designation, are:
(I) Anchored to one or more Tier 3 industry-based credentials as
established in §183.12(B) of this Subpart.
(ii) Include a TOPS Tech Early Start provider arrangement as
required by §183.16(A) of this Subpart.
(iii) Demonstrate, based on the most recent Act 187 return on
investment data required under §183.20 of this Subpart, that a majority of
pathway completers are employed in the relevant occupation within twelve
Page 63 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
months of graduation at wages meeting or exceeding the priority occupation
wage standard. (3) The Council shall assign each authorized pathway
a tier designation at the time of initial authorization and shall reassess tier
designation at each reauthorization under §183.13 of this Subpart and at
any time when changes in credential tier status under §183.12 occur that
affect the pathway's tier eligibility.
(4) The tier designation of each authorized pathway shall be
published on the publicly accessible website maintained by the Council
pursuant to §183.3(H)(3) of this Subpart and shall be updated within thirty
calendar days of any change in tier designation. Pathway tier designation
shall be used in accountability system calculations as provided in §183.5(D)
of this Subpart and in the public reporting required under §183.19 of this
Subpart, and shall inform the Council's recommendations regarding
pathway authorization, reauthorization, and modification under §183.13.
E. Required pathway components; minimum statutory elements.
(1) Each K–12 CTE pathway authorized under this Subpart,
whether statewide or regional, shall at a minimum include all of the
following components:
(a) A structured, sequential course of study organized around a
defined career field within a recognized career cluster, consisting of not
fewer than nine credits as required by §183.10© of this Subpart, designed
to provide students with both the technical competencies and academic
foundations necessary for career readiness and postsecondary success.
(b) A work-based learning component meeting the minimum tier
and quality standards established in §183.11 of this Subpart.
© One or more industry-based credentials approved or designated
pursuant to §183.12 of this Subpart that are aligned to the occupational
outcomes of the pathway.
(d) A documented connection to one or more priority occupations,
Page 64 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
as defined in §183.2(P) of this Subpart, in an industry sector on the
Statewide Priority Industry List or applicable Regional Priority Industry
List, consistent with the requirements of §183.4 of this Subpart; provided
that, for pathways seeking initial authorization under a provisional Tier 1
designation pursuant to §183.9(D)(2)(a) of this Subpart, a documented
connection to one or more viable occupations, as defined in §183.2(U) of this
Subpart, within such a sector shall satisfy this requirement for the initial
authorization period only, subject to the Tier 2 Advancement Plan
obligation applicable at reauthorization.
(e) An articulation agreement with at least one Louisiana public
postsecondary institution, with priority given to technical and community
colleges, specifying the credit transfer terms applicable to students who
complete the pathway, consistent with the requirements of §183.15 of this
Subpart.
(f) A career counselling and career coaching plan satisfying the
requirements of §183.8 of this Subpart, as incorporated into the local
education agency's pupil progression plan pursuant to §183.8(G) of this
Subpart.
(2) No pathway shall be authorized or reauthorized unless all
components in Paragraph (1) are documented in the pathway authorization
proposal under §183.13(A) of this Subpart and are maintained throughout
the pathway's authorization period per §183.13© of this Subpart.
(3) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council shall, by rule adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., establish additional minimum standards for each
required pathway component where necessary to ensure consistent pathway
quality across the state. Any such additional standards shall not be less
rigorous than the standards established by this Section and by §§183.10
through 183.15 of this Subpart.
Page 65 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
F. Regional team structure; composition; responsibilities.
(1) Each workforce development region of Louisiana, as defined by
the Louisiana Workforce Commission in coordination with local workforce
development boards pursuant to R.S. 23:2061 et seq. and 29 U.S.C. § 3122,
shall have a regional team responsible for regional pathway development
and oversight as provided in this Subsection.
(2) Each regional team shall be composed of, at minimum, all of the
following members:
(a) Representatives of not fewer than two local education agencies
operating within the workforce development region.
(b) A representative from not fewer than one Louisiana public
postsecondary institution, with priority consideration given to technical
colleges and community colleges operating within or adjacent to the
workforce development region.
© Not fewer than three representatives from business, industry, or
workforce development entities operating within the workforce development
region, of which at least two shall be representatives of businesses in priority
industry sectors designated pursuant to §183.4 of this Subpart for the
region.
(d) A representative from the local workforce development board or
boards operating within the workforce development region pursuant to R.S.
23:2061 et seq. and 29 U.S.C. § 3122.
(3) Each regional team shall:
(a) Develop and submit to the Council a proposed Regional Priority
Industry List for the workforce development region, and update that list as
required by §183.4(F)(4) of this Subpart.
(b) Identify regional workforce development needs and propose
regional pathways for authorization under §183.13 of this Subpart that are
aligned to the region's documented labor market demand.
Page 66 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
© Coordinate with local education agencies within the region to
support the development, delivery, and continuous improvement of
authorized regional pathways.
(d) Recruit and establish documented employer partnerships for
work-based learning placements consistent with §183.11© of this Subpart.
(e) Submit to the Council any employer demand documentation
required for regional pathway authorization or reauthorization under
§183.13 of this Subpart and §183.4(F)(2)(b)(iii) of this Subpart.
(f) Participate in mid-cycle pathway reviews triggered under
§183.13(E) of this Subpart for regional pathways within the team's
jurisdiction.
(g) Prepare and submit to the Council an annual regional CTE
update report documenting regional pathway enrollment, completion, and
employment outcomes for the prior academic year, consistent with the data
elements required by §183.19 of this Subpart.
(4) The Council shall establish, by rule adopted pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., operational and
governance standards for regional teams, including procedures for: (a) the
selection and rotation of regional team members; (b) regional team decision-
making and reporting obligations; © regional team pathway proposal
submission; and (d) Council feedback to and coordination with regional
teams.
(5) The Louisiana Department of Education shall provide
operational support and technical assistance to regional teams, including
access to statewide labor market data, pathway curriculum resources, and
professional development opportunities for regional team members, not less
than once per year.
G. Partnering Authority; cross-district enrollment; program sharing.
(1) A local education agency that does not have sufficient capacity to
Page 67 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
independently deliver an authorized career and technical education pathway
may fulfill its pathway delivery obligations through one or more of the
following partnering arrangements:
(a) A formal partnership with one or more other local education
agencies to jointly deliver a pathway, as authorized by applicable Louisiana
law governing cooperative endeavors and intergovernmental agreements,
including R.S. 33:1324.
(b) A partnership with a Louisiana vocational or technical institution,
consistent with §183.17 of this Subpart.
© Participation in a regional team pathway arrangement under
which the pathway is delivered on a collaborative basis across multiple local
education agencies within the workforce development region.
(2) Any partnering arrangement under this Subsection shall be
memorialized in a written agreement that:
(a) Identifies each participating local education agency and any
other institutional partner.
(b) Specifies the responsibilities of each partner for curriculum
delivery, work-based learning coordination, instructor staffing,
credentialing support, and student advising.
© Addresses the process for cross-district student enrollment,
including any transportation arrangements necessary to enable students to
access the pathway at a delivery site outside their home district.
(d) Is submitted to and approved by the Council as part of any
pathway authorization or reauthorization proposal under §183.13 of this
Subpart when the partnership is a material component of the pathway's
delivery model.
(3) No student enrolled in a Louisiana public school shall be assessed
a fee for participation in a career and technical education pathway offered
through a partnering arrangement under this Subsection. All pathway-
Page 68 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
related costs incurred by a local education agency in connection with a
partnering arrangement shall be funded through career development funds,
available state and federal CTE funds, or other lawfully available
appropriations, consistent with §183.17(D) of this Subpart.
(4) A local education agency that participates in a partnering
arrangement under this Subsection remains responsible for ensuring that
enrolled students receive the ICAP development and review services
required under §183.7 and §183.8 of this Subpart, regardless of the site at
which pathway instruction is delivered.
§189.10. Career major program; curriculum graduation requirement
A. Career Major Program; General Requirements.
(1) Each authorized K–12 CTE pathway under this Subpart shall
include a Career Major Program that constitutes the core academic and
technical coursework sequence through which a student pursues a Louisiana
Career Diploma as established in Subsection B of this Section and the nine-
credit Jump Start CTE course sequence established in Subsection C of this
Section.
(2) A Career Major Program shall be developed in alignment with
the career cluster and occupational focus of the authorized pathway and
shall reflect the competency standards recognized by the applicable
industry-based credential or credentials required for pathway completion
under §183.12 of this Subpart.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall, in coordination
with the Council, develop and maintain Career Major Program frameworks
for each authorized statewide pathway. For regional pathways, the regional
team shall develop a Career Major Program proposal as part of the
pathway authorization submission under §183.13(A) of this Subpart, subject
to Council review and approval.
(4) Each Career Major Program framework shall identify: (a) the
Page 69 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
required academic core courses and credit hours; (b) the required CTE
course sequence and credit hours; © the assessment requirements under
Subsection D of this Section; (d) the required industry-based credential or
credentials; (e) the work-based learning requirements applicable to the
pathway; and (f) any dual enrollment or early postsecondary access
opportunities available within the pathway under Subsection G of this
Section.
B. Academic Core Credit Requirements.
(1) Students pursuing a Career Diploma through an authorized
K–12 CTE pathway shall satisfy the academic core credit requirements
established by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
pursuant to R.S. 17:7 and this Subpart. Academic core credit requirements
for Career Diploma students shall be substantively equivalent in rigor and
content coverage to those required for a standard diploma.
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
not adopt or maintain academic core credit requirements for Career
Diploma students that, taken as a whole, are less rigorous than the
requirements for a standard diploma. Nothing in this Subsection shall
preclude the Board from establishing differentiated elective course options
for students pursuing a Career Diploma that replace non-required elective
courses in the standard diploma track, provided that the differentiated
options are aligned to the student's career pathway and are approved by the
Council.
(3) Academic core credits earned through approved dual enrollment
courses pursuant to Subsection G of this Section shall count toward the
academic core credit requirements of this Subsection, consistent with R.S.
17:2930 and the dual enrollment coordination provisions of §183.21(I) of this
Subpart.
C. CTE Course Sequence; Jump Start Credits (Nine Credits).
Page 70 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(1) To earn a Career Diploma, a student shall complete a structured
CTE course sequence within an authorized K–12 CTE pathway, consisting
of not fewer than nine credits (hereinafter "the nine-credit Jump Start
sequence"). The nine-credit Jump Start sequence shall be composed of
courses that are:
(a) Organized sequentially to build progressively on technical
knowledge and skills from introductory through advanced levels of
pathway-specific competency.
(b) Aligned to the competency standards required for the industry-
based credential or credentials associated with the pathway.
© Delivered by instructors who meet the qualification standards
established under §183.18(B) of this Subpart.
(d) Approved as part of the Career Major Program framework for
the pathway pursuant to Subsection A of this Section.
(2) Of the nine required Jump Start credits, not fewer than two
credits shall be earned through courses that include a work-based learning
component at or above Level 3 of the tiered quality continuum established
in §183.11(A) of this Subpart.
(3) Credit earned through dual enrollment in a postsecondary course
aligned to the pathway may count toward the nine-credit Jump Start
sequence, subject to Council approval as part of the Career Major Program
framework and consistent with the dual enrollment provisions of Subsection
G of this Section and R.S. 17:2930.
(4) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, on the
written recommendation of the Council, may establish pathway-specific
modifications to the nine-credit Jump Start sequence structure for pathways
in specialized technical sectors, provided that any such modification
maintains a minimum of nine credits and does not reduce the work-based
learning integration requirement of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
Page 71 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
D. Assessment Requirements.
(1) Each student pursuing a Career Diploma shall, during the course
of the nine-credit Jump Start sequence, complete all assessments required
as a condition of the industry-based credential or credentials associated with
the student's authorized pathway.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Education shall ensure that Career
Diploma students are provided access to the assessments required under
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, including access to assessment preparation
resources and, where applicable, assessment fee waivers or assistance for
students demonstrating financial need.
(3) Industry-based credential assessment results shall be reported as
part of the annual public Jump Start data report required under §183.19(A)
of this Subpart, disaggregated by pathway, local education agency, and the
equity categories specified in §183.19© of this Subpart.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the authority of the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to require additional state-
administered assessments for students enrolled in career and technical
education coursework, provided that no additional assessment requirement
shall serve as a basis for denying a student a Career Diploma if the student
has met all pathway requirements established under this Section.
E. Career Major Program Admission Criteria.
(1) Each local education agency operating an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway shall ensure that the Career Major Program associated with the
pathway is accessible to all students who have satisfied the Stage III
requirements of §183.6(D) of this Subpart and who have selected the
pathway through the Individual Career and Academic Plan process under
§183.7 of this Subpart.
(2) No local education agency shall establish admission criteria for
a Career Major Program that are based on prior academic performance,
Page 72 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
grade point average, or standardized test scores, unless the Council
determines, upon documented evidence, that such criteria are necessary for
a specific pathway due to technical prerequisite knowledge required by the
industry-based credential assessment or by applicable occupational licensing
requirements. Any such performance-based admission criteria shall be
included in the pathway authorization proposal submitted under §183.13(A)
of this Subpart and are subject to Council approval.
(3) A local education agency may establish application and
enrollment management procedures for a Career Major Program where the
number of students seeking enrollment exceeds program capacity. Such
procedures shall: (a) be documented in writing and made publicly available;
(b) not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, disability, English learner
status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable state or federal
law; and © include a waitlist process that ensures students unable to enroll
in their first-choice pathway receive counselling and alternative pathway
options consistent with §183.8 of this Subpart.
(4) Students with disabilities shall have access to Career Major
Programs consistent with their Individualized Education Programs under
§183.2(J) of this Subpart, applicable federal and state special education law,
and the alternative graduation pathway provisions of Subsection H of this
Section.
F. Local Board Curriculum Submission and Approval.
(1) Each local education agency that operates or proposes to operate
an authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall submit the Career Major Program
curriculum for the pathway, including the nine-credit Jump Start course
sequence, to the Louisiana Department of Education for review and
approval as part of the pathway authorization process under §183.13(A) of
this Subpart. The Department shall review submitted curricula for
alignment with the Career Major Program framework for the pathway and
Page 73 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
with the competency standards required by the applicable industry-based
credential.
(2) A local education agency shall not deliver a Career Major
Program curriculum that has not been approved pursuant to Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection. Any material modification to an approved Career Major
Program curriculum shall require resubmission to the Louisiana
Department of Education for review and approval before implementation.
A modification is material if it changes: (a) one or more courses in the nine-
credit Jump Start sequence; (b) the required industry-based credential or
credential tier; or © the structure of the work-based learning component.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall review and act on
each curriculum submission not later than sixty calendar days after receipt
of a complete submission. If the department does not act within sixty
calendar days, the submission shall be deemed approved, subject to Council
notification. The department shall notify the Council of each approved
curriculum and of any curriculum submission that raises concerns
regarding alignment with the Career Major Program framework or Council
standards.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish on its
publicly accessible website, updated not less than annually, a list of
approved Career Major Program curricula for each authorized statewide
pathway, organized by pathway and local education agency, available to
students, families, and the public for the purpose of comparing program
offerings across local education agencies.
(5) Each local education agency shall annually communicate to the
parent or legal guardian of each student enrolled in or considering
enrollment in an authorized Jump Start pathway a written description of
the curriculum requirements of that pathway, including the required course
sequence, work-based learning requirements, and associated industry-based
Page 74 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
credentials. This communication shall be incorporated into the parental
notification obligations of §183.7(E)(4) of this Subpart and shall occur not
later than thirty calendar days before the course selection period for the
upcoming academic year.
G. Dual Enrollment; Early Postsecondary Access.
(1) Students enrolled in an authorized K–12 CTE pathway are
encouraged to pursue dual enrollment opportunities in postsecondary
courses aligned to their pathway, consistent with R.S. 17:2930 and the
postsecondary articulation agreements required under §183.15 of this
Subpart.
(2) Each Career Major Program framework developed pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section shall identify, where available, approved dual
enrollment courses that: (a) are aligned to the competency standards of the
pathway; (b) count toward the nine-credit Jump Start sequence under
Subsection C(3) of this Section; and © are offered through a Louisiana
public postsecondary institution that has executed an articulation agreement
with the applicable local education agency or regional team pursuant to
§183.15 of this Subpart.
(3) No student enrolled in a Louisiana public school shall be charged
tuition or fees for dual enrollment in a postsecondary course approved as
part of a Career Major Program framework under this Section, to the
extent permitted by applicable state law governing career development
funds and dual enrollment programs.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall, in coordination
with the Board of Regents, annually report to the Council on dual
enrollment participation rates disaggregated by pathway, local education
agency, and the equity categories required under §183.19© of this Subpart.
H. Students with Exceptionalities; Alternative Graduation Pathway.
(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to preclude a student
Page 75 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
with an exceptionality, as defined in R.S. 17:1942, from accessing, enrolling
in, or receiving a Career Diploma through an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway. Each local education agency shall ensure that the Career Major
Program requirements of this Section are implemented in a manner
consistent with each eligible student's Individualized Education Program
under §183.2(J) of this Subpart, applicable provisions of the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1401 et seq., and Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794.
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish, in coordination with the Council, an alternative graduation
pathway option for students with exceptionalities who are pursuing a Career
Diploma, which may permit modifications to individual course requirements
within the nine-credit Jump Start sequence where required by a student's
IEP, provided that:
(a) The modifications do not reduce the total credit requirement
below nine credits or eliminate the work-based learning integration
requirement of Subsection C(2) of this Section, unless the student's IEP
specifically identifies a different credit or work-based learning structure
that is appropriate to the student's educational needs.
(b) The modifications are documented in the student's IEP and
approved by the student's IEP team.
© The pathway retains sufficient alignment to the occupational
competency standards of the associated industry-based credential to provide
the student with a meaningful career preparation experience.
(3) A student with an exceptionality who completes an alternative
graduation pathway under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection shall receive a
Career Diploma to the extent the student satisfies all requirements of the
alternative pathway as documented in the student's IEP. The Career
Diploma issued to such a student shall carry the same equal status provided
Page 76 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
under §183.5(B) of this Subpart.
(4) Promotion and graduation determinations for students pursuing
a Career Diploma through an alternative graduation pathway under this
Subsection shall be governed by the student's IEP, applicable state special
education law under R.S. 17:1942 et seq., applicable federal law under
IDEA, and the alternative pathway requirements established under
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. Standard promotion benchmarks and
graduation requirements applicable to students not on an alternative
graduation pathway shall not be applied to such a student in a manner
inconsistent with the student's IEP.
§189.11. Works based learning; quality standards and tiered requirements
A. Work-based learning quality continuum; five-level tiered
framework.
(1) There is hereby established the "Louisiana Jump Start Work-
Based Learning Quality Continuum." The Continuum shall consist of four
levels organized from least to most intensive as set forth in Paragraphs (2)
through (5). All work-based learning activities for Jump Start pathway
purposes shall be classified at one of the four Continuum levels.
(2) Level 1 Career Awareness Activities. Level 1 of the Continuum
includes structured career awareness experiences that introduce students to
occupational roles and workplace environments without a direct employer-
supervised placement component. Level 1 activities include, but are not
limited to: (a) employer-in-classroom presentations; (b) virtual career tours;
© career fairs with organized student interaction with industry
representatives; and (d) informational classroom-based activities connecting
academic content to career contexts within a priority industry sector. Level
1 activities qualify for credit under Stage I and Stage II of the four-stage
framework established in §183.6 of this Subpart but do not satisfy the
minimum work-based learning requirement for Jump Start credit under
Page 77 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subsection B of this Section.
(3) Level 2 Career Exploration Activities. Level 2 of the Continuum
includes structured employer engagement activities that provide students
with direct, supervised observation of workplace operations and
occupational roles. Level 2 activities include, but are not limited to: (a) job
shadowing experiences;
(b) employer site visits organized for career exploration purposes;
and © structured career mentoring sessions in which a student works
individually with an industry professional to explore career options and
workplace expectations. Level 2 activities must be not less than four hours in
duration, must include a structured reflection component, and must be
documented by the supervising school counselor, career coach, or CTE
instructor consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
(4) Level 3 — Project-Based and Internship Experiences. Level 3 of
the Continuum includes structured learning experiences in which students
apply pathway-specific technical knowledge in an employer-connected
context. Level 3 activities include, but are not limited to: (a) project-based
learning experiences conducted in partnership with an employer in which
students complete a defined deliverable with direct feedback from employer
representatives; (b) supervised internship or externship placements of not
fewer than sixty hours with an employer in a priority industry sector; and
© school-based enterprise programs that operate as a simulated business
environment with documented employer advisory involvement. Level 3
activities must include a documented employer partnership consistent with
Subsection C of this Section, must include student performance evaluation
by the employer or employer representative, and must be supervised by a
qualified CTE instructor.
(5) Level 4 — Pre-Apprenticeship and Student Learner Programs.
Level 4 of the Continuum includes structured employer-supervised work
Page 78 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
experiences that provide students with direct on-the-job training in
pathway-specific technical skills, with compensation where applicable under
state and federal labor law. Level 4 activities include, but are not limited to:
(a) pre-apprenticeship programs; and (b) student learner programs as
defined under applicable state and federal youth employment and education
statutes. Level 4 activities must involve not fewer than one hundred fifty
hours of employer-supervised training, must include a written training plan
specifying the technical competencies to be developed, and must comply with
all applicable state and federal labor laws governing student learners and
youth employment.
B. Minimum Level for Jump Start Credit Satisfaction.
(1) Work-based learning at Level 3 or above of the Continuum
established in Subsection A of this Section shall be required for purposes of
satisfying the work-based learning integration requirement of §183.10(C)(2)
of this Subpart. No work-based learning activity classified below Level 3 on
the Continuum shall count toward the work-based learning requirement
embedded in the nine-credit Jump Start sequence.
(2) For purposes of pathway authorization under §183.13 of this
Subpart, each pathway shall specify in its authorization proposal the
minimum WBL level required of students completing the pathway. The
minimum level for any authorized pathway shall be Level 3. The Council
shall verify compliance with this minimum standard as part of each pathway
authorization and reauthorization review.
(3) Pathways that require Level 4 work-based learning for
completion shall receive enhanced recognition in pathway tier determination
under §183.9(D) of this Subpart and in the accountability system consistent
with §183.5(D) of this Subpart.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prohibit a
student from participating in WBL activities at any level of the Continuum
Page 79 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
at any stage of the four-stage framework established in §183.6 of this
Subpart; this Subsection governs only the minimum WBL level required to
satisfy the nine-credit Jump Start sequence requirement under
§183.10(C)(2).
C. Employer partnership requirements.
(1) Each local education agency operating an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway shall recruit and maintain documented employer partnerships
sufficient to provide Level 3 or above work-based learning placements for
all students enrolled in the pathway who are in Stage III or Stage IV of the
four-stage framework established in §183.6 of this Subpart.
(2) A documented employer partnership for purposes of this Section
shall consist of a written agreement between the local education agency and
the employer that specifies:
(a) The nature of the work-based learning activities to be provided,
including the WBL tier level under Subsection A of this Section.
(b) The number of students the employer will accept for WBL
placements during the applicable school year.
© The employer's responsibilities for student supervision,
performance evaluation, and documentation.
(d) The agreed compensation arrangement, if any, including
compliance with applicable state and federal labor law governing student
work arrangements.
(e) The process for the local education agency to conduct site
oversight visits consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
(3) An employer participating in a WBL partnership under this
Section shall designate a qualified workplace supervisor for each student
placed with the employer. The workplace supervisor shall be responsible
for: (a) providing day-to-day supervision and technical guidance to the
student; (b) completing the student performance evaluation required under
Page 80 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subsection D(2)(d) of this Section; and © communicating with the local
education agency regarding student progress and placement conditions.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop and make
publicly available model employer partnership agreement templates for
each WBL tier level and shall provide technical assistance to local education
agencies and regional teams in recruiting and maintaining employer
partnerships. Model templates shall be updated at least every three years.
(5) Regional teams shall facilitate employer partnership development
for regional pathways within their workforce development region, consistent
with §183.9(F)(3)(d) of this Subpart, and shall maintain a current directory
of employers within the region who have executed or expressed interest in
executing WBL partnership agreements for pathway students.
D. Documentation, Quality Assurance, and Site Oversight.
(1) Each local education agency shall maintain documentation of all
work-based learning activities conducted for purposes of satisfying Jump
Start pathway requirements, organized by student, by pathway, and by
WBL tier level. Such documentation shall be maintained as part of the
student's educational record consistent with FERPA, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and
R.S. 44:1 et seq., and shall include:
(a) The WBL tier level classification of the activity.
(b) The employer partner's name and contact information.
© The start and end dates of the WBL placement or activity.
(d) The total hours completed by the student, for Level 3 and Level
4 activities.
(e) The employer's written performance evaluation of the student,
for Level 3 and Level 4 activities.
(f) The supervising CTE instructor's or career coach's assessment
of the student's work-based learning experience.
(2) Each local education agency shall conduct at least one site
Page 81 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
oversight visit per academic year to each employer partner providing Level
3 and Level 4 WBL placements. The site oversight visit shall be conducted
by a qualified CTE instructor or school administrator and shall:
(a) Confirm that the employer is fulfilling the obligations specified
in the employer partnership agreement under Subsection C(2) of this
Section.
(b) Confirm that student placement conditions comply with
applicable state and federal health, safety, and labor laws.
© Document any concerns or deficiencies observed and the corrective
action taken or planned.
(d) Obtain the employer's completed performance evaluation of each
student placed with the employer during the school year.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall conduct periodic
monitoring of local education agency compliance with the documentation
and site oversight requirements of this Section, including as part of any
general CTE program review, and shall include findings on WBL quality
assurance in any monitoring reports provided to the Council consistent with
§183.3(I) of this Subpart.
(4) Data reporting obligations for work-based learning participation,
including participation rates by WBL tier level, employer partnership
counts, and site oversight records, shall be governed by §183.19 of this
Subpart. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create separate data
reporting obligations duplicative of those established in §183.19.
§189.12. Industry-based credentials; tiered credential value
system;accountability integration
A. IBC Approval Authority; Workforce Investment Council
Coordination.
(1) The approval and tier classification of industry-based credentials
for use in Louisiana's K–12 CTE pathway system shall be governed by this
Page 82 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Section in coordination with the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council's
credential approval authority under R.S. 23:2065.
(2) An industry-based credential is eligible for use in an authorized
K–12 CTE pathway under this Subpart only if the credential:
(a) Has been approved by the Louisiana Workforce Investment
Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065.
(b) Has been designated by the Louisiana Career and Technical
Education Oversight Council.
(3) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council shall coordinate with the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council
pursuant to the formal coordination protocol established in §183.3(L) of this
Subpart to ensure that credential approval determinations under R.S.
23:2065 are aligned with the tier classification framework established in
Subsection B of this Section and with the occupation wage standards of
§183.4© and §183.4(D) of this Subpart.
(4) The Council shall maintain and publish on its publicly accessible
website a current registry of all industry-based credentials approved or
designated for use in authorized pathways under this Subpart, organized by
credential name, issuing body, associated pathway, and tier classification
under Subsection B of this Section. The registry shall be updated within
thirty calendar days of any addition, modification, or removal of a
credential.
B. Tiered Credential Value System; Established in Statute.
(1) There is hereby established a tiered credential value system for
industry-based credentials used in authorized K–12 CTE pathways under
this Subpart. The tiered system shall classify all approved or designated
credentials at one of three tiers — Tier 1, Tier 2, or Tier 3 — reflecting the
degree to which the credential is associated with high-demand, high-wage
occupational outcomes in Louisiana's labor market.
Page 83 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(2) Tier 1 credentials are industry-based credentials that are: (a)
approved by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S.
23:2065 or designated by the Council under Subsection A(2)(b) of this
Section; (b) linked to an occupation qualifying as a viable occupation as
defined in §183.2(U) of this Subpart, meeting the wage threshold standard
of §183.4© and the minimum wage growth rate standard of §183.4(D); and
© recognized by employers in the relevant industry sector as evidence of
entry-level workplace readiness. A Tier 1 credential satisfies the minimum
IBC requirement for Career Diploma completion but does not
independently qualify a pathway for Tier 2 or Tier 3 pathway designation
under §183.9(D) of this Subpart.
(3) Tier 2 credentials are industry-based credentials that, in addition
to meeting all criteria for Tier 1 classification, satisfy all of the following:
(a) The credential is linked to an occupation qualifying as a priority
occupation as defined in §183.2(P) of this Subpart, rated four or five stars
in the Louisiana Workforce Commission's official occupational forecast (or
its equivalent successor) pursuant to R.S. 23:76.
(b) The credential is recognized by employers across multiple
Louisiana workforce development regions as evidence of journeyman-level
or advanced competency in the credential's occupational domain.
© The Council, upon documented analysis, determines that
attainment of the credential is associated with a wage premium above the
median wage for workers in the credential's occupational domain who do
not hold the credential, based on Louisiana Workforce Commission
enhanced wage record data or comparable wage data where available.
(4) Tier 3 credentials are industry-based credentials that, in addition
to meeting all criteria for Tier 2 classification, satisfy all of the following:
(a) The credential is a nationally or internationally recognized
certification, occupational license, or equivalent credential that carries
Page 84 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
portability across states and is recognized by employers outside of Louisiana
as evidence of occupational competency.
(b) Attainment of the credential is associated with entry-level wages
meeting or exceeding the priority occupation wage standard for the relevant
occupation as documented in the Council's most recent biennial priority
review findings under §183.4(E) of this Subpart.
© The Council determines, upon documented analysis using
Louisiana Workforce Commission enhanced wage record data, that Career
Diploma graduates who attained the credential within three years of
graduation achieved median wages meeting or exceeding the priority
occupation wage standard for the credential's occupational domain.
(5) A credential is eligible for any tier classification only if it is linked
to an occupation meeting the viable occupation wage threshold standard of
§183.4© and the minimum wage growth rate standard of §183.4(D) of this
Subpart. No credential linked exclusively to an occupation that does not
meet both such standards shall be classified above Tier 1, and no credential
linked to an occupation that fails the minimum viable occupation standard
shall be eligible for use in an authorized pathway under this Subpart.
C. Minimum Statutory Thresholds.
(1) Each authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall require, as a condition
of Career Diploma completion, that a student attain not fewer than one
industry-based credential approved or designated for use in that pathway
under Subsection A of this Section.
(2) For pathways designated as Tier 2 under §183.9(D) of this
Subpart, at least one required credential shall be classified at Tier 2 or
above under Subsection B of this Section.
(3) For pathways designated as Tier 3 under §183.9(D) of this
Subpart, at least one required credential shall be classified at Tier 3 under
Subsection B of this Section.
Page 85 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(4) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, on the
written recommendation of the Council, may establish pathway-specific
credential requirements that exceed the minimum thresholds of this
Subsection where the Council determines by documented analysis that a
higher credential threshold is necessary to ensure that pathway completers
are prepared for employment in occupations on the Priority List at wages
consistent with the viable occupation or priority occupation standards of
§183.4 of this Subpart.
(5) No pathway shall be authorized or reauthorized under §183.13
of this Subpart if the required credential for the pathway does not meet the
minimum applicable tier threshold for the pathway's tier designation under
§183.9(D). The Council shall verify credential tier compliance as part of
each pathway authorization and reauthorization review under §183.13.
D. Credential Review and Disqualification.
(1) The Council shall conduct a review of each credential included
on the registry maintained under Subsection A(4) of this Section as part of
each Biennial Priority Review under §183.4(E) of this Subpart and at any
time the Council receives information suggesting that a credential may no
longer satisfy the classification criteria applicable to its current tier
designation.
(2) A credential shall be subject to reclassification to a lower tier or
disqualification from the registry upon a Council finding, supported by
documented analysis, that:
(a) The credential is no longer linked to an occupation meeting the
viable occupation wage threshold standard of §183.4© or the minimum
wage growth rate standard of §183.4(D), in which case the credential shall
be disqualified from the registry and may no longer serve as the required
credential for any newly authorized pathway.
(b) The credential no longer satisfies the classification criteria for its
Page 86 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
current tier under Subsection B of this Section based on updated labor
market data, in which case the credential shall be reclassified to the
appropriate lower tier.
© The credential has been withdrawn, suspended, or materially
altered by the issuing body, rendering the Council's prior classification
determination invalid.
(3) When the Council determines that a credential should be
reclassified or disqualified under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the
Council shall:
(a) Notify in writing the Louisiana Department of Education, all
local education agencies operating pathways that include the affected
credential, and all affected regional teams within thirty calendar days of the
Council's determination.
(b) Specify in the notification the basis for the reclassification or
disqualification, the effective date, and the implications for pathway tier
designation under §183.9(D) of this Subpart.
© Allow a transition period of not fewer than one full academic year
before a disqualification takes effect with respect to students already
enrolled in a pathway for which the disqualified credential is currently
required, to avoid disruption to enrolled students' Career Diploma
eligibility.
(4) Where a credential reclassification results in a pathway's
required credential no longer meeting the tier threshold applicable to the
pathway's tier designation under §183.9(D) of this Subpart, the pathway
shall be subject to a mandatory mid-cycle review under §183.13(E) of this
Subpart, and the Council shall evaluate whether the pathway's tier
designation should be revised or conditions imposed on the pathway's
continued authorization.
§189.13. Pathway authorization; review; reauthorization
Page 87 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
A. Application Process for Pathway Authorization.
(1) A local education agency, regional team, or other proposing party
authorized under this Subpart seeking to establish an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway shall submit a pathway authorization proposal to the Louisiana Career
and Technical Education Oversight Council. The Council shall review the
proposal and transmit a written recommendation to the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education regarding authorization.
(2) A pathway authorization proposal shall include, at minimum, all

of the following:
(a) A description of the proposed pathway, including the career
cluster, occupational focus, and workforce development region or regions
for which authorization is sought.
(b) Documentation of alignment between the proposed pathway and
the applicable Statewide Priority Industry List or Regional Priority
Industry List under §183.4 of this Subpart, including the data sources and
data vintages on which the alignment determination is based.
© A wage premium analysis using Louisiana Workforce Commission
wage data documenting the expected wage premium associated with the
credential required by the pathway above the median wage for workers
without the credential in the relevant occupational domain.
(d) The Career Major Program framework required under
§183.10(A) of this Subpart, including the nine-credit Jump Start course
sequence and academic core credit requirements.
(e) Documentation of the industry-based credential or credentials

required for pathway completion, including the tier classification of each
credential under §183.12(B) of this Subpart.
(f) A work-based learning plan describing the employer partnership
structure, the WBL tier level required, and the documentation and oversight
procedures consistent with §183.11 of this Subpart.
Page 88 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(g) Evidence of the articulation agreement required under §183.15
of this Subpart, or a documented timeline for its execution where the
agreement has not yet been finalized at the time of proposal submission.
(h) Identification of the pathway tier designation sought under
§183.9(D) of this Subpart, with supporting documentation demonstrating
that all tier criteria are satisfied.
(I) A career counselling and coaching plan describing how the LEA
will satisfy the ICAP and advising requirements of §183.7 and §183.8 of this
Subpart for students enrolled in the proposed pathway.
(j) For regional pathways, a copy of any partnering agreement under
§183.9(G) of this Subpart and documentation from the regional team
supporting the proposal.
(k) Such additional information as the Council may require by rule
adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.
(3) The Council shall publish and maintain on its publicly accessible
website a pathway authorization proposal form, checklist, and instructions,
updated not less than annually. The Council shall not require information
in the pathway authorization process beyond what is specified in Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection and Council rules adopted consistent with
Subparagraph (2)(k) of this Subsection.
B. Authorization Criteria; Minimum Standards.
(1) The Council shall recommend authorization of a proposed K–12
CTE pathway to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
only upon finding that the proposal satisfies all of the following:
(a) The proposed pathway is aligned to an occupation within an
industry sector on the applicable Priority Industry List, consistent with
the requirements of §183.4 of this Subpart.
(b) The proposed pathway includes all minimum required
pathway components established in §183.9(E) of this Subpart.
Page 89 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
© The Career Major Program curriculum meets the credit,
sequence, and assessment requirements of §183.10 of this Subpart.
(d) The work-based learning component meets the minimum
level and quality standards of §183.11 of this Subpart;
(e) The required industry-based credential satisfies the

applicable tier threshold under §183.12© of this Subpart.
(f) The articulation agreement required by §183.15 of this
Subpart has been executed or a compliance timeline has been approved
by the Council as provided in §183.15(D) of this Subpart.
(g) The proposing LEA or regional team has demonstrated,
through the most recent annual counselling activity report under
§183.8(F) of this Subpart or through other documented evidence, that
the LEA or participating LEAs maintain the counselling and career
coaching infrastructure required by §183.8 of this Subpart.
(h) The wage premium analysis submitted under Subsection
A(2)© of this Section documents a positive expected wage premium
associated with the required credential.
(2) The Council shall issue its written recommendation to the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education not later than sixty
calendar days after the Council's receipt of a complete pathway
authorization proposal. If the Council requests additional information
from the proposing party, the sixty-day period shall be tolled from the
date of the request until complete information is received.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall act on the Council's written recommendation not later than sixty
calendar days after receipt. If the Board does not act within sixty
calendar days of receipt, the Council's recommendation shall be deemed
approved, and the pathway shall be authorized consistent with the
Council's recommendation.
Page 90 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(4) The Council shall transmit written notification of all pathway
authorization decisions to the Louisiana Department of Education, the
proposing local education agency or regional team, and any affected
employer partners within fifteen calendar days of the Board's action or
deemed approval.
C. Pathway Authorization Conditions; Required at Approval
and Maintained Throughout.
(1) Each pathway authorization issued under this Section shall
be subject to the following conditions, which must be satisfied at the time
of authorization and maintained throughout the pathway's authorization
period:
(a) The pathway remains aligned to an occupation within an
industry sector on the applicable Priority Industry List, consistent with
§183.4 of this Subpart.
(b) The pathway's required industry-based credential remains
approved or designated under §183.12(A) of this Subpart and classified
at the tier level required for the pathway's tier designation.
© The Career Major Program curriculum and nine-credit Jump
Start course sequence remain materially consistent with the approved
curriculum submitted under §183.10(F) of this Subpart.
(d) The work-based learning component continues to provide
Level 3 or above placements for enrolled students, consistent with
§183.11 of this Subpart.
(e) The articulation agreement required under §183.15 of this
Subpart remains in effect.
(f) The local education agency maintains the counselling and
career coaching standards required by §183.8 of this Subpart for
students enrolled in the pathway.
(g) The local education agency annually reports pathway data
Page 91 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
consistent with the requirements of §183.19 of this Subpart.
(2) Any change to a pathway that affects a condition listed in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be reported in writing to the
Council within thirty calendar days of the change. The Council shall
determine whether the change requires a pathway modification review
under Subsection G of this Section, a mandatory mid-cycle review under
Subsection E, or is minor enough to be approved administratively
without formal review.
(3) A local education agency's failure to maintain the
authorization conditions of this Subsection shall be subject to the
consequences established in Subsection H of this Section.
D. Five-Year Pathway Authorization Cycle.
(1) Each authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall be subject to a
comprehensive reauthorization review not less frequently than once
every five years from the date of initial authorization or most recent
reauthorization, as applicable. No pathway shall continue to operate as
an authorized Jump Start pathway beyond the five-year authorization
period without Council review and State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education reauthorization, except as provided in Paragraph
(3) of this Subsection.
(2) The Council shall maintain and publish on its publicly
accessible website a schedule of upcoming pathway reauthorization
reviews, updated not less than annually, identifying each authorized
pathway, the date of initial authorization or last reauthorization, and the
next scheduled reauthorization date.
(3) If the Council's reauthorization review process for a pathway
is not completed before the expiration of the pathway's five-year
authorization period due to administrative delay not attributable to the
proposing party, the pathway's authorization shall be extended on a
Page 92 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
holdover basis for not more than one academic year while the
reauthorization review is completed. The Council shall document the
basis for any holdover extension in Council records and shall notify the
affected LEA and the Louisiana Department of Education.
(4) The five-year pathway authorization cycle is distinct from
and independent of the biennial priority review under §183.4(E) of this
Subpart; neither satisfies nor substitutes for the other. Continued
authorization of pathways aligned to sectors removed from the Priority
List is governed by §183.4(E)(5).
E. Mandatory Mid-Cycle Review Triggers.
(1) A pathway shall be subject to a mandatory mid-cycle review
before the expiration of its five-year authorization period upon the
occurrence of any of the following triggering events:
(a) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council, following a Biennial Priority Review under §183.4(E) of this
Subpart, removes from the Statewide Priority Industry List or
applicable Regional Priority Industry List the industry sector to which
the pathway is aligned.
(b) The required credential for the pathway is reclassified or
disqualified in is Subpart in a manner that affects the pathway's tier
compliance under §183.9(B) or §183.12© of this Subpart.
© The Louisiana Department of Education, through program
monitoring activities or annual data review, identifies that a pathway's
credential attainment rate has fallen below fifty percent (50%) for two
consecutive academic years.
(d) The Act 187 return on investment report required under
§183.20 of this Subpart identifies a pathway as having a negative or
insufficient return on investment for two consecutive reporting cycles.
(e) The articulation agreement required for the pathway under
Page 93 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
§183.15 of this Subpart expires or is terminated without replacement.
(f) A local education agency operating the pathway fails to
implement a corrective action plan imposed under Subsection H of this
Section within the timeframe specified by the Council.
(g) The Council, by a vote of not fewer than seven of the ten
voting members then serving, determines that material changes in
regional or statewide labor market conditions since the last
authorization or reauthorization of the pathway warrant an earlier
review.
(2) Upon the occurrence of a triggering event under Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, the Council shall:
(a) Notify the affected local education agency or regional team of
the triggering event and the initiation of a mid-cycle review within
fifteen calendar days.
(b) complete the mid-cycle review within ninety calendar days of
notification.
© transmit a written recommendation to the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education regarding continuation,
modification, suspension, or revocation of the pathway's authorization.
(3) A mid-cycle review shall apply the same authorization
criteria as a full reauthorization review under Subsection B of this
Section, and the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall act on the Council's recommendation within sixty calendar days of
receipt.
F. Reauthorization Standards; Required Consideration of Act
187 ROI Findings.
(1) In conducting each five-year pathway reauthorization review
under Subsection D and each mid-cycle review under Subsection E, the
Council shall evaluate the pathway against all of the following
Page 94 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
reauthorization standards:
(a) Continued satisfaction of all minimum authorization criteria
established in Subsection B of this Section.
(b) Maintenance of all pathway authorization conditions
established in Subsection C of this Section throughout the prior
authorization period.
© Credential attainment performance: a credential attainment
rate of not less than sixty percent (60%) for CTE completers of the
pathway, averaged over the most recent three academic years for which
data are available.
(d) Pathway alignment performance:
(I) For all pathways, documented evidence that the occupations
served by the pathway continue to appear on the applicable Priority
Industry List.
(ii) for Tier 2 and Tier 3 pathways, documented evidence that the
occupations served continue to satisfy the priority occupation standard
established in §183.2(P) of this Subpart, including the four-or-five-star
OFC rating (or its equivalent successor) and high-wage outcome
requirements applicable to priority occupations.
(iii) for Tier 1 provisional pathways, documented evidence that
the occupations served continue to satisfy, at minimum, the viable
occupation standards of §183.4© and §183.4(D) of this Subpart, together
with the Tier 2 Advancement Plan required by §183.9(D)(2)(a) of this
Subpart.
(e) The Act 187 return on investment analysis required under
§183.20 of this Subpart for the pathway, including the Council's formal
recommendation under §183.20(D) of this Subpart regarding whether
the pathway's economic return justifies continued authorization at its
current tier designation.
Page 95 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(f) Post-graduation employment and wage outcomes for pathway
completers as reported in the annual Jump Start data report under
§183.19 of this Subpart, including one-year and three-year post-
graduation wage outcomes compared to the viable occupation and
priority occupation wage standards of §183.4 of this Subpart.
(2) The Council shall incorporate the findings of the most
recently available Act 187 return on investment report produced under
§183.20 of this Subpart into its written reauthorization recommendation.
The Council's recommendation shall specifically address: (a) whether
the pathway's ROI findings meet the minimum performance thresholds
established under §183.20(F) of this Subpart; and (b) what, if any,
conditions, modifications, or reauthorization limitations the Council
recommends based on ROI findings.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall, in acting on a Council reauthorization recommendation that is
based in whole or in part on Act 187 ROI findings, provide a written
public response as required by §183.20(E) of this Subpart, addressing
the Board's findings and the basis for its reauthorization decision.
(4) The Council may recommend conditional reauthorization of
a pathway that does not fully satisfy the reauthorization standards of
this Subsection where: (a) the pathway's performance deficiencies are
isolated and subject to a specific, time-limited corrective action plan;
and (b) the Council determines that discontinuation of the pathway
would cause material harm to enrolled students or to a regional
workforce development need that cannot be timely addressed through
an alternative authorized pathway.
G. Pathway Modification; Suspension; Sunset Provisions.
(1) A local education agency operating an authorized pathway
may propose a material modification to the pathway by submitting a
Page 96 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
pathway modification proposal to the Council. A modification is
material if it would affect any of the authorization conditions established
in Subsection C(1) of this Section. Non-material administrative changes
may be implemented with written notification to the Council without
formal proposal submission.
(2) The Council shall review a pathway modification proposal
and issue a written recommendation to the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education within forty-five calendar days of receipt of
a complete proposal. The Board shall act on the recommendation within
thirty calendar days of receipt. A material modification shall not be
implemented before Board approval.
(3) The Council may recommend suspension of a pathway's
authorization where: (a) the local education agency has failed to
maintain one or more authorization conditions under Subsection C of
this Section and has not remediated the deficiency within sixty calendar
days of Council notification; or (b) a mid-cycle review under Subsection
E identifies conditions that present an immediate risk to enrolled
students or that render continued pathway operation inconsistent with
this Subpart.
(4) Suspension of a pathway's authorization shall not take effect
until the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education has acted
on the Council's suspension recommendation, except where the Council
makes a specific written finding that immediate suspension is necessary
to prevent immediate harm to enrolled students.
(5) A pathway whose authorization has been suspended shall not
enroll new students in the pathway during the suspension period.
Students already enrolled in a suspended pathway shall be: (a) permitted
to complete the pathway if the suspension is expected to be resolved
before the student's expected graduation date; or (b) offered alternative
Page 97 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
pathway options by the local education agency, with the assistance of a
school counselor or career coach, if the suspension cannot be resolved
within a timeframe that allows the student to complete the pathway
before graduation.
(6) A pathway that has been discontinued by the authorizing
LEA or regional team, or whose authorization has not been renewed
following a reauthorization review, shall be formally sunset by written
notification to the Council and the Louisiana Department of Education.
The LEA or regional team shall give enrolled students not less than one
full academic year's advance notice of a planned sunset and shall, in
coordination with the Council and the Department, identify alternative
pathway options for affected students.
H. Failure to Maintain Authorization Conditions; Consequences.
(1) If the Louisiana Department of Education, through program
monitoring, annual data review, or annual counselling activity reporting
under §183.8(F) of this Subpart, identifies that a local education agency
operating an authorized pathway has failed to maintain one or more of
the authorization conditions established in Subsection C of this Section,
the Department shall notify the Council in writing within thirty calendar
days of identifying the deficiency.
(2) Upon receipt of notice of a deficiency under Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection, or upon independent identification of an authorization
condition deficiency, the Council shall:
(a) Notify the affected local education agency in writing of the
identified deficiency and the specific authorization condition or
conditions that have not been maintained.
(b) Afford the local education agency not fewer than sixty
calendar days to respond to the notification and to submit a corrective
action plan.
Page 98 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
© Review the local education agency's response and corrective
action plan, and either:
(I) Approve the plan and establish a monitoring schedule.
(ii) Determine that the deficiency is sufficiently serious to warrant
a mandatory mid-cycle review under Subsection E of this Section.
(3) Where a corrective action plan has been approved under
Paragraph (2)(c)(I) of this Subsection, the Council shall monitor the
local education agency's progress against the plan at intervals specified
in the monitoring schedule. If the local education agency fails to
implement the corrective action plan within the agreed timeframe, the
Council shall initiate a mandatory mid-cycle review under Subsection E
of this Section.
(4) The consequences available to the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education upon Council recommendation following a
finding of persistent or serious failure to maintain authorization
conditions shall include:
(a) Imposition of conditions on continued pathway authorization,
including additional reporting obligations, an enhanced monitoring
schedule, or requirements to obtain Council pre-approval for specified
pathway decisions.
(b) Pathway modification required by the Board as a condition
of continued authorization.
© Suspension of the pathway's authorization pursuant to
Subsection G(3) of this Section.
(d) Non-renewal of the pathway's authorization at the next
scheduled reauthorization review.
(5) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to limit the
authority of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education,
consistent with its general authority under R.S. 17:7, to take any other
Page 99 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
lawful action with respect to a local education agency's conduct of a CTE
pathway program, provided that such action is not inconsistent with the
provisions of this Subpart.
I. New Pathway Proposal Requirements; Process and Timeline.
(1) A local education agency or regional team that seeks to propose a

new K–12 CTE pathway — whether as a statewide or regional pathway — shall
initiate the pathway authorization process by submitting a notice of intent to the
Council not less than one hundred eighty calendar days before the desired
implementation date of the pathway. The notice of intent shall include:
(a) A description of the proposed pathway, including the career cluster,
occupational focus, and proposed tier designation.
(b) A statement of the workforce development need the pathway is
intended to address, with reference to applicable Priority Industry List data and
the data sources upon which the need determination is based.
© Identification of the local education agency or agencies and any
regional team partners that will participate in delivering the pathway.
(2) Upon receipt of a notice of intent under Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the Council shall: (a) assign a staff liaison to assist the proposing
party in navigating the proposal development and authorization process; (b)
provide the proposing party with the current pathway authorization proposal
form and checklist under Subsection A(3) of this Section; and © schedule a pre-
proposal consultation meeting with the proposing party within thirty calendar
days of receipt of the notice of intent.
(3) The proposing party shall submit a complete pathway authorization
proposal under Subsection A(2) of this Section not later than ninety calendar
days before the desired implementation date. The Council shall review the
proposal and issue its recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education within the sixty-day period provided in Subsection B(2)
of this Section.
Page 100 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(4) A new pathway shall not be implemented before the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education has acted on the Council's
recommendation pursuant to Subsection B(3) of this Section. No local education
agency or regional team may represent to students, families, or the public that
a pathway is an "authorized Jump Start pathway" or that enrollment in the
pathway will lead to Career Diploma eligibility before formal authorization has
been granted.
(5) The Council shall publish on its publicly accessible website a
dashboard of pending pathway proposals, updated monthly, identifying the
proposing party, the proposal status, and the expected Council recommendation
date. Nothing in this Paragraph shall require the Council to disclose
deliberative materials or communications that are otherwise protected from
public disclosure under applicable law.
§189.14. Rural LEA access; differentiated provisions and thresholds
A. Rural LEA Classification; Statutory Criteria.
(1) For purposes of this Subpart, a local education agency shall be
classified as a "rural local education agency" or "rural LEA" upon meeting one
or more of the following criteria:
(a) The LEA is located in a parish where the population density, as
determined from the most recently published federal decennial census data, is
fewer than one hundred (100) persons per square mile.
(b) The LEA's total public K–12 student enrollment, as reported in the
most recently published annual enrollment data of the Louisiana Department
of Education, is fewer than four thousand (4,000) students.
© The LEA's primary service area has been classified as a rural locale
under the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) locale classification
framework maintained by the United States Department of Education,
specifically as Locale Code 41 (Rural — Fringe), 42 (Rural — Distant), or 43
(Rural — Remote), under the most recently published NCES locale
Page 101 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
classification data.
(2) In addition to the criteria established in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council
may, upon written application by a local education agency, certify the LEA as
a rural local education agency for purposes of this Section upon a finding, by
not fewer than six voting members then serving, that the LEA faces one or more
of the following documented structural access barriers materially impairing its
participation in the K-12 CTE pathway system on the same basis as non-rural
LEAs:
(a) Fewer than two employers with operations within the relevant
workforce development region are positioned to provide the employer demand
documentation required under §183.9(C)(2)(e).
(b) The LEA cannot project sustained enrollment in a single pathway at
levels required for independent pathway authorization.
© Geographic isolation from workforce development centers,
postsecondary institutions, or pathway delivery sites that creates documented
transportation or access barriers for students enrolled or seeking enrollment in
an authorized pathway.
(3) The Council shall review and reconfirm rural LEA classifications
under this Section not less frequently than once every five years, coordinated
with the five-year pathway reauthorization cycle under §183.13(D) of this
Subpart. An LEA that no longer meets any criterion in Paragraph (1) or any
basis for certification under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection shall be
transitioned to standard pathway authorization requirements upon written
notice from the Council. Such notice shall be provided not less than twenty-four
(24) months before the effective date of the transition, and shall specify the
authorization cycle at which standard requirements will apply.
(4) The Council shall maintain and publish on its publicly accessible
website a current list of all LEAs classified as rural local education agencies
Page 102 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
under this Section, together with the applicable criterion or criteria supporting
each classification, updated within thirty (30) calendar days of any classification
determination, reconfirmation, or transition notice under this Subsection.
B. Differentiated Pathway Authorization Thresholds for Rural LEAs.
(1) Notwithstanding §183.9 and §183.13, a rural LEA classified under
Subsection A shall be subject to the following differentiated thresholds when
submitting a regional pathway authorization proposal:
(a) Employer Partnership Documentation. In lieu of §183.9(C)(2)(e), a
rural LEA shall provide documented evidence of employer demand from at
least one employer with operations within the applicable workforce
development region or an immediately adjacent region. Where an industry
sector's employer base is concentrated outside the LEA's primary region, the
Council may consider employers from the broader labor market area, provided
the LEA demonstrates the sector's draw area encompasses that broader area.
(b) Work-Based Learning Provisional Authorization. A rural LEA shall
provide work-based learning placements meeting the §183.11(B) standards.
Where a rural LEA demonstrates that employer unavailability makes required
WBL placements inaccessible during the initial authorization period, the
Council may, by majority vote, approve provisional authorization conditioned
on the LEA's submission and execution of a Council-approved Work-Based
Learning Development Plan. A Work-Based Learning Development Plan shall:
(I) Identify specific, time-bound steps the rural LEA will take to establish
work-based learning placements at the required minimum tier level, to be
achieved not later than the beginning of the pathway's third year of operation.
(ii) Identify at least one industry partner who has executed or committed
in writing to execute a formal employer partnership agreement under §183.11©
of this Subpart within two years of the pathway's authorization.
(iii) Be submitted to the Council for review and written approval as part
of the rural LEA's annual pathway progress report under Paragraph (3) of this
Page 103 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subsection.
(iv) Include a documented contingency plan for WBL access, which may
include consortium arrangements with adjacent LEAs, virtual employer
partnerships, or regional vocational and technical institution partnerships
under §183.17 of this Subpart, in the event that the LEA is unable to secure on-
site employer placements within the plan timeline.
© The differentiated employer documentation and work-based learning
thresholds established in Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Paragraph shall
apply only to initial pathway authorization and to the rural LEA's first
reauthorization review under §183.13(D) of this Subpart. At the second
reauthorization review and each subsequent review, the Council shall evaluate
whether the rural LEA's access barriers remain sufficiently documented to
warrant continued differentiated threshold treatment and shall make a written
finding to that effect.
(2) All other minimum pathway authorization criteria under §183.13(B)
apply to rural LEAs without differentiation, including: §183.4 (Regional
Priority Industry List alignment); §183.8 (career counselling and coaching);
§183.10 (Career Major Program curriculum and course sequence); §183.12
(industry-based credential tiers); and §183.15 (articulation agreements). The
differentiated thresholds of Paragraph (1) apply only to employer demand
documentation and work-based learning placement availability and do not
modify any academic quality, credential, or postsecondary access standard.
(3) A rural LEA whose pathway has been authorized under this Section
shall submit to the Council an annual rural pathway progress report not later
than December 1 of each year, covering the immediately preceding academic
year and containing:
(a) Current enrollment in the authorized pathway, disaggregated by
grade level.
(b) The current status of all employer partnerships established under
Page 104 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
§183.11© of this Subpart, including new employer partnerships established
during the reporting year and any employer partnerships discontinued.
© The tier level of work-based learning placements provided to enrolled
students during the reporting year, and documentation of progress toward the
WBL minimum tier level required by §183.11(B) of this Subpart where a Work-
Based Learning Development Plan is in effect.
(d) Any material changes to pathway delivery that may affect compliance
with the pathway authorization conditions of §183.13© of this Subpart.
(e) Any transportation access challenges experienced during the
reporting year and the steps the LEA has taken or plans to take to address
them, consistent with the transportation access plan required under Subsection
D of this Section.
(4) The Council shall, by rule adopted pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., establish procedures for rural LEA pathway
authorization that implement the differentiated thresholds of this Subsection in
a manner that maintains the academic quality, workforce alignment, and
credential standards applicable to all authorized pathways under this Subpart.
C. Consortium Pathway Authorization; Small Districts.
(1) Two or more rural LEAs classified under Subsection A may jointly
submit a pathway authorization proposal as a consortium to develop and deliver
an authorized K–12 CTE pathway. A consortium established under this
Subsection shall be treated as a single proposing party for purposes of the
§183.13 pathway authorization process, subject to the requirements of this
Subsection.
(2) A consortium pathway authorization proposal shall include, in
addition to all elements required under §183.13(A) of this Subpart:
(a) The identity of each participating rural LEA and the designation of
one participating LEA as the Lead LEA, which shall serve as the primary
administrative party responsible for all communications with the Council and
Page 105 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
the Louisiana Department of Education, for enrollment coordination across
participating LEAs, and for compliance reporting under §183.19 of this Subpart
on behalf of the consortium.
(b) A signed consortium agreement executed by the authorized
representative of each participating LEA, specifying.
(I) The Lead LEA's administrative responsibilities, including reporting
obligations under §183.19 of this Subpart and the pathway authorization
conditions maintenance obligations under §183.13© of this Subpart.
(ii) The responsibilities of each participating LEA for curriculum
delivery, instructor staffing, work-based learning coordination, credentialing
support, and student advising and ICAP services under §183.7 and §183.8 of
this Subpart.
(iii) The site or sites at which pathway instruction will be delivered, and
the transportation arrangements each participating LEA will use to ensure
enrolled students have access to each delivery site, consistent with the
requirements of Subsection D of this Section.
(iv) A plan for equitable allocation of pathway enrollment capacity
among participating LEAs, including enrollment targets and procedures for
addressing over- or under-enrollment at any participating LEA.
(v) Notice requirements and continuity-of-enrollment provisions
governing the process by which a participating LEA may withdraw from the
consortium, ensuring that students currently enrolled in the pathway at the time
of withdrawal are not displaced from the pathway.
(vi) The process for admitting additional rural LEAs to the consortium,
consistent with Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(vii) Dispute resolution procedures for inter-LEA disagreements arising
from the consortium's delivery of the authorized pathway.
© Documentation of the combined total K–12 student enrollment of all
participating LEAs, which shall constitute the enrollment basis for all Council
Page 106 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
assessments of pathway viability for the consortium.
(d) Where applicable, documentation of any existing partnering
arrangements under §183.9(G) of this Subpart on which the consortium intends
to rely for pathway delivery, together with a description of how those
arrangements are incorporated into the consortium's delivery model.
(3) For purposes of pathway authorization, reauthorization, and all
related Council assessments under §183.13 of this Subpart, the combined
student enrollment of all participating LEAs shall be aggregated and treated as
a single LEA enrollment figure. The employer demand documentation
thresholds applicable under Subsection B(1)(a) of this Section shall apply to the
consortium as a whole, not separately to each participating LEA.
(4) The Lead LEA is primarily responsible for compliance with §183.13©
authorization conditions and timely submission of §183.19 reporting on behalf
of the consortium. Lead LEA failure to fulfill these obligations constitutes a
consortium compliance failure under §183.13(H); provided the Council first
gives written notice of the deficiency to all participating LEAs and affords thirty
(30) calendar days to designate a replacement Lead LEA and submit a
corrective action plan.
(5) A local education agency that is not classified as a rural LEA under
Subsection A of this Section but that operates in a geographic area contiguous
to the service area of one or more participating rural LEAs in a consortium may
petition the Council for inclusion in the consortium upon demonstrating that
the LEA faces documented access barriers substantially comparable to those
qualifying the participating rural LEAs. The Council may approve inclusion
upon a written finding that the applying LEA's participation would strengthen
the consortium's ability to deliver a high-quality pathway consistent with the
standards of this Subpart and that inclusion does not circumvent the rural
access purpose of this Section.
(6) A consortium authorized under this Subsection shall coordinate with
Page 107 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
the applicable regional team for all pathway development and oversight
functions under §183.9(F) of this Subpart. Participation by the LEAs in a
consortium shall satisfy the §183.9(F)(2)(a) requirement for multi-LEA regional
team representation to the extent the participating LEAs collectively provide
regional team representation within the applicable workforce development
region.
D. Transportation Support Requirements.
(1) An LEA delivering a K–12 CTE pathway at a site outside enrolled
students' school of attendance—whether independently or through a
consortium under Subsection C—shall ensure enrolled students have
meaningful access to transportation to and from the delivery site.
Transportation provided under this Section shall comply with all applicable
Louisiana law governing the transportation of public school students.
(2) Each rural LEA that delivers, or proposes to deliver, a pathway at a
shared or off-campus site shall include in its pathway authorization proposal
under §183.13(A) of this Subpart a Transportation Access Plan specifying:
(a) Each delivery site at which pathway instruction will be conducted,
with the address and the estimated distance from the home school of each
participating LEA's students.
(b) The estimated number of students for whom LEA-provided or LEA-
arranged transportation will be necessary during each academic year of the
pathway's authorization period.
© The mechanism or mechanisms through which the LEA will provide
or facilitate student access to each delivery site, which may include but is not
limited to:
(I) Regular school bus routes or dedicated shuttle service.
(ii) Cooperative transportation arrangements with one or more adjacent
LEAs or governmental entities entered into pursuant to R.S. 33:1324.
(iii) Formal agreements with regional transit authorities, vocational-
Page 108 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
technical institutions, or other public entities to provide student transportation
services.
(iv) Student transportation stipend or mileage reimbursement programs
where direct transportation cannot be provided.
(v) Technology-aided or hybrid instruction arrangements, consistent
with §183.18(D) of this Subpart, to supplement in-person delivery for pathway
components that can be effectively delivered remotely, thereby reducing
required student travel.
(d) The estimated annual cost of the transportation access mechanism
identified under Subparagraph © of this Paragraph and the lawfully available
funding source or sources from which those costs will be funded, which may
include career development funds, available federal CTE funds under the Carl
D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C.
§ 2301 et seq., state transportation funds appropriated by the legislature, or
other lawfully available appropriations.
(e) A written assurance executed by the LEA's chief administrative
officer that no enrolled student will be denied access to the authorized pathway
solely because of the student's inability to independently arrange or fund
transportation to the delivery site.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education, in coordination with the
Council, shall develop and maintain a Transportation Technical Assistance
Resource for rural LEAs that provides:
(a) A summary of available state and federal funding mechanisms
applicable to rural CTE student transportation.
(b) Model cooperative transportation agreement templates, consistent
with R.S. 33:1324, for use by rural LEAs and consortia.
© A compilation of technology-aided instruction arrangements and
hybrid delivery models currently authorized under §183.18(D) of this Subpart
that rural LEAs may use to reduce transportation burdens.
Page 109 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) Documented examples of rural CTE transportation models
implemented by Louisiana LEAs and LEAs in comparable rural states. The
Transportation Technical Assistance Resource shall be updated not less
frequently than once every two years and shall be made available on the
Louisiana Department of Education's publicly accessible website.
(4) The failure of a rural LEA to submit and maintain the
Transportation Access Plan required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection,
or to implement the plan in a manner that ensures enrolled students are not
systematically denied access to the pathway due to unresolved transportation
barriers, shall constitute a failure to maintain pathway authorization conditions
under §183.13© of this Subpart and shall be subject to the consequences
established in §183.13(H) of this Subpart.
E. Rural Access Monitoring; Oversight Council Responsibility.
(1) The Council shall monitor and publicly report on rural LEA access
to authorized K–12 CTE pathways as provided in this Subsection, in
coordination with its annual reporting obligations under §183.3(I)(6) and the
data requirements of §183.19.
(2) The Council shall, as a component of its annual report required
under §183.3(I)(6) of this Subpart, include a Rural Access and Completion
Report containing all of the following:
(a) The total number of LEAs classified as rural local education agencies
under Subsection A of this Section and the number and percentage of those
rural LEAs that have at least one currently authorized K–12 CTE pathway.
(b) A comparison, presented by workforce development region, of the
number of authorized K–12 CTE pathways accessible in rural LEAs versus
non-rural LEAs, disaggregated by pathway tier under §183.9(D) and by
industry sector under §183.4 of this Subpart.
© Rural-disaggregated data on: K–12 CTE pathway enrollment and
enrollment trends; CTE completer and concentrator rates; industry-based
Page 110 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
credential attainment rates; work-based learning participation rates; and post-
graduation outcomes, as those data elements are reported under §183.19 of this
Subpart.
(d) The number, status, and performance outcomes of all active rural
LEA consortium pathway authorizations under Subsection C of this Section.
(e) An identification of any workforce development region in which rural
LEA access to authorized pathways is disproportionately limited relative to
non-rural LEA access within the same region, or in which rural student CTE
completion rates or post-graduation outcomes are materially lower than
statewide averages for non-rural students in comparable pathways, and a
Council determination as to whether the identified disparity constitutes a
material rural access gap requiring a corrective action response.
(f) Where the Council identifies a material rural access gap under
Subparagraph (e) of this Paragraph, a Council-developed Rural Access
Corrective Action Plan specifying:
(I) The nature and geographic scope of the identified gap.
(ii) The specific outreach, technical assistance, and reduced-barrier
authorization support the Council and the Louisiana Department of Education
will provide to rural LEAs in the identified region during the subsequent
twelve-month period.
(iii) Any modifications to Council authorization procedures, timeline
accommodations, or technical assistance resources that the Council will
implement to improve rural LEA participation.
(iv) Measurable targets and a timeline against which progress on closing
the identified gap will be assessed in the subsequent year's Rural Access and
Completion Report.
(3) The Council shall transmit the Rural Access and Completion Report
required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection to the chair of the House
Committee on Education and the chair of the Senate Committee on Education
Page 111 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
not later than December 1 of each year, covering data from the preceding
academic year.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education shall provide the Council,
not later than October 1 of each year, a complete data extract containing the
pathway enrollment, completion, credential attainment, and outcome data
necessary for the Council to prepare the Rural Access and Completion Report
required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, with all data disaggregated by
LEA rural classification status consistent with Subsection A of this Section and
by the geographic disaggregation categories established in §183.19© of this
Subpart.
(5) Nothing in this Section requires a rural LEA to offer any specific
K–12 CTE pathway or limits its authority to determine, consistent with local
governance responsibilities and the pathway authorization requirements of this
Subpart, which pathways, if any, to propose for authorization.
§189.15. Postsecondary articulation and transfer credit agreements
A. Articulation agreement mandate; condition of pathway authorization
(1) As a condition of pathway authorization under §183.13, each
applicant for K–12 CTE pathway authorization shall maintain at least one
written, signed postsecondary articulation agreement between the proposing
local education agency or regional team and at least one Louisiana public
postsecondary institution, with priority given to technical and community
colleges, satisfying the requirements of this Section. The required agreement
shall be submitted to the Council as evidence of compliance in the authorization
proposal under §183.13(A)(2)(g), or the proposing party shall submit a Council-
approved compliance timeline under Subsection D in lieu of an executed
agreement.
(2) An articulation agreement required under this Subsection shall:
(a) Be signed by authorized representatives of both parties.
(b) Specify the K–12 CTE pathway or pathways to which the agreement
Page 112 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
applies and the academic year from which the credit transfer terms are
effective.
(c) Set forth minimum credit transfer terms for qualifying pathway
completers accepted at the contracting institution, consistent with
Subsection B.
(d) Specify an effective period of not fewer than five years or the pathway's
authorization period under §183.13(D), whichever is longer, subject to
annual review under Subsection F.
(e) Include a process for resolving disputes between a qualifying student and
the contracting institution regarding the student's eligibility for credit
transfer.
(3) Each executed articulation agreement required under this Section
shall be maintained in the Council's publicly accessible pathway registry,
consistent with §183.9(B)(3) and §183.9(C)(1) of this Subpart, and updated
within thirty (30) calendar days of any execution, renewal, or modification.
(4) A pathway's failure to maintain an active articulation agreement
satisfying the requirements of this Section shall constitute a failure to maintain
pathway authorization conditions under §183.13(C)(1)(e) of this Subpart and
shall trigger the mid-cycle review process under §183.13(E)(1)(e) of this
Subpart.
B. Minimum Agreement Terms; Credit Transfer Standards.
(1) Each articulation agreement required under Subsection A of this
Section shall, at a minimum, provide all of the following:
(a) A defined transfer pathway entitling students who satisfy the
completion requirements of Subparagraph (c) to postsecondary course credit
or equivalency recognition at the contracting institution in an aligned subject
area.
(b) A minimum transfer value of three postsecondary credit hours, or
one postsecondary course equivalent, in the relevant subject area or
Page 113 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
occupational domain, applied toward the student's program of study upon
enrollment.
(c) The pathway completion requirements for credit transfer eligibility,
including completion of the approved nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
under §183.10(C), attainment of the required industry-based credential under
§189.12, or both; eligibility conditions shall not conflict with §183.5(C).
(d) The procedure by which an eligible student shall document pathway
completion and request credit transfer evaluation by the contracting
postsecondary institution, which shall not require the student to bear costs
beyond those generally applicable to credit evaluation and transfer at the
institution.
(e) An annual review process consistent with Subsection F of this Section.
(2) An articulation agreement required under this Section shall not:
(a) Condition credit transfer eligibility solely on a student's enrollment
in a specific program of study at the contracting postsecondary institution,
except to the extent the transferred credit is applicable only within a defined
postsecondary program or course of study aligned to the pathway.
(b) Require a student to repeat or retake coursework that is substantially
equivalent in content to the K–12 pathway coursework for which the credit
transfer is sought.
(c) Include terms that, in practical effect, render credit transfer
inaccessible to a substantial proportion of qualifying completers through
disproportionate administrative burdens, costs, or deadlines.
(3) Nothing in this Section prevents an articulation agreement from
providing credit transfer terms more favorable than the minimums required by
Paragraph (1), including stacked credit applicable to multiple postsecondary
programs, advanced-standing placement, or equivalencies exceeding
Subparagraph (1)(b).
C. Board of Regents Coordination; Common Course Numbering
Page 114 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Framework.
(1) The Board of Regents, in coordination with the Council, shall develop
a common course numbering framework for K–12 CTE pathway courses that
facilitates consistent transfer credit evaluation by Louisiana public
postsecondary institutions. The framework shall:
(a) Assign to each authorized K–12 CTE pathway, or to defined clusters
of pathway course sequences, a standardized course identifier that Louisiana
public postsecondary education institutions may use to assess transfer credit
eligibility consistent with their institutional articulation policies and with the
minimum agreement terms required by Subsection B of this Section.
(b) Be organized by career cluster and industry sector, consistent with
the Statewide Priority Industry List established under §183.4(A) of this
Subpart, and updated to reflect additions to and removals from the Priority
Industry List as part of each Biennial Priority Review under §183.4(E) of this
Subpart.
(c) Be published on the Board of Regents' and the Council's public
websites, updated at least every two academic years.
(d) Serve as the shared reference system for all articulation agreements executed
under this Section and for the statewide articulation framework developed
under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The Board of Regents shall, not later than two years after the
effective date of this Subpart and in coordination with the Council, develop and
publish a statewide articulation framework establishing minimum transfer
credit terms applicable to all Louisiana public postsecondary education
institutions for pathway course sequences identified in the common course
numbering framework under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. The statewide
articulation framework shall:
(a) Establish minimum credit transfer terms applicable to completers of
authorized K–12 CTE pathways aligned to each industry sector on the
Page 115 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Statewide Priority Industry List.
(b) Identify the postsecondary degree programs, technical certificate
programs, and workforce certificate programs to which K–12 CTE pathway
course credit may be applied, consistent with the Board of Regents' program
approval and articulation authority under R.S. 17:3138 et seq.
(c) Be reviewed and updated by the Board of Regents, in coordination
with the Council, not less frequently than once every two academic years, to
reflect updates to the common course numbering framework and any changes
to the Statewide Priority Industry List.
(3) In developing the statewide articulation framework required under
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the Board of Regents shall consult with local
education agencies, regional teams, and public postsecondary education
institutions within each workforce development region, and shall solicit and
consider written comment from the Council before finalizing the framework.
(4) The Board of Regents shall certify to the Council and to the chairs of
the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education,
not later than December 1 of each year, the status of all articulation agreements
required under this Section, including: (a) the number of authorized pathways
for which a compliant articulation agreement is on file with the Council; (b) the
number of pathways operating under an approved compliance timeline under
Subsection D of this Section; and (c) the identification of any Louisiana public
postsecondary institution that has not, within the applicable timeline under
Subsection D, executed a required articulation agreement with a proposing
party that has made documented good-faith efforts to negotiate such an
agreement.
D. Statutory Timeline for Agreement Establishment.
(1) For pathways seeking initial authorization under §183.13 of this
Subpart, the following requirements govern submission of the articulation
agreement:
Page 116 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) A proposing party that has an executed articulation agreement
meeting Subsection B at the time of proposal submission under §183.13(A) shall
submit the agreement with the authorization proposal as required by
§183.13(A)(2)(g).
(b) A proposing party that does not yet have a fully executed articulation
agreement at the time of authorization proposal submission shall, in lieu of an
executed agreement, submit a documented compliance timeline as part of the
proposal specifying:
(i) The name of each Louisiana public postsecondary institution with
which the proposing party has been or is actively engaged in negotiations
toward execution of a qualifying articulation agreement
(ii) The credit transfer terms tentatively agreed upon or under active
discussion, to the extent then determinable.
(iii) A date certain by which a fully executed agreement will be submitted
to the Council, which shall be not later than eighteen (18) months following the
date on which the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
authorizes the pathway.
(2) The Council shall review the compliance timeline submitted under
Subparagraph (1)(b) of this Subsection as part of its written pathway
authorization recommendation under §183.13(B) of this Subpart. Approval of
a compliance timeline by the Council in its authorization recommendation
constitutes the authorization referenced in §183.13(B)(1)(f) of this Subpart and
satisfies the authorization condition of §183.13(C)(1)(e) of this Subpart for the
period during which the timeline is in effect.
(3) A pathway operating under an approved compliance timeline under
Paragraph (1)(b) shall not be subject to §183.13(H) authorization condition
failure solely because no agreement has yet been executed, provided the
proposing party is actively pursuing execution and submits a qualifying
agreement to the Council by the timeline's specified date.
Page 117 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(4) A pathway shall not receive reauthorization under §183.13(D) of this
Subpart, and shall not be approved or maintained at Tier 2 or Tier 3 pathway
designation under §183.9(D) of this Subpart, unless a fully executed articulation
agreement meeting the requirements of Subsection B of this Section is on file
with the Council at the time of the reauthorization review.
(5) Where a Louisiana public postsecondary institution identified in an
approved compliance timeline under this Subsection fails to execute a qualifying
articulation agreement within the stated timeline period, the Council shall
notify the Board of Regents. The Board of Regents shall take such action as is
within its authority under R.S. 17:3138 et seq. to facilitate execution of the
required agreement. Failure of a postsecondary institution to execute a required
agreement within the applicable timeline shall be identified in the Board of
Regents' annual certification under §183.15(C)(4) of this Subpart.
E. Compliance Mechanism; Consequences of Non-Compliance.
(1) As part of its pathway oversight functions under §183.3(I), the
Council shall monitor compliance with this Section by taking the following
actions:
(a) Require each local education agency operating an authorized
pathway to confirm in its annual pathway data submission under §183.19 of this
Subpart whether the articulation agreement required for that pathway remains
in effect and whether any material changes to the agreement have occurred
during the reporting year.
(b) Notify the Louisiana Department of Education, the Board of Regents,
and the affected postsecondary institution within thirty (30) calendar days of
the Council's determination of any compliance failure by a local education
agency related to the articulation agreement requirement of this Section.
(c) Include in the Council's annual report required under §183.3(I)(6) of
this Subpart a summary of articulation agreement compliance for all authorized
pathways statewide, identifying the number of pathways with active compliant
Page 118 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
agreements, the number operating under approved compliance timelines under
Subsection D, and the number for which the required agreement has expired,
been terminated, or remains unexecuted beyond the applicable compliance
timeline.
(2) A pathway whose articulation agreement expires or is terminated
without simultaneous execution of a replacement agreement shall be subject to
a mandatory mid-cycle review under §183.13(E)(1)(e) of this Subpart. The
Council shall notify the affected local education agency within fifteen (15)
calendar days of the Council's determination that the agreement has expired or
been terminated, and shall require the LEA to submit documentation to the
Council within sixty (60) calendar days demonstrating either:
(a) Execution of a replacement articulation agreement meeting the
requirements of Subsection B of this Section.
(b) A Council-approved compliance plan specifying a timeline of not
more than twelve (12) months within which a replacement agreement will be
executed, consistent with the requirements of Subsection D of this Section.
(3) A pathway that fails to maintain an active articulation agreement
meeting the requirements of this Section for a continuous period exceeding
twenty-four (24) months, without an approved compliance plan under
Paragraph (2)(b) of this Subsection or a Council finding of postsecondary
institutional non-cooperation under Paragraph (4) of this Subsection, shall be
subject to pathway suspension under §183.13(G) of this Subpart until a
compliant agreement is executed and submitted to the Council.
(4) Nothing in this Section requires deauthorization of a pathway solely
because a postsecondary institution failed to execute or maintain a required
agreement, where the LEA has documented good-faith efforts with at least two
Louisiana public postsecondary institutions and demonstrated that no
geographically accessible institution has agreed. In such circumstances, the
Council may continue the pathway authorization with a written finding of
Page 119 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
institutional non-cooperation, reported to the Board of Regents and legislature
under §183.15(C)(4).
F. Annual Review and Update of Articulation Agreements.
(1) Each articulation agreement required under this Section shall include
a provision for annual review by both parties by June 1 of each year to assess
whether the agreement accurately reflects the pathway's current curriculum,
credentials, and postsecondary program alignments, and whether modifications
are needed to maintain compliance with Subsection B.
(2) A local education agency operating an authorized pathway shall
notify the Council within thirty (30) calendar days of any of the following
events:
(a) Execution of a new articulation agreement or renewal of an existing
agreement covering the authorized pathway.
(b) A material modification to the credit transfer terms of an existing
articulation agreement.
(c) Expiration of an articulation agreement without simultaneous
execution of a renewal or replacement agreement.
(d) Termination or cancellation of an existing articulation agreement
prior to its stated expiration date.
(3) The Council shall maintain on its publicly accessible website, as part
of the pathway registry consistent with §183.9(B)(3) and §183.9(C)(1) of this
Subpart, a current record of all articulation agreements associated with each
authorized pathway, including the name of each contracting postsecondary
institution, the effective dates, and a summary of the credit transfer terms
applicable to pathway completers, updated within thirty (30) calendar days of
any agreement execution, renewal, modification, or termination.
(4) The Board of Regents shall include in its annual certification required
under Subsection C(4) of this Section an assessment of any patterns of
agreement non-execution, expiration without renewal, or restricted credit
Page 120 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
transfer terms that may indicate systemic barriers to postsecondary articulation
for Jump Start pathway completers, and shall transmit any such assessment to
the Council and to the chairs of the House Committee on Education and the
Senate Committee on Education.
§189.16. Tops Tech earl start linkage; financial access alignment
A. requirement for Tier 3 Pathway Authorization; TOPS Tech Early
Start Provider.
(1) As a condition of Tier 3 pathway designation under §189.9(D)(2)© of
this Subpart, each pathway seeking Tier 3 authorization shall have at least one
TOPS Tech Early Start Training Provider, approved pursuant to Bulletin 138,
Chapter 5, and consistent with R.S. 17:3048 et seq., offering pathway-aligned
occupational training within the workforce development region in which the
pathway is authorized for delivery.
(2) For purposes of this Section, a TOPS Tech Early Start Training
Provider offers "pathway-aligned training" if the provider's approved
occupational training offerings within the applicable workforce development
region:
(a) Are aligned to the same career cluster and occupational focus as the
Tier 3 K–12 CTE pathway for which Tier 3 designation is sought.
(b) Include occupational training leading to the same industry-based
credential, or a directly related credential in the same occupational domain,
required for completion of the Tier 3 pathway under §183.12 of this Subpart.
© Are offered within the applicable workforce development region or,
for rural LEAs under §189.14(A), within that region or an adjacent region
accessible to enrolled students under §189.14(D).
(3) A local education agency or regional team seeking Tier 3 pathway
designation shall document in its pathway authorization proposal under
§189.13(A) of this Subpart:
(a) The name, physical location, applicable workforce development
Page 121 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
region, and current TOPS Tech Early Start approval status of at least one
Training Provider meeting the requirements of Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this
Subsection.
(b) A description of the coordination arrangement between the local
education agency or regional team and the identified Training Provider through
which students enrolled in the Tier 3 pathway will be informed of, and provided
access to, the TOPS Tech Early Start financial access opportunity.
© Written confirmation from the identified Training Provider of its
current TOPS Tech Early Start approval status and its commitment to offer
pathway-aligned training to students enrolled in the Tier 3 pathway during the
pathway's authorization period.
(4) The Council shall verify the Training Provider arrangement under
this Subsection as part of its recommendation under §189.13(B) and each
reauthorization review under §189.13(D) and §189.13(E). Failure to maintain
a qualifying arrangement constitutes a failure of Tier 3 designation conditions
under §189.13(C)(1) and shall trigger a Council tier reassessment; if no
replacement provider is identified within twelve (12) months, the pathway may
be reclassified to Tier 2 pending restoration of a qualifying arrangement.
B. All Public High Schools; Student Advisement Obligation.
(1) Each local education agency operating an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway shall annually advise enrolled ninth through twelfth grade students in
a Jump Start pathway of the TOPS Tech Early Start program as a financial
access mechanism for postsecondary CTE training, consistent with §189.8.
(2) The advisement obligation required under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall
include, at minimum:
(a) Written or digital notification to each Jump Start-enrolled student
and the student's parent or legal guardian, at the beginning of each academic
year and at the time of ICAP annual review required under §189.7(B) of this
Subpart, of the availability of the TOPS Tech Early Start program, its
Page 122 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
applicable student eligibility requirements under R.S. 17:3048 et seq., and its
connection to the student's enrolled Jump Start pathway.
(b) Identification of any TOPS Tech Early Start Training Provider
offering pathway-aligned training accessible to the student, consistent with the
requirements of Subsection A of this Section, to the extent such a provider has
been identified in the pathway authorization proposal or through the Council's
registry §189.16(C)(2)(d) of this Section.
© Documentation of the TOPS Tech Early Start advisement provided to
each student in the counselling activity report required under §189.8(F) of this
Subpart.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Education shall develop, distribute, and
maintain standardized advisement materials explaining the TOPS Tech Early
Start program, its student eligibility requirements under R.S. 17:3048 et seq.
and Bulletin 138, and its connection to authorized K–12 CTE pathways.
Materials shall be updated at least every two years or upon any material change
to program eligibility or operational requirements, and published on the
department's public website.
C. TOPS Tech Early Start Training Provider Approval; Priority
Industry Alignment.
(1) The Louisiana Student Financial Assistance Commission, in
coordination with the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight
Council and the Louisiana Workforce Commission, shall review TOPS Tech
Early Start Training Provider approvals and renewals for alignment with the
state and regional Jump Start priority industries reflected in the Statewide
Priority Industry List and applicable Regional Priority Industry Lists
established pursuant to §189.4 of this Subpart.
(2) As part of the Training Provider approval and renewal process conducted
pursuant to Bulletin 138, Chapter 5, and R.S. 17:3048 et seq., the Louisiana
Student Financial Assistance Commission shall:
Page 123 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) Notify the Council of all pending Training Provider approvals and
renewals not less than thirty calendar days before a final approval
determination is made, including the name, location, workforce development
region, and occupational training focus of each provider under review.
(b) Give priority consideration, in approving new Training Providers
and in renewing existing Training Provider approvals, to providers offering
occupational training in industry sectors on the Statewide Priority Industry List
or the applicable Regional Priority Industry List.
© For Training Providers offering occupational training in an industry
sector not included on the applicable Priority Industry List, include in the
approval or renewal determination a documented finding, in coordination with
the Council, regarding the degree to which the provider's offerings are aligned
with or expected to become aligned with the Priority Industry List.
(d) Transmit to the Council, by October 1 of each year, a complete list
of all currently approved TOPS Tech Early Start Training Providers, organized
by workforce development region and industry sector, including for each
provider: the provider's name and location; the occupational training offerings
for which the provider is approved; the date of the provider's most recent
approval or renewal; and the provider's Priority Industry List alignment status.
(3) Where the Council determines, following a Biennial Priority Review
under §189.4(E) of this Subpart, that an industry sector to which a currently
approved TOPS Tech Early Start Training Provider is primarily aligned has
been removed from the Statewide Priority Industry List and from all applicable
Regional Priority Industry Lists, the Council shall notify the Louisiana Student
Financial Assistance Commission. Upon receiving such notification, the
Louisiana Student Financial Assistance Commission shall:
(a) Notify the affected Training Provider of the sector removal from the
applicable Priority Industry Lists and the implications for the provider's
alignment status under this Subsection.
Page 124 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(b) Include in the affected provider's next renewal determination a
documented finding regarding the provider's current Priority Industry List
alignment and whether modification of the provider's approved training
offerings or a transition period is warranted to support alignment with current
priority industries, consistent with the purposes of this Subpart.
(4) Nothing in this Section alters the authority of the Louisiana Student
Financial Assistance Commission to approve, renew, or revoke TOPS Tech
Early Start Training Provider status under R.S. 17:3048 et seq. and Bulletin
138. The coordination requirements of this Section are intended to strengthen
the alignment between Training Provider approvals and Jump Start priority
industry identification and do not supersede or modify the Louisiana Student
Financial Assistance Commission's established approval standards or authority.
§189.17. Access to career and technical education; partnering authority
A. All Public High Schools; Access Obligation.
(1) Each local education agency operating a public high school shall
provide each enrolled student access to career and technical education courses,
including authorized K–12 CTE pathways offered pursuant to this Subpart.
(2) Such access obligation includes:
(a) Ensure that at least one authorized K–12 CTE pathway is available
to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve in each public high school
operated by the local education agency, except as provided in Subsection C of
this Section.
(b) Inform enrolled students and their parents or legal guardians of
available K–12 CTE pathway options in connection with ICAP and IGP
development as required under §189.7 of this Subpart.
© Ensure that the full nine-credit Jump Start course sequence required for
Career Diploma completion under §189.10© of this Subpart is accessible to
students enrolled in an authorized pathway, either through direct course
delivery by the local education agency or through a partnering agreement
Page 125 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
established under Subsection B of this Section.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require a local education
agency to offer a pathway in an industry sector not included on the Statewide
Priority Industry List or applicable Regional Priority Industry List maintained
pursuant to §189.4 of this Subpart.
B. Partnering Authority; Agreements with Other Schools and
Institutions.
(1) If a local education agency cannot directly provide CTE courses or
an authorized K–12 CTE pathway, the local education agency may enter into
a written partnering agreement with one or more of the following entities to
provide such courses or pathway access to enrolled students.
(a) A public school or public school district in the state.
(b) A Louisiana public two-year postsecondary education institution;
© A nonprofit proprietary school approved by the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education.
(d) A Course Choice provider approved by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, consistent with R.S. 17:4002.1 et seq.
(e) A Louisiana public vocational or technical education institution,
including a Louisiana Technical College campus, with which the local
education agency has established a formal resource-sharing
arrangement pursuant to Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
(2) A partnering agreement entered into under this Subsection shall:
(a) Be in writing and executed by authorized representatives of both
parties.
(b) Specify the courses, pathways, or course sequences to which the
agreement applies and the terms under which enrolled students will
access the agreed instruction.
© Address liability, transportation responsibilities, and any cost-sharing
Page 126 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
arrangements between the parties.
(d) Be submitted to and reviewed by the Louisiana Career and Technical
Education Oversight Council as part of any regional pathway
authorization or reauthorization proposal under §183.13 of this Subpart,
to the extent the agreement supports or enables a Jump Start pathway.
(3) A partnering agreement under this Subsection may support the delivery of one
or more components of an authorized K–12 CTE pathway, including the CTE
course sequence, work-based learning activities under §183.11, and industry-
based credential preparation under §183.12 of this Subpart, but shall not
substitute for the local education agency's obligation to ensure that enrolled
students receive all required academic core courses, individual career planning,
and counselling services consistent with §183.8 and §183.10 of this Subpart.
(4) When a local education agency enters into an arrangement to share facilities,
materials, equipment, or instructors with a Louisiana public vocational or
technical institution:
(a) If students are transported to area technical colleges or vocational
institutions, the local education agency shall be responsible for the cost
of transporting such students; and
(b) Other expenses and issues, including liability, involved in sharing
resources with technical colleges or vocational institutions shall be
approved by the appropriate local school board with subsequent
approval by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(5) A regional team formed pursuant to §189.9(F) of this Subpart shall coordinate
pathway and course delivery across local education agency boundaries and may
establish cross-district enrollment agreements and program-sharing
arrangements consistent with §183.9(G) of this Subpart to support the goals of
this Section.
(6) For rural local education agencies classified under §183.14(A) of this Subpart,
Page 127 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
the partnering authority provided by this Subsection is subject to the provisions
of §189.14 of this Subpart, including consortium pathway arrangements
available to multiple rural local education agencies under §189.14©.
C. Mission-Based Waiver; BESE Authority.
(1) If the approved mission or curriculum model of a public high school does not
align with providing career and technical education courses, the governing
authority of the school may request a waiver from the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education of the access obligation established in
Subsection A of this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to
supersede R.S. 17:4002.1 et seq.
(2) A waiver request submitted under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall:
(a) Describe the school's approved mission or curriculum model and the
basis on which it does not align with providing career and technical
education courses;
(b) Identify any alternative means through which students

enrolled at the waiver-requesting school may access career and technical
education courses consistent with Subsection A of this Section, including
through partnering agreements under Subsection B of this Section; and
© Be submitted to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary

Education in a form and manner prescribed by the Board, not later than
ninety days before the start of the academic year in which the waiver
would take effect.
(3) A waiver granted under this Subsection shall be reviewed by the

Board not less frequently than once every five years to assess whether the
mission or curriculum basis for the waiver remains valid.
D. No Student Course Fee; Career Development Funds.

No student shall be assessed a course fee for enrollment in a career and

technical education course or authorized K–12 CTE pathway when the local
Page 128 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
education agency receives career development funds in the minimum
foundation program allocated for such course or pathway. This Subsection shall
not be construed to prevent a local education agency from accepting equipment,
materials, or other in-kind contributions from employer partners pursuant to
employer partnership agreements established under §183.11© of this Subpart.

§183.18. PROGRAM DELIVERY METHODS; INSTRUCTOR

QUALIFICATIONS AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT

A. Methods of Program Development and Curriculum Design Options.
(1) To develop and implement an authorized career major program within a K–12
CTE pathway, a local education agency may use any of the following program
development methods:
(a) System-wide development, in which the local education agency develops
a uniform career major program across all schools under the agency's
jurisdiction;
(b) Individual school development, in which each school within the local
education agency develops its own career major program aligned with
the agency's authorized pathways; or
© Consortium development, in which the local education agency
collaborates with one or more other local education agencies or a
regional team formed pursuant to §183.9(F) of this Subpart to jointly
develop and deliver a career major program.
(2) The following curriculum design options are available for authorized career
major programs:
(a) Block scheduling arrangements that allow a student to accumulate
Carnegie units in alignment with the nine-credit Jump Start course
sequence established in §183.10© of this Subpart;
Page 129 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(b) Coordination of available elective credits into a coherent, sequenced
career major program aligned with an authorized pathway;
© State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education-approved new
courses developed to meet the academic and technical requirements of
an authorized pathway;
(d) Sharing of facilities, materials, equipment, and instructors with
vocational and technical colleges consistent with §183.17(B)(4) of this
Subpart;
(e) Organization of new courses in accordance with the appropriate state-
adopted career clusters and the Statewide Priority Industry List
established under §183.4 of this Subpart; and
(f) Arrangements for students to complete work-based learning activities,
including job shadowing, mentoring, paid or unpaid internships, pre-
apprenticeships, community service projects, school-based enterprises,
and early admission to postsecondary education or training, consistent
with the work-based learning quality standards and tiered requirements
established in §183.11 of this Subpart.
(3) Each local education agency shall submit proposed career major program
curricula to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for
approval in accordance with §183.10(F) of this Subpart.
B. Career and Technical Instructor Qualifications.
(1) An instructor assigned to teach a career and technical education course within
an authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall meet at least one of the following
qualification standards:
(a) Hold a valid teaching certificate issued in accordance with Bulletin 746
— Louisiana Standards for State Certification of School Personnel — in
the applicable career and technical education subject area; or
(b) Be in compliance with the reciprocal instructor certification policy
Page 130 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
established by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
for instructors who reside in other states but are employed by authorized
course providers and satisfy applicable state certification requirements
pursuant to state law.
(2) In addition to Paragraph (1), the Louisiana Department of Education shall, in
coordination with the Council and the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education, establish minimum industry-experience standards for
instructors assigned to career and technical education courses in pathways
aligned to priority occupations under §183.4 of this Subpart. Such standards
shall:
(a) Require, at a minimum, that instructors in designated technical
pathway courses hold, or demonstrate the ability to obtain within a
Department-specified timeframe, the industry-based credential required
for student completion of the applicable pathway under §183.12 of this
Subpart;
(b) Recognize demonstrated industry experience in the relevant career field
as a qualification pathway for alternative certification or provisional
authorization, consistent with alternative certification procedures
established by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education;
and
© Be established not later than one hundred eighty (180) calendar days
following the effective date of this Subpart and updated as necessary to
reflect changes in priority occupation requirements and industry-based
credential standards.
(3) As a condition of pathway authorization under §183.13 of this Subpart, the
Council shall require applicants to submit, as part of the authorization proposal
under §183.13(A), an instructor staffing plan demonstrating how all assigned
instructors will meet the qualification standards of this Subsection throughout
the authorization period.
Page 131 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(4) A local education agency unable to identify a qualified instructor under
Paragraph (1) or (2) for a specific CTE course within an authorized pathway
may, upon written acknowledgment from the Louisiana Department of
Education:
(a) Contract with an approved postsecondary institution, technical college,
or other provider authorized under §183.17(B) of this Subpart to deliver
the affected course through a formal instructional partnership
agreement; or
(b) Deliver the affected course through technology-aided instruction
consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
C. Staff Development and Professional Development Standards; LDE Role.
(1) Each instructor assigned to teach a career and technical education course
within an authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall receive staff development and
in-service training addressing both the technical content of the applicable career
field and effective instructional strategies for CTE delivery, aligned with the
career major program requirements.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Education shall:
(a) Establish minimum professional development requirements for career
and technical education instructors, consistent with the industry-
experience standards required under Subsection B(2) of this Section and
aligned with the credential requirements of §189.12 of this Subpart;
(b) Develop and maintain a schedule of approved professional development
opportunities for career and technical education instructors, including
opportunities to update industry knowledge, renew required industry-
based credentials, and develop instructional capacity in high-priority
pathway content areas aligned to the Statewide Priority Industry List
under §183.4 of this Subpart;
© Coordinate with the regional teams established under §183.9(F) of this
Page 132 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subpart to identify and communicate regional employer partners willing
to provide technical training or workplace exposure opportunities to
career and technical education instructors; and
(d) Include in the annual report under §183.19 a summary of professional
development participation by career and technical education instructors,
disaggregated by pathway and workforce development region.
(3) Any instructor assigned to teach an applied course of instruction who was not
previously certified or trained in the applicable content area shall receive
appropriate staff development and in-service training before assuming sole
instructional responsibility for the course, or shall be supervised by a qualified
instructor until such training is completed.
(4) Local education agencies shall document professional development activities
completed by each instructor assigned to a career and technical education
course within an authorized pathway and shall make such records available to
the Louisiana Department of Education and the Council upon request as part
of pathway oversight under §183.3(I) of this Subpart.
D. Alternative Delivery; Technology-Aided Instruction.
(1) An authorized K–12 CTE pathway course may be delivered through
technology-aided instruction, including virtual, online, or blended delivery
methods, in any of the following circumstances:
(a) A qualified instructor meeting the standards of Subsection B of this
Section is unavailable to provide direct instruction for the course;
(b) The local education agency determines that technology-aided
instruction represents the most practicable means of providing pathway
access to students in rural or geographically remote locations, consistent
with the rural access provisions of §189.14 of this Subpart; or
© Technology-aided instruction supplements and supports classroom
instruction, including through digital learning tools, simulations, or
Page 133 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
virtual work-based learning components endorsed by the applicable
regional team and consistent with the work-based learning standards of
§183.11 of this Subpart.
(2) Technology-aided instruction delivered under this Subsection shall:
(a) Satisfy the curriculum and course sequence requirements applicable to
the authorized pathway under §189.10 of this Subpart;
(b) Be offered through a provider or platform reviewed and approved by
the Louisiana Department of Education; and
© Include appropriate supervision and quality assurance arrangements,
including identification of a local education agency contact responsible
for monitoring student progress in the technology-aided course.
(3) Technology-aided instruction alone shall not substitute for the work-based
learning placements required under §189.11 of this Subpart. In pathways
delivered primarily or substantially through technology-aided instruction, local
education agencies shall maintain active employer partnerships under §189.11©
of this Subpart to ensure that students have access to required work-based
learning experiences at the minimum tier level required by §189.11(B) of this
Subpart.
E. Faculty Composition Requirements; Career and Technical Instructors and
Academic Teachers.
(1) The faculty for a career major program within an authorized K–12 CTE
pathway shall include both:
(a) Career and technical instructors who meet the qualification standards
of Subsection B of this Section and who are responsible for delivering the
CTE course sequence within the career major program; and
(b) Academic teachers trained to integrate the academic core requirements
— English, mathematics, science, and social studies — with the technical
content of the career major program.
Page 134 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(2) A local education agency may employ, on a shared or part-time basis, a career
and technical instructor who also holds a teaching or instructional assignment
at an area vocational-technical school or Louisiana Technical College campus,
with approval of the local school board and BESE, and consistent with the
resource-sharing arrangements permitted under §189.17(B)(4) of this Subpart.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in coordination with
the Louisiana Department of Education and the Council, shall adopt rules
establishing minimum faculty composition requirements for authorized K–12
CTE pathways. Such rules shall address the qualifications required of both
career and technical instructors and academic teachers assigned to career
major programs and shall incorporate the minimum industry-experience
standards established pursuant to Subsection B(2) of this Section.



§183.19. DATA COLLECTION, REPORTING, AND PUBLIC

TRANSPARENCY

A. Annual Public Jump Start Data Report; Mandate and Publication Deadline.
(1) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish annually a
comprehensive public report on the Jump Start career and technical education
program (the "Jump Start Annual Data Report"). The report shall be publicly
available on the Louisiana Department of Education's official website not later
than January 1 of each year, covering data from the prior academic year.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Education shall transmit the Jump Start Annual
Data Report to each of the following recipients not later than the publication
deadline established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection:
(a) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council;
(b) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education;
Page 135 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
© The chair of the House Committee on Education and the chair of the
Senate Committee on Education of the Louisiana Legislature; and
(d) The Governor.
(3) Each Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be published in a format and at a
level of detail sufficient to allow members of the public, students, families,
employers, and policymakers to assess the performance, equity, and workforce
alignment of the Jump Start CTE program at the statewide, regional pathway,
and local education agency levels.
B. Required Data Elements; Minimum Statutory Floor.
(1) Each Jump Start Annual Data Report shall include, at a minimum, all of the
following data elements. All pathway-level performance metrics reported under
this Subsection shall use the standardized metrics established and updated by
the Council pursuant to §189.3(I)(2) of this Subpart, ensuring consistency
between the internal shared performance framework and the public report.:
(a) The number of CTE concentrators, as defined in §189.2(D) of this
Subpart, enrolled in each authorized K–12 CTE pathway, disaggregated
by pathway, industry sector, workforce development region, and grade
level;
(b) The number of CTE completers, as defined in §189.2(E) of this Subpart,
including both those who earned a Career Diploma under §189.5 of this
Subpart and those who completed all pathway requirements without
electing a Career Diploma, disaggregated by pathway and industry
sector;
© Credential attainment rates, including the percentage of CTE
concentrators who earned at least one industry-based credential,
disaggregated by pathway and credential tier as established under
§189.12 of this Subpart;
(d) Work-based learning participation rates, including the percentage of
CTE concentrators participating in work-based learning activities and
Page 136 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
the tier of participation consistent with the tiered work-based learning
requirements of §189.11(B) of this Subpart;
(e) Early postsecondary credit participation rates, including dual
enrollment participation rates, articulated credit participation rates, and
TOPS Tech Early Start participation rates, each reported by authorized
pathway, consistent with the postsecondary articulation framework of
§189.15 and the TOPS Tech Early Start linkage requirements of §189.16
of this Subpart;
(f) Post-graduation transitions and outcomes, including all of the following,
measured using enhanced wage record data obtained through the cross-
agency data sharing agreement required under Subsection E of this
Section and collected at the intervals specified in Subsection D of this
Section:
(i) Postsecondary enrollment rates for Career Diploma graduates
within twelve (12) months of graduation, disaggregated by type
of postsecondary institution;
(ii) Employment rates for Career Diploma graduates within twelve
(12) months of graduation;
(iii) Post-graduation employment rates and median wages for
Career Diploma holders at one (1) year following graduation;
and
(iv) Post-graduation employment rates and median wages for Career
Diploma holders at three (3) years following graduation;
(g) The statutory alignment metric required under Subsection F of this
Section;
(h) A summary of professional development participation by career and
technical education instructors, disaggregated by pathway and
workforce development region, as required under §183.18(C)(2)(d) of
this Subpart; and
Page 137 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(i) TOPS Tech Early Start program data required under §189.16 of this
Subpart, including the number of approved TOPS Tech Early Start
training providers by authorized K–12 CTE pathway and workforce
development region, the rate at which CTE concentrators enrolled in
Tier 3 pathways designated under §189.9(D)(2)© of this Subpart
accessed TOPS Tech Early Start financial assistance, and, to the extent
available through the cross-agency data sharing agreement required
under Subsection E of this Section, postsecondary continuation and
credential completion outcomes for TOPS Tech Early Start recipients,
each disaggregated by pathway and student characteristic category
consistent with Subsection C of this Section.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prevent the Louisiana
Department of Education from including additional data elements in the Jump
Start Annual Data Report beyond the minimum floor established in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, provided that all additional elements are consistent with
the privacy protections established in Subsection G of this Section.
C. Student Disaggregation; Statutory Obligation.
(1) All data elements reported in the Jump Start Annual Data Report under
Subsection B of this Section shall be disaggregated, to the extent data are
available and the aggregate reporting thresholds established in Subsection G of
this Section permit, by all of the following student characteristic categories:
(a) Race or ethnicity;
(b) Household income or economic disadvantage status, determined using
eligibility for free or reduced-price lunch under the National School
Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq., or any successor federal eligibility
criteria;
© Rural or urban geographic classification of the student's enrolled school,
using the rural local education agency designation criteria established
in §189.14(A) of this Subpart;
Page 138 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) Disability status, including students with disabilities receiving services
under an Individualized Education Program pursuant to the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.; and
(e) English learner status.
(2) The student disaggregation requirement established in this Subsection is a
standalone statutory obligation applicable to the Jump Start Annual Data
Report published under Subsection A of this Section. This obligation is
independent of, and supplementary to, any equity disaggregation requirements
applicable to the shared performance framework under §189.3(I)(2)(a) of this
Subpart.
D. Enhanced Wage Record Data Elements; Collection Intervals.
(1) For purposes of producing the post-graduation outcome data required under
Subsection B(1)(f) of this Section, the Louisiana Department of Education, in
coordination with the Louisiana Workforce Commission, shall collect all
enhanced wage record data, as defined in §189.2(G) of this Subpart, at the
following intervals following the graduation date of each Career Diploma
holder:
(a) Six (6) months post-graduation;
(b) Twelve (12) months post-graduation; and
© Thirty-six (36) months post-graduation.
(2) The Louisiana Workforce Commission shall compile enhanced wage record
data at each collection interval specified in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and
transmit such data to the Louisiana Department of Education pursuant to the
cross-agency data sharing agreement required under Subsection E of this
Section, in sufficient time to allow incorporation of the most recently available
twelve-month and thirty-six-month interval data into the Jump Start Annual
Data Report published under Subsection A of this Section on or before January
1 of each year.
(3) Enhanced wage record data collected under this Subsection shall include all
Page 139 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
data elements specified in the definition of "enhanced wage record" in
§189.2(G) of this Subpart not already collected by LWC.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Education and the Louisiana Workforce
Commission shall jointly establish procedures for matching Career Diploma
graduate records with employer quarterly wage submissions in a manner
consistent with the data privacy requirements of Subsection G of this Section
and applicable provisions of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
governing the confidentiality of Louisiana Workforce Commission wage data.
E. Cross-Agency Data Sharing Agreement; LDE, LWC, Board of Regents.
(1) The Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce
Commission, and the Louisiana Board of Regents shall enter into a written,
formal cross-agency data sharing agreement for the purpose of enabling the
Louisiana Department of Education to access the data necessary to produce the
post-graduation tracking, postsecondary continuation, and workforce outcome
metrics required by Subsection B of this Section and the enhanced wage record
data collection required by Subsection D of this Section.
(2) The cross-agency data sharing agreement required under this Subsection shall:
(a) Be fully executed by all three agencies not later than one hundred eighty
(180) calendar days following the effective date of this Subpart;
(b) Specify the categories of data to be shared by each agency, the specific
data fields to be transmitted, the frequency and format of data
transmission, and the permitted uses of shared data, consistent with
applicable federal and state privacy law;
© Designate a data custodian within each agency responsible for ensuring
compliance with the terms of the agreement and with applicable data
privacy requirements, including the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (FERPA), and the confidentiality
provisions of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes governing
Louisiana Workforce Commission wage records;
Page 140 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(d) Establish data security protocols and procedures for the handling,
storage, transmission, and destruction of shared data; and
(e) Include provisions for annual review and renewal of the agreement and
a process for resolving disputes among the agencies regarding data
access, data quality, or compliance.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the sharing of
individually identifiable student data with the public. All data made publicly
available in the Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be subject to the
aggregate reporting thresholds and privacy protections established in
Subsection G of this Section.
(4) If the Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce
Commission, or the Louisiana Board of Regents determines that an existing
interagency agreement already satisfies the requirements of this Subsection in
whole or in part, the relevant agency or agencies shall certify in writing to the
Council, within ninety calendar days of the effective date of this Subpart, that
the existing agreement satisfies the applicable statutory requirements and shall
identify any modifications required to bring the existing agreement into full
compliance with this Section.
F. Statutory Alignment Metric; Annual Reporting Obligation.
(1) The Jump Start Annual Data Report published under Subsection A of this
Section shall include a statutory alignment metric measuring, for the most
recently completed academic year, the percentage of CTE completers, as
defined in §189.2(E) of this Subpart, who completed a K–12 CTE pathway
aligned to an occupation included on the Statewide Priority Industry List or an
applicable Regional Priority Industry List maintained pursuant to §183.4 of this
Subpart.
(2) The statutory alignment metric shall be:
(a) Calculated annually by the Louisiana Department of Education using
pathway enrollment and completion data linked to the Priority
Page 141 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Occupation designations in effect during the applicable academic year
as maintained by the Council under §189.4 of this Subpart;
(b) Reported in the Jump Start Annual Data Report at both the statewide
level and disaggregated by workforce development region; and©
Considered by the Council in the biennial Priority Industry List
review required under §189.4(E) of this Subpart to assess whether the
distribution of authorized pathways reflects current and projected state
and regional workforce development priorities.
(3) A statutory alignment metric result falling below seventy percent at
the statewide level for two consecutive academic years shall be reported by the
Council to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education with a
written analysis of contributing factors and a recommendation for corrective
action, including any proposed adjustments to Priority Industry List
designations under §183.4 of this Subpart or to pathway authorization criteria
under §189.13 of this Subpart.
G. Privacy Protections; Aggregate Reporting Requirements.
(1) All data published in the Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be presented in
aggregate form only. No individually identifiable student data shall be disclosed
in any public report published under this Section.
(2) For purposes of the equity disaggregation required by Subsection C of this
Section and any other disaggregated data element included in the Jump Start
Annual Data Report, the Louisiana Department of Education shall apply the
following aggregate reporting thresholds to prevent the identification of
individual students from publicly reported data:
(a) No disaggregated cell in any publicly reported data table shall report
data for a student subgroup of fewer than ten (10) students;
(b) Where a disaggregated subgroup falls below the threshold established
in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, the data for that subgroup shall
be suppressed in the published report and noted as suppressed due to
Page 142 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
small sample size; and
© The Louisiana Department of Education shall apply complementary
suppression techniques, as necessary and consistent with recognized data
privacy standards, to prevent the mathematical derivation of a
suppressed cell's value from other publicly available data within the
same table.
(3) The data privacy protections established in this Subsection shall be consistent
with and no less protective than the requirements of the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (FERPA), and any applicable
Louisiana statutes governing the privacy of student records.
(4) Enhanced wage record data obtained through the cross-agency data sharing
agreement required by Subsection E of this Section shall be subject to the
confidentiality protections applicable to Louisiana Workforce Commission
wage records under Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes and shall not be
used for any purpose other than the production of the aggregate outcome data
required by this Section.
H. Perkins V Compliance; Coordination with Federal Reporting Obligations.
(1) The Louisiana Department of Education shall, to the maximum extent
practicable, coordinate the data collection procedures, reporting timelines, and
data element definitions used for the Jump Start Annual Data Report under this
Section with Louisiana's obligations to submit Annual Performance Reports to
the United States Department of Education under the Carl D. Perkins Career
and Technical Education Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 2323 (Perkins V).
(2) For purposes of this coordination:
(a) The data elements required under Subsection B of this Section shall be
defined, to the extent consistent with this Section's requirements, using
the standardized performance indicator definitions established under
Perkins V, including the core indicators for secondary CTE
concentrators under 20 U.S.C. § 2323(b)(2), to minimize duplicative data
Page 143 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
collection and reporting obligations for local education agencies.
(b) The Louisiana Department of Education shall assess annually whether
the Jump Start Annual Data Report meets or exceeds Louisiana's state-
level reporting requirements under 20 U.S.C. § 2323 and shall document
the coordination and any material differences between the two reporting
systems.
© Where the data elements or reporting standards required by this Section
exceed the federal Perkins V reporting floor, the more stringent state
requirements of this Section shall apply and govern the content of the
Jump Start Annual Data Report.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to limit the obligations of the
Louisiana Department of Education under this Section to the minimum
requirements imposed by federal Perkins V law. The Jump Start Annual Data
Report is a state public transparency instrument and shall be published
annually regardless of any change in Louisiana's federal Perkins V funding
status or any modification of federal reporting requirements.

§183.20. RETURN ON INVESTMENT INTEGRATION; ACT

187 STATUTORY CROSS-REFERENCE AND EXPANSION

A. Formal Cross-Reference to R.S. 17:3138.13; Statutory Integration Requirement.
(1) The return on investment analysis conducted annually by the Louisiana
Workforce Commission pursuant to R.S. 17:3138.13, as expanded and amended
by this Section, is hereby formally integrated into the Jump Start career and
technical education governance framework established by this Subpart. The Act
187 return on investment report shall serve as a primary data instrument for
Jump Start pathway accountability, and all references in this Subpart to "the
Act 187 return on investment analysis" or "the Act 187 ROI report" shall be
construed as references to R.S. 17:3138.13, as amended.
Page 144 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(2) The formal statutory integration required by this Section shall operate as
follows:
(a) The Act 187 return on investment analysis, as expanded under
Subsections B and C of this Section, shall constitute the primary
longitudinal wage and employment outcome data source for the post-
graduation tracking metrics required in §189.19(B)(1)(f) of this Subpart
and the statutory alignment metric required in §189.19(F) of this
Subpart;
(b) The Council's shared performance framework established under
§189.3(I)(2) of this Subpart shall incorporate ROI metrics consistent
with R.S. 17:3138.13, as amended, as provided in §189.3(I)(2)(f) of this
Subpart; and
© Act 187 ROI findings shall be incorporated into pathway reauthorization
review by the Council as required under §183.13(F)(1)(e) and
§189.13(F)(2) of this Subpart.
B. Expansion of Act 187 Scope; Amendment to R.S. 17:3138.13.
(1) R.S. 17:3138.13 is hereby amended to expand the scope of the Louisiana
Workforce Commission's annual return on investment analysis beyond students
who earn industry-based credentials to include all CTE completers as defined
in §189.2(E) of this Subpart. As amended, R.S. 17:3138.13 shall require the
Louisiana Workforce Commission's annual ROI analysis to cover the following
populations:
(a) All CTE pathway completers who earned a Career Diploma under
§189.5 of this Subpart, including those who did and those who did not
earn an industry-based credential;
(b) CTE concentrators, as defined in §183.2(D) of this Subpart, who
completed the Jump Start pathway course sequence but did not elect to
receive a Career Diploma; and
© Students who earned one or more industry-based credentials under
Page 145 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
§189.12 of this Subpart regardless of whether they elected a Career
Diploma.
(2) As amended by this Section, R.S. 17:3138.13 shall require the annual ROI
analysis to be reported at the pathway level, disaggregated by credential type,
industry sector, and workforce development region, to enable identification of
high-performing and underperforming pathways within the same industry
sector. Summary-level statewide reporting alone shall not satisfy the pathway-
level disaggregation requirement of this Paragraph.
(3) The Louisiana Workforce Commission, in collaboration with the Louisiana
Department of Education, shall establish procedures for identifying and
matching the expanded population of CTE pathway completers described in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection within the Louisiana Workforce Commission's
wage record data system, in a manner consistent with the cross-agency data
sharing agreement required under §189.19(E) of this Subpart.
C. Required Additional Metrics; Amendment to R.S. 17:3138.13.
(1) R.S. 17:3138.13 is hereby further amended to require the Louisiana Workforce
Commission's annual return on investment report to include all of the following
metrics in addition to those required under the existing provisions of that
statute:
(a) Postsecondary continuation rates, defined as the percentage of CTE
completers who enrolled in a Louisiana public technical college,
community college, or four-year postsecondary institution within twelve
(12) months of high school graduation, reported at the pathway level and
disaggregated by institution type;
(b) Credential stackability metrics, defined as the percentage of CTE
completers who earned one or more additional postsecondary
credentials, industry certifications, or academic degrees within thirty-six
(36) months of high school graduation, reported at the pathway level;
© Regional labor market alignment data, defined as the percentage of CTE
Page 146 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
pathway completers employed within twelve (12) months of graduation
in an occupation aligned with their completed K–12 CTE pathway, using
Standard Occupational Classification (SOC) codes to establish
alignment, reported by workforce development region; and
(d) Demographic disaggregation of all metrics required by R.S. 17:3138.13
and this Section, by race or ethnicity, household income or economic
disadvantage status, gender, and geographic region, consistent with the
equity disaggregation categories established in §183.19© of this Subpart.
(2) The additional metrics required under this Subsection shall be included in the
annual ROI report submitted by the Louisiana Workforce Commission to the
legislature, the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, and the
Council under R.S. 17:3138.13 not later than February 1 of each year,
beginning with the first report due following the first full academic year after
the effective date of this Subpart.
(3) The Louisiana Workforce Commission may coordinate with the Louisiana
Board of Regents and the Louisiana Department of Education, consistent with
the cross-agency data sharing agreement required under §189.19(E) of this
Subpart, to obtain postsecondary enrollment, credential completion, and
program of study data necessary to produce the metrics required by this
Subsection.
D. Oversight Council; Act 187 Report Receipt; Formal Recommendation Obligation.
(1) The Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council shall
formally receive the annual return on investment report submitted by the
Louisiana Workforce Commission under R.S. 17:3138.13, as amended by this
Section, as a standing item of the Council's governance responsibilities.
(2) Not later than sixty (60) calendar days following the Council's receipt of each
annual Act 187 ROI report, the Council shall issue a formal written
recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
addressing all of the following:
Page 147 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(a) A summary of the ROI findings contained in the annual report, at both
the statewide level and disaggregated by workforce development region
and pathway sector;
(b) Identification of any authorized K–12 CTE pathway for which the Act
187 ROI analysis reveals wage outcomes or employment rates falling
below the minimum performance thresholds established in Subsection
F of this Section;
© Recommended actions for pathways identified under Subparagraph (b)
of this Paragraph, which may include pathway modification
requirements, a mandatory mid-cycle review under §183.13(E) of this
Subpart, enhanced employer partnership or credential requirements, or,
where warranted, recommendation of pathway suspension; and
(d) Any recommended adjustments to the Statewide Priority Industry List
or Regional Priority Industry Lists maintained under §189.4 of this
Subpart, based on the ROI findings and regional labor market
alignment data required under Subsection C of this Section.
(3) The formal written recommendation issued by the Council under Paragraph (2)
of this Subsection shall be transmitted to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education and shall be made publicly available on the Council's
official website not later than ten (10) calendar days following its adoption by
the Council.
E. BESE Written Response Requirement; Public Findings.
(1) Not later than ninety calendar days following receipt of the Council's formal
written recommendation under Subsection D of this Section, the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall issue a written public response to
each recommendation contained therein.
(2) The written public response required under this Subsection shall:
(a) Address each specific recommendation made by the Council pursuant
to Subsection D(2) of this Section;
Page 148 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
(b) State whether BESE accepts, modifies, or declines to act on each Council
recommendation, and provide a written explanation for each departure
from a Council recommendation consistent with the general written
findings requirement of §189.3(K) of this Subpart; and
© If BESE declines to act on a Council recommendation that a specific
pathway be subject to mid-cycle review or suspension based on Act 187
ROI findings, provide a written explanation of the specific operational,
equity, or regional economic justification for continued authorization
and identify any alternative corrective measures BESE requires of the
relevant local education agency or regional team.
(3) The written public response of BESE required by this Subsection shall be made
available on the State Board's official public website not later than ten (10)
calendar days following adoption of the response by BESE. The Louisiana
Department of Education shall include a summary of BESE's responses to
Council ROI-based recommendations in the Jump Start Annual Data Report
published under §189.19(A) of this Subpart.
F. Minimum Performance Thresholds; Pathway Authorization Standards.
(1) As a condition of pathway authorization and reauthorization under §189.13 of
this Subpart, each authorized K–12 CTE pathway shall meet or exceed the
following minimum economic return performance thresholds, as measured by
the Act 187 annual ROI analysis conducted pursuant to R.S. 17:3138.13, as
amended by this Section, over the applicable measurement period established
in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection:
(a) An employment rate threshold of not less than sixty percent (60%) of
CTE completers, as defined in §189.2(E) of this Subpart, employed in
any occupation within twelve (12) months of graduation, as measured
using enhanced wage record data.
(b) A wage outcome threshold under which the median wage of employed
CTE completers at one (1) year post-graduation equals or exceeds the
Page 149 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
median wage for workers without a postsecondary credential in the same
workforce development region, as determined using Louisiana
Workforce Commission regional wage data updated not less than
annually.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection:
(a) Minimum performance thresholds shall be evaluated as part of every
pathway reauthorization review conducted under §183.13(F) of this
Subpart, using the most recently available Act 187 ROI report.
(b) A pathway that fails to meet one or more thresholds established in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection for two (2) consecutive Act 187
reporting cycles shall be subject to mandatory mid-cycle review under
§189.13(E)(1)(d) of this Subpart, unless the Council, by majority vote,
determines that identifiable extraordinary circumstances outside the
control of the local education agency or regional team explain the below-
threshold performance.
(3) The minimum performance thresholds established in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection are distinct from and supplementary to the credential attainment
threshold established in §189.13(F)(1)© of this Subpart. A pathway must satisfy
both sets of performance standards to maintain authorization under §189.13 of
this Subpart.
(4) The Council may, by rule adopted in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., establish minimum performance thresholds
more stringent than the floors established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
or establish differentiated thresholds for specific pathway tiers as designated
under §189.9(D) of this Subpart, provided that no threshold adopted by rule
shall be less stringent than the minimums established in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection.
G. Bulletin 138 Conforming Direction; Minimum Performance Standards.
(1) Not later than one hundred eighty calendar days following the effective date of
Page 150 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
this Subpart, the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
amend Bulletin 138 (LAC Title 28, Part CLXIII), including specifically the
program evaluation criteria of §301 of Bulletin 138, to conform to the minimum
performance thresholds and Act 187 ROI integration requirements established
in this Section. As amended, Bulletin 138 §301 shall:
(a) Incorporate the Act 187 ROI metrics specified in R.S. 17:3138.13, as
amended by this Section, as mandatory criteria within the five-year
pathway evaluation and reauthorization process;
(b) Reflect the minimum performance thresholds for employment rates and
wage outcomes established in Subsection F of this Section as enforceable
pathway reauthorization standards; and
© Align Bulletin 138's pathway evaluation criteria with the biennial priority
industry review process established under §189.4(E) of this Subpart, to
ensure that administrative standards reflect updates to Priority Industry
List designations.
(2) Any provision of Bulletin 138 (LAC Title 28, Part CLXIII) that is inconsistent
with or sets a lower standard than the requirements of this Section shall, upon
the effective date of this Subpart, be of no effect to the extent of the
inconsistency. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
complete the conforming Bulletin 138 amendments required by this Subsection
through emergency rulemaking under R.S. 49:953(B) if necessary to avoid a
period of inconsistency between statute and administrative rule.
(3) The Council shall monitor compliance with the conforming direction required
by this Subsection and shall report to the legislature not later than two hundred
forty (240) calendar days following the effective date of this Subpart on the
status of Bulletin 138 amendments required by this Section, including whether
emergency rulemaking was required and the anticipated effective date of all
required amendments.
Page 151 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
§183.22. SEVERABILITY; IMPLEMENTATION;

APPLICABILITY; EFFECTIVE DATE

A. Severability.
(1) If any provision of this Subpart, or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity
shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Subpart that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Subpart are declared severable.

(2) For purposes of this Subsection, any pathway authorization, credential tier
designation, or Council recommendation made under this Subpart prior to a
judicial determination of invalidity of any portion of this Subpart shall remain
valid and in force to the extent consistent with the remaining provisions of this
Subpart.
B. Phased Implementation Schedule.
(1) Phase 1 — Foundation (Effective Date through Day 90). Not later than ninety
calendar days following the effective date established in §189.22(E)(1) of this
Subpart, all of the following shall be completed:
(a) The governor shall make initial appointments to all voting member positions
on the Louisiana Career and Technical Education Oversight Council pursuant
to §189.3(C)(2) of this Subpart;
(b) The Louisiana Department of Education shall establish the administrative and
staff support infrastructure required to support Council operations pursuant
to §189.3(M)(3) of this Subpart;
© The Louisiana Department of Education shall initiate the process of transmitting
to the Council such existing Jump Start program data, pathway authorization
Page 152 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
records, credential tier designations, and industry priority determinations as
are necessary to allow the Council to perform its initial duties; and
(d) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall transmit to the
Council a preliminary list of rules, bulletins, and guidance documents that
require amendment to conform to this Subpart, as required under
§189.22(D)(2) of this Subpart.
(2) Phase 2 — Initial Operational Readiness (Day 91 through Day 180). Not later than
one hundred eighty (180) calendar days following the effective date established in
§189.22(E)(1) of this Subpart, all of the following shall be completed:
(a) The Council shall hold its organizational meeting, elect officers pursuant to
§183.3(G) of this Subpart, and adopt bylaws and operating procedures pursuant
to §189.3(I)(7) of this Subpart;
(b) The Council shall establish the initial Statewide Priority Industry List pursuant
to §189.4(A)(3) of this Subpart;
© The Louisiana Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission,
and the Louisiana Board of Regents shall execute the cross-agency data sharing
agreement required pursuant to §189.19(E)(2)(a) of this Subpart;
(d) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall amend Bulletin
138 (LAC 28, Part CLXIII), including §301 thereof, to conform to the minimum
performance thresholds and Act 187 ROI integration requirements established
in §189.20(G)(1) of this Subpart;
(e) The Louisiana Department of Education shall publish the initial approved
career coaching vendor list pursuant to §183.8(D) of this Subpart; and
(f) The Louisiana Student Financial Assistance Commission shall certify to the
Council its compliance with the TOPS program coordination requirements
established in §189.21(J)(3) of this Subpart.
(3) Phase 3 — Pathway Authorization Cycle Initiation (Day 181 through End of Year
1). Not later than one (1) year following the effective date established in §189.22(E)(1)
Page 153 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
of this Subpart, all of the following shall be completed:
(a) The Council shall begin accepting pathway authorization proposals pursuant
to §189.13(A) of this Subpart under the standards established in this Subpart;
(b) Each regional team in operation as of the effective date of this Subpart shall
submit to the Council a proposed Regional Priority Industry List pursuant to
§189.4(F)(3) of this Subpart;
© The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall amend all
applicable provisions of Bulletin 741 (LAC 28:CXV) to reflect the computer
science credit consolidation required by §189.21(B)(4) of this Subpart, the
accountability system integration required by §189.21(C)(2) of this Subpart, and
the curriculum standards compatibility required by §189.21(H)(3) of this
Subpart; and
(d) All local education agencies shall initiate the ICAP process for incoming
seventh grade students pursuant to §189.7(A) of this Subpart beginning with the
first academic year commencing after the effective date of this Subpart.
(4) Phase 4 — Full Program Architecture Implementation (Year 2). Not later than two
(2) years following the effective date established in §189.22(E)(1) of this Subpart, all of
the following shall be completed:
(a) The Board of Regents shall, in coordination with the Council, develop and
publish the statewide articulation framework establishing minimum transfer
credit terms pursuant to §189.15(C)(2) of this Subpart;
(b) The Council shall complete the initial tier designation review for all pathways
authorized under the new framework pursuant to §189.9(D) of this Subpart;
and
© Regional teams shall submit updated Regional Priority Industry Lists following
the Council's completion of the first Biennial Priority Review required pursuant
to §189.4(E) of this Subpart.
(5) Phase 5 — Steady-State Operation (Year 4 and Beyond). By the beginning of the
Page 154 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
fourth academic year following the effective date established in §189.22(E)(1) of this
Subpart, all of the following milestones shall have been achieved:
(a) All authorized Jump Start pathways shall have been reviewed by the Council
under the standards of this Subpart and shall have received a tier designation
under §189.9(D) of this Subpart;
(b) The first cohort of students who initiated ICAPs under §183.7(A) of this
Subpart shall be completing their high school careers under the four-stage
framework established in §189.6 of this Subpart;
© The annual Jump Start Data Report required under §189.19(A) of this Subpart
shall have been published for the third consecutive year; and
(d) The Act 187 ROI report required under §183.20(B)–© of this Subpart shall
reflect, for the first time, outcome data for all CTE completers as defined by this
Subpart, not only industry-based credential earners as covered under the prior
scope of R.S. 17:3138.13.
(6) Phase deadlines are directory provisions. No private right of action accrues against
any state agency or officer solely for failure to meet a Phase deadline, except as
otherwise provided by law. An agency's failure to meet a deadline does not affect the
validity of this Subpart or any action taken under it.
C. Applicability; Grandfather Provisions for Currently Enrolled Students.
(1) Grandfather Protection for Currently Enrolled Students. Any student who, as of
the effective date of this Subpart, is enrolled in a career major program under the
provisions of R.S. 17:189.1 through R.S. 17:18395 as they existed prior to enactment
of this Act shall be entitled to complete that program and earn a Career Diploma under
the requirements applicable at the time of the student's initial enrollment in the career
major program, as follows:
(a) The graduation requirements, Jump Start course sequence requirements,
academic core credit requirements, and industry-based credential requirements
applicable to such student shall be those that were in effect under R.S. 17:189.1
Page 155 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
through R.S. 17:189.5 at the time of the student's enrollment in the career
major program, or, if those requirements changed during the student's
enrollment, the requirements in effect at the time the student most recently
confirmed the student's program of study in the student's Individual
Graduation Plan developed under R.S. 17:2925.
(b) The grandfather protection of this Paragraph shall remain in effect for each
protected student through the earlier of: (i) the date of the student's graduation
or formal withdrawal from the career major program; or (ii) the end of the
fourth academic year following the effective date of this Subpart.
(c) A student protected by this Paragraph may, at the student's option and with the
written approval of the student's parent or legal guardian and the student's
school counselor or career coach, elect to transition to a K–12 CTE pathway
authorized under this Subpart in lieu of completing under the prior
requirements. A transition election under this Subparagraph shall not reduce
the number of credits or credentials the student has previously earned under
the prior requirements.
(2) Currently Authorized Pathways; Transitional Review. Each Jump Start pathway,
career major program, or credential-bearing program that was authorized by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education under R.S. 17:189.1 through R.S.
17:183.5 as of the effective date of this Subpart shall continue in effect for a transitional
period of not less than eighteen (18) months following the effective date of this Subpart,
subject to the following:
(a) During the transitional period, the Council shall review each currently
authorized pathway against the standards established in this Subpart and shall
issue a written determination for each pathway indicating whether the pathway:
(i) qualifies for continued authorization as a K–12 CTE pathway under this
Subpart without modification; (ii) qualifies for continued authorization subject
to specified modifications to bring the pathway into compliance with this
Subpart; or (iii) does not qualify for authorization under this Subpart and shall
Page 156 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
be sunset at the end of the transitional period, or such later date as the Council
determines necessary to protect currently enrolled students under Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection.
(b) The Council shall issue the written determinations required by Subparagraph
(a) of this Paragraph not later than twelve (12) months following the effective
date of this Subpart. The Louisiana Department of Education shall provide the
Council all data and documentation necessary for the Council to make the
determinations required by this Paragraph within sixty calendar days following
the effective date of this Subpart.
© A currently authorized pathway for which the Council issues a determination
under Subparagraph (a)(iii) of this Paragraph shall remain available only to
students who were enrolled in that pathway as of the effective date of this
Subpart and who have elected to continue under the grandfather protection of
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(3) Individual Graduation Plans Under Prior Law. An Individual Graduation Plan
established for a student under R.S. 17:2925 prior to the effective date of this Subpart
shall remain in effect and shall be honored for purposes of that student's graduation
requirements, subject to the student's rights under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
Nothing in this Subpart shall require a student to revise a prior Individual Graduation
Plan solely as a result of the enactment of this Act.
(4) No Adverse Effect on Earned Credentials. No industry-based credential earned by
a student under the prior provisions of R.S. 17:189.1 through R.S. 17:189.5 prior to the
effective date of this Subpart shall be invalidated, reclassified downward, or reduced
in value for purposes of that student's diploma requirements solely by reason of the
enactment of this Act or the credential tier framework established in §189.12 of this
Subpart.
D. Agency Rulemaking Authority.
(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Louisiana
Page 157 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Department of Education, the Louisiana Workforce Commission, and the Louisiana
Board of Regents are each hereby authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., such rules, regulations, bulletins,
and guidelines as are necessary to implement their respective responsibilities under this
Subpart.
(2) BESE Rulemaking; Bulletin Amendments. The State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall, not later than the end of the first full academic year
following the effective date of this Subpart, adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and
bulletins necessary to implement its responsibilities under this Subpart, including at
a minimum all of the following:
(a) Amendments to Bulletin 138 (LAC 28, Part CLXIII), including §301 thereof,
to conform to the performance standards, pathway evaluation criteria, and ROI
integration requirements established in §189.20(G)(1) of this Subpart;
(c) Such other rules, bulletins, and guidance documents as are necessary to
implement the four-stage developmental framework (§189.6), the ICAP and
IGP requirements (§183.7), the career counselling and coaching standards
(§189.8), the pathway structure and authorization and tier designation processes
(§189.9 and §189.13), the career major program curriculum requirements
(§189.10), the work-based learning tiered requirements (§189.11), and the
industry-based credential tier framework (§183.12) of this Subpart.
(3) Notwithstanding §189.3(J)(2)(a) of this Subpart, which prohibits the Council from
promulgating rules within the meaning of the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S.
49:950 et seq., the Council may adopt formal operating procedures, standards, and
guidance documents governing its internal operations, recommendation processes, and
shared performance framework management, consistent with §189.3(I)(7) of this
Subpart. Such documents shall not constitute rules subject to the Administrative
Procedure Act but shall be published on the Council's publicly accessible website and
made available to all interested parties.
(4) Emergency Rulemaking. Any agency authorized to promulgate rules under this
Page 158 of 159
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1408 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 520
Subsection may use emergency rulemaking procedures under R.S. 49:953(B) to avoid
a period of inconsistency between this Subpart and existing administrative rules, where
the agency determines that the public interest requires prompt action. Emergency rules
adopted pursuant to this Paragraph shall be followed by permanent rulemaking within
the timeframes required by R.S. 49:953(B).
(5) Existing Rules; Continuing Effect. All rules, bulletins, and guidance documents of
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and the Louisiana
Department of Education that were in effect under the repealed provisions of Subpart
A-1 shall continue in effect, to the extent consistent with this Subpart, until replaced
or superseded by rules adopted pursuant to this Subsection. Any rule, bulletin, or
guidance document that is directly inconsistent with a provision of this Subpart shall,
upon the effective date of this Subpart, be of no effect to the extent of the inconsistency.
Section 2. R.S. 17:183.1 through 184 are hereby repealed.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.